,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Systems Engineer II (Aviation Operational Data Analysis) - Enterprise Systems & Data Analysis Research,$77k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, October 13, 2020

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

PRIMARY PURPOSE

Supports systems, data, and operations analysis, requirements and systems development analysis and design. Supports independent scientific and technical investigations. Applies formal, established engineering and management principles to specifications and documentation of systems developed.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND/OR DUTIES
1. Supports the definition and development of system requirements and documentation of the requirements in detailed specifications from which programs will be developed and/or procured, and from which hardware will be developed and/or procured.
Under general supervision, supports formulation, validation, documentation, and definition of user requirements or stories, system use cases, business process workflows, enterprise architectures, system specifications and design based on user needs, research, and fact-finding.
Supports stakeholder engagement sessions to elicit user needs, business architectures, processes, and gaps. Works with stakeholders to understand, characterize, model, analyze, and validate current and future business processes, information flows, organizational relationships, and/or operational resources.
Applies standard research methodologies to gather, process, document, and analyze data. Uses relevant database software to effectively organize and present data and generate reports.

5. Works independently on pieces of projects. Work under general supervision on broader strands of the project. Maintains an understanding of project budgeting and financial tracking over the project lifecycle.

6. Devises or modifies procedures and specifications to solve complex problems, considering computer equipment capacity and limitations, operating time, and form of desired results.

7. Designs conceptual and logical data models to be used in systems using UML and entity Relationship diagrams. Develops data dictionaries, schemas, data flows, and ontologies. Supports development and execution of data migration strategies.

8. Support development of information management strategies and governance aligned with organizational mission needs.

9. Supports analysis and revision of existing system logic difficulties and documentation as necessary.

10. Supports resolution of difficult and complicated program support deficiencies.

11. Works with software developers to provide guidance on development issues. Ensures user needs are accurately represented to system designers and developers.

12. Supports development of independent validation and verification plans and scenarios, following industry standards and system requirements

13. Maintains familiarity with the missions and organizational structure of the division or team's major client/sponsors.

14. Drafts reports, briefings, or other project deliverables. Structure problems of advanced scope, technical assistance or proposal development tasks.

JOB REQUIREMENTS
Education: Bachelor's degree in computer science, mathematics, operations research, or a related engineering field or equivalent combination of education and work experience. Masters degree preferred.

2. Experience: Minimum of 4 years relevant work experience performing duties similar to those listed above in a Government contract environment or 6 years generally related experience.
3. Skills:
Ability to participate in a wide variety of systems engineering disciplines including, but not limited to, safety risk management, reliability/maintainability/availability engineering, information systems security, risk management practices, earned value management, investment analysis, independent validation and verification, business analysis, and project definition, management, and control.
Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate to advanced skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to communicate information concisely, precisely, and in a grammatically correct manner in both oral and written communication.
Ability to present and summarize data effectively.
Exhibit a positive attitude in interactions with colleagues, clients/sponsors, and staff. Strong customer and client relations management skills.
Working knowledge of system and software design processes, tools, and techniques. Working knowledge of system development and testing documentation and standards. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices. Working knowledge of different software development life-cycles, to include waterfall and agile methodologies.
Ability to work with and provide direction to others.
Excellent writing and verbal communication skills.
4. Desired qualifications:
Energized candidate interested in supporting data driven decision making in support of the public good. Ability to identify innovative approaches to provide data to support a real-time operational environment. Ability to flex schedule to support real-time on-site operations in a fast-paced environment.
Aviation experience is preferred. Basic understanding of FAA traffic management initiatives and ability to interpret flight data is a plus, but not required. Interest in supporting the mission of an efficient and safe air traffic system is highly desired.
Desired data analysis skills include: experience in data collection, metrics creation and associated analyses; ability to query databases using sql; ability to classify and summarize data for the preparation and submission of reports; ability to clearly document and review standard operating procedures, policies, event reports, best practices, and lessons learned; and the ability to effectively communicate technical and non-technical data to various audiences.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Systems/Software Engineering
Job Function
Career Path II - Expert & Research Specialist
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
1,"Software Development Engineer in Test, Data",$42k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more.

This Software Development Engineer in Test, Data role is based out of our Pasadena, CA. You will have the opportunity to impact the quality of the billions of records at Spokeo. You will collaborate with our Data Engineering to develop test strategy, test plans, and create test-data to test the business logic data pipelines. You'll have the latest tools to use: Airflow, Spark, and Pentaho. If you're self-motivated and passionate about designing and implementing efficient automated tests and raising the quality of products, please do apply!

Responsibilities:
Responsible for analyzing business requirements and creating test plans/test data to ensure that source to target business logic is implemented as expected.
Design and implement integration and black-box tests to ensure the source to target mapping is implemented as expected by the data pipelines.
Create detailed, comprehensive, and well-structured test suites using programming languages such as Python or Ruby.
Review acceptance criteria for the user stories & ensure required test coverage
Collaborate with the Development team members to develop test automation strategy and to implement automation that is reliable and efficient.
Own defect management lifecycle
Requirements:
Must have strong data/analytical skills
Understanding of testing involving ETL Tools such as Pentaho, Informatica, Talend.
3-5 years of work experience in software development and quality assurance
Ability to debug/troubleshoot large sets of data or format related issues
SQL experience and experience with creating sample test-data from large data-sets
Experience with or good understanding of data profiling
AWS knowledge - S3, DynamoDB, EMR, etc. is preferred
Experience working with Pentaho is preferred
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.6,"Spokeo
3.6","Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
2,Senior Python Software Engineer (Data),-1,"Our mission is to power the future of fan engagement.

Simplebet is a B2B product development company using machine learning and real-time technology to make every moment of every sporting event a betting opportunity.

We are looking to hire a Senior Data Engineer to join the SimpleBet team to expand our data and machine learning platform. This includes building ETL pipelines, relational databases for our applications, and streaming realtime data into analytics applications and a data lake. You will be responsible for fetching, organizing, manipulating, and maintaining all of our data in order to optimize machine learning research, product analytics, and streaming data products for our machine learning and customer use cases.
Responsibilities
Build robust and reliable ETL pipelines with best practices and data governance in mind using Apache Airflow, Databricks, Kafka, and PostgreSQL.
Organize raw sports data from a variety of sources into a cohesive, centralized data warehouse.
Design and build our real-time streaming data infrastructure and products.
Write software to optimize machine learning research and production implementations of machine learning models
What will you be doing
In the first month, you will get acquainted with SimpleBet, how data flows through our systems, and begin contributing to our ETL pipeline and data management systems.
In the second month, you will be a contributor in building out a brand new data pipeline to handle user event data with technologies such as Spark, Kafka, and Apache Airflow.
From the third month onwards, you will continue to take ownership of our data platform, continuing to build and iterate to meet product needs and optimize.
Requirements
3+ years of data-oriented software development experience building data backends
Strong understanding of database and data lake design
Experience with languages including Python, Scala, or similar
Experience building and maintaining web services in production using a modern framework like Django, Flask, or FastAPI
Bachelor's degree or Master's degree from an accredited university or college in computer science or related field
Bonus points for
Experience with Databricks, Spark, Kafka, AWS, Kubernetes, Celery
Experience working on Data Science / Machine Learning projects
Simplebet is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.

We are committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. Please let us know if you require reasonable accommodation for the interview process, and we will make every effort to provide it.",2.2,"Simplebet
2.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
3,Sr Systems Engineer - ISSE,-1,"Job Summary:
We are currently seeking a CSI Information Systems Security Engineer (ISSE) to function as a key contributor for the Systems Design Directorate team in the Massachusetts area (i.e. Woburn, Tewksbury, etc).

The Systems Design & Architecture team is the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters. RMD created Cyber Solutions and Integration (CSI) to expand growth opportunities with a focus on system Anti-Tamper (AT) and Cyber Security architecture, requirements, design and implementation, as well as Cyber resiliency, threat awareness, and integration of Enterprise Cyber capabilities into RMD franchise solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Establish and manage a program vision.
Lead engineering execution across all IPTs, CPTs, and disciplines within the Program.
Primary Cyber Solutions POC with the customer senior counterparts.
Responsibility to manage all program engineering related activities related to the development of the exportable version of the system. Authority over and direct management of the program leads to ensure that products are delivered on time, on budget and meet system requirements.
Support the development of cybersecurity requirements, design and architecture artifacts, plans, and policies.
Defining security development and test efforts implementation of security controls of networking devices, databases, operating systems, and hardware and software components
Understanding and integrating cybersecurity development activities.
Support the development of RMF documents and controls validation testing for Authority to Operate (ATO) accreditations.
Performing analysis on cybersecurity collected data and test results.
Conducting cybersecurity audits to ensure appropriate implementation and compliance of the security posture.
Conducting technical and nontechnical trade studies.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring the cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Understanding and compliance with DoD technology release and export licensing policies.
Required Experience/Skills:
Minimum of 6+ years of Technical (hands-on) experience related to Information Assurance/Cyber Engineering requirements, determination, development, and implementation.
Experience in the field of Systems Engineering, including any of the following: System Requirements definition and analysis, System Test and Analysis, and Systems Engineering Studies.
Experience in security systems engineering involving various computer hardware and software S/W operating system and application solutions in both a stand-alone and in LAN/WAN configurations.
Experience with security features and/or vulnerability analysis of various operating systems as defined by Intelligence agencies, NIST, DISA (STIGs) and USCYBERCOM.
Experience with IA vulnerability testing and related network and system test tools; e.g., Retina, NMap, Nessus, Security Content Automation Protocol (SCAP).
Experience with information security toolset including: anti-virus, Vulnerability Assessment, HIDS/ NIDS, host-based or endpoint security solutions, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), and Security Incident and Event Management (SIEM) and centralized auditing tools.
DoDI 8570.01-M IAT Level-II Compliant Certification (e.g. Security+ or CISSP or equivalent).
Experience leading and growing a team of engineers.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Desired Experience/Skills:
Experience with IT and/or network and system security administration, including operating system security configuration and account management best practices for UNIX, MS Windows, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and CISCO systems.
Understanding of Systems Engineering requirements, specifications, and Experience implementing DoD and Federal IA Certification and Accreditation Processes, IA controls and developing and maintaining associated certification and accreditation documentation.
Ability to organize, multi-task and prioritize tasks in a fast paced, deadline driven environment.
Familiar with NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF) as described in NIST Special Publication 800-37
Familiar with Program Protection Plan (PPP) required by DoDI 5000.02 and DoDI 5200.39
Security related Network (e.g., Cisco) and Operating Systems (e.g., Linux, Windows, Solaris) certification or training
Knowledge of Agile / DevOps techniques.
Experience with multi-level security.
Knowledge of DoD Exportability/Releasability Requirements.
Experience working U.S. Government contract proposals as an Information Assurance Engineer subject matter expert.
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics); advanced degree(s) Business or related discipline
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 165774

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
4,Azure Engineer for MSP / MSSP,-1,"KAMIND is a fast-growing MSP / MSSP that builds secure connections between people and Microsoft Office 365 and Azure cloud services. A KAMIND professional is a member of a close-knit team with a focus on customer success in the deployment of Office 365 and Microsoft cloud services. KAMIND clients are growing businesses that adapt and change to be more competitive in the market and build their business on Microsoft software and security standards.
Job Purpose: *
KAMIND is looking for a *Microsoft Azure expert* to join our team of highly professional engineers. The core mission of the Azure Engineer Level II is to assist with the design, creation, and deployment of Office 365 and Azure infrastructure solutions related primarily to client projects as well as internal projects. This includes the migration of clients to Office 365, build out of KAMIND Azure solutions and assisting with the development of new cloud product offerings and technologies, improvements to Azure processes, and migration of client data to the Azure cloud. This is a full-time job with lots of career potential.
Responsibilities and Duties*
· Maintain a relevant technical understanding of Microsoft infrastructure solutions including Azure, Office 365, and Windows Server

· Assist with the design and deployment of all aspects of Azure infrastructure technologies and topologies

· Migration of client email systems to Office 365

· Exchange Federation migration

· Deployment of Azure AD Connect

· Migrate and deploy various customer workloads to Azure as needed

· Architect and deploy Hybrid Azure AD environments

· Customer interaction and meetings to determine needs and requirements

· Configure and troubleshoot cloud, virtual, and physical hardware and software systems

· Proactively identify and resolve operational, tooling, and process inefficiencies

· Project and design documentation

· Process and support documentation

· Respond to customer requests promptly

· Maintain regular contact with customers during project lifecycle

· Provide technical assistance and training to users as needed

· Adherence to the company's core values

· Acquire and maintain necessary and relevant Microsoft and Circadence Technical certifications

· Travel to customer locations as necessary

· Ability to work 24x7x365 as needed to meet client objectives.

· Attend daily huddles in person at the start of every workday
Qualifications: *
· Bachelor’s Degree in computer science or other technical or engineering discipline, or equivalent business experience

· 2+ years’ experience as an Azure and/or Office 365 expert in a large mission critical Office 365/Azure implementation

· Experience in Office 365 migration

· Experience in the deployment of Microsoft Mobile Device Management (MDM)

· Experience in the deployment of Azure networking services and Azure site recovery (ASR) services.

· Experience in the deployment of Fortinet security appliances

· Must document and support all aspects of the environment

· Relevant certifications including Microsoft security certifications (AZ-500, AZ 900, MS-100, MS-101, MS-500) and Fortinet certifications (NSE 401) are highly desirable

· Experience at an MSP or internal IT Azure services Team

· Ability to adapt and change as dictated by the cloud services environment

· Annual background checks are performed due to the security requirements of our work

_Due to Federal ITAR requirements, KAMIND IT is required to restrict our hiring to persons who are US Citizens, lawful permanent residents, or green card holders. KAMIND IT provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. You will NEED to bring your Driver's License and Birth Certificate or Passport along with the completed Employment Application with you if called for an interview_.
Recruiters*
_This is not a solicitation or a request for service. Do not contact KAMIND or supply candidates._

Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Office 365: 1 year (Required)
Azure: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Lake Oswego, OR 97035 (Required)
License:
AZ 500 (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.kamind.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/KAMINDIT
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",1.3,"KAMIND IT
1.3","Lake Oswego, OR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
5,Senior Process Validation Engineer II,$63k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Duties

The individual will be expected to provide process validation support for Takeda biologics manufacturing operations located in Lexington and Cambridge MA, USA. The process validation activities related to the Lexington & Cambridge manufacturing site include, but are not limited to, the following areas:

Development of process validation protocols and other documentation for cell culture and purification processes.
Execution of process validation studies, as well as data analysis and compilation of data and results into summary and final reports.
Provide technical assessments on change controls, deviations and investigations, assessing proposed changes to validated processes to identify requirements necessary to maintain validated status.
Own process validation related quality systems (CAPA, Change Control) and use project management skills to coordinate those project teams and drive results.
Participate in regulatory inspections.
Represent process validation team on project core teams and participate in strategy discussions on behalf of process validation in collaboration with PV strategy team and aligned with global PV and regulatory requirements.
Support and interface with global PPQ community of practice where needed to ensure alignment and consistency with global practices

Responsibilities:

80% of Time:

Write, execute, analyze results and summarize process validation activities in the following areas:

Tech transfer (new product introduction)
Change management
Continuous lifecycle management

Develop and assess the following Quality System elements for process Validation:

Quality Risk Management program
CAPAs
Change Controls
Deviations
GMP Investigations

Participate and contribute in design, development, validation strategy, and routine GMP activities:

Provide technical input to strategy/philosophy for validation activities
Represent process validation during tech transfer activities as required.
Represent process validation during site GMP activities and participate on cross-functional teams
Own process validation Quality Systems, as required, and manage project through to closure per timelines

15% of Time

Identify opportunities for continuous improvements, participate in the deployment of best practices, represent process validation at Lexington Site Work System meetings and support/maintain the process validation communications board and community of practice.

5% of Time

Participate in regulatory agency inspections for Process Validation.
Train other Takeda staff on validation protocols.

Education and Experience Requirements

Essential:

Bachelor's in Biology, Chemistry, Chemical Engineering or related field with a minimum of 8 years relevant experience or Master’s in related field with a minimum of 5 years relevant experience.

Key Skills, Abilities, and Competencies

Qualified candidates will have:

Relevant experience with industry process validation requirements and expectations
Working knowledge of the science and technology for the major unit operations associated with manufacturing operations.
Experience with troubleshooting / problem solving and risk assessment / mitigation.
Good written and verbal communication skills.
Strong team member with demonstrated ability to work collaboratively with others.
Ability to work independently in a fast paced environment and manage multiple projects and priorities.

Complexity and Problem Solving

The candidate will:

Exercise judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action.
Must have the ability to analyze data, quantify risks, and identify gaps independently.
Must have the ability to propose solutions to problems and escalate issues with proposed solutions to management as necessary.

Internal and External Contacts

The person in this role will be instrumental in working with other members of the Quality, Manufacturing and Engineering organizations to develop and execute process validation studies and projects to enhance the manufacturing systems and processes to compliantly and efficiently achieve organizational goals.
Other departments this person will work closely with include: Process Development, Manufacturing Sciences, and Technology, Manufacturing, Regulatory Affairs, Quality Control, Quality Assurance, Engineering, Facilities.

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
6,Systems Engineer II Platform Int./Flight Test,-1,"Are you an engineer that wants hands on experience working with missile hardware and the platforms that deliver that hardware?
Do you intentionally work toward getting the job done instead of doing the job?

If you are ready to bring your talent and skills to the world leader in missile systems, we want to talk to you! We are Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD) and we design, develop, integrate, test and produce missile systems for critical requirements, including air-to-air, strike, surface Navy air defense, land combat missiles, guided projectiles, exoatmospheric kill vehicles, and direct energy weapons.

The Systems Integration and Test directorate at RMD is responsible for the development and deployment of product test architectures, test environments and capabilities, integration and test execution for our products from design through manufacturing. The vision of Systems Integration and Test is to be a world-class leader in driving test affordability while ensuring an operationally relevant product is delivered to our service members.

The Weapons & Platforms Center (W&PC) is currently searching for a Platform Integration and Flight Test Engineer. This position may have some responsibility for the following: executing development gate reviews, Consent to Ship (CTS), Test Readiness Reviews (TRRs) and other events which ensure the integrity of the design, integration, verification and test processes. Other responsibilities could include verification, integration and test execution, which result in successful completion of test events including lab, platform, field / range test and associated analysis of test data.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Job Description:

The position is located in Tucson Arizona with responsibilities for, verification and field-test activities which may include the following:

Support program verification test environments, processes and execution tasks. Support proposals, review basis of estimates (BOEs) and prepare reviews in support of W&PC tasks. Effectively support the design and development process. Support leadership alignment to define and achieve the strategic vision for W&PC and Systems Test organization. Champion respect, ethics and diversity initiatives within the organization.

Responsibilities may include:
Develop and verify test plans and procedures.
Utilize lab / field test equipment for testing and troubleshooting
Perform missile builds and data analysis, qualification testing, design verification testing, hardware integration, aircraft integration, and flight testing.
Compile and analyze test data and provide detailed reports of the results.
Should test failures occur, perform root cause and corrective action analysis as required.
Accountable for completeness of all documentation.
Able to support field testing with occasional travel for durations typically one to two week durations.
Support, create and present Consent to Ship (CTS) and Test Readiness Review (TRR) packages
Provide proposal support including writing of Basis of Estimates (BOEs) for integration and field test support requests from customers
Able to travel to domestic field sites on occasion
Required Experience & Skills:

U.S. Citizenship required

This position requires a minimum of 2 (two) years of experience with a BS degree. The candidate must be capable of lifting at least 25 pounds and performing work in an industrial environment

The candidate shall demonstrate a minimum of 4 of the required skills listed below:
Experience developing and implementing configuration control of products and drawings
Knowledge of platform interfaces and strong experience testing of the relationship between the Interface Control Document (ICD) and weapon system
Knowledge of RCC 501-01, data dictionaries, Chapter 10 data and other telemetry formats
Knowledge of MIL-STD-1553 and MIL-STD-1760 interfaces
Experienced in executing Consent to Ship and Test Readiness Reviews
Experienced in System Integration Labs (SIL), Ground Mounts, and Waterfront Integration Tests (WITs)
Working knowledge of Debris Hazard Analysis and the models and simulations which generate splash patterns and flyouts
Knowledge of Link Margin Analysis, and have working experience with telemetry data capture
Experienced in Failure Review, Failure Investigation and Root Cause and Correction Action Boards.
Experienced with Verification and Validation methods and associated activities
Desired Experience & Skills:
Good communication (oral and written) and presentation skills
Knowledge of Communications Security (COMSEC) equipment and Classified computer security requirements
Demonstrated strong analytical and problem solving skills
Capable of making real-time decisions and coordinating with range to ensure test points are properly captured
Able to work with and take direction from Functional Management and IPTs from multiple programs
Able to perform successfully in an environment with frequent and direct interaction with customers and peers
Strong customer relationship experience
Strong engineering skills, familiarity with laboratory test equipment, electronics and software
Must be MS certified Program Manager Level 6 within six months of hire date (MS)
Experienced creating integration and verification strategies to support efficiency improvements\\
Experience interpreting requirements and translating knowledge points into test plans and procedures
Experienced with Range test resources and planning such as badging, explosive training, security, storage, transportation, data streaming, and data capture
Some experience with engineering team/project leadership
Working knowledge of Earned Value Management Systems
Required Education:

Bachelors degree in Engineering or Related field (Preferred Majors: Electrical, Aerospace, Mechanical, Software, Physics or Systems Engineering) and a minimum of 2 years of relevant experience.

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens. https://www.state.gov/security-clearances
167499

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
7,Release Train Data Architect,$76k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Location: 11799 N College Ave, Carmel, IN, USA

Division: Cox Automotive

Job Level: Individual Contributor

Travel: No

Schedule: Full-time

Shift: Day Job

Requisition Number: 202000503

Job Summary:

We know you’ve got choices as an experienced Architect, so why work for Cox Automotive? Besides being a privately held company that’s been in business over 100 years, Cox Automotive is a respected industry leader.

The Release Train Data Architect provides technical leadership and guidance to a value-oriented release train comprised of multiple delivery teams. As a part of the Release Train Leadership Team, the Release Train Architect works with engineering, product, and business leaders to create and promote the release train’s current architectural direction and future vision.

Key responsibilities include insuring technical alignment, architectural health and vision across the release train’s agile delivery teams. The Architecture Team accomplishes our goals by:

Defining and socializing future state vision
Understanding technical and business dependencies
Understanding and communicating broader architectural context
Promoting leading practices to drive architectural health and high quality
Defining, assessing, and communicating technical debt and risk
Guiding architectural decisions
Analyzing design and technology alternatives with respect to business benefits
Applying emerging technology to business opportunities
Promoting a culture of mentoring, collaboration and sharing

Successful Release Train Architects will be able to communicate effectively on both technical and business fronts. Validating technology assumptions and quantifying value, effort, risk and technical feasibility in terms of time and money is a critical skill for this role. Release Train Architects must understand the technology landscape of their domain and be able to collaborate with their peers to promote standards, patterns and re-usability to enable the development of best in class solutions. Architecture has an important role in our business. We strive to enable a sustainable, continuous, accelerating flow of exceptional solutions to market.

Skills and Experience:

Demonstrating a strong ability to collaborate with others. Working in concert with engineering, product and business leaders. Resolve design pattern conflicts between teams when necessary to insure architectural alignment
Forming educated opinions about the evolution of our architecture practice. Illustrate and evangelize the technical and product vision through creating architectural artifacts such as roadmaps, diagrams, leading practices documents, maturity models and technical analysis presentations.
Work with architecture and engineering team members to author guiding principles to better inform teams' design decisions.
Understand technical risks and technical debt. Working transparently to bring visibility to these items is critical, as is developing appropriate mitigation strategies.
Continuous learning: staying current with technology that is relevant to our problem/solution space.
Evaluating current and future worksteams for opportunities to leverage preferred technology patterns and solutions (such as Amazon Web Services) in reusable patterns. Release Train Architects should always be thinking about new ways to employ AWS to create scalable, cost effective and inventive solutions.
Share what our teams are learning and doing! Cox Automotive wins when we leverage our collective learnings and we're intentional about sharing great work.

Qualifications:

10+ years of experience in full development life cycle and significant experience in delivering applications and architecture services in a production environment.
2+ years leadership experience
2+ years experience leading data integration initiatives with partners and providers.
2+ years’ experience of Data Lake implementation.
3+ years experience working with AWS and/or Azure data related technologies
Understanding of database and analytical technologies in the industry including MPP and NoSQL databases, Data Warehouse design, BI reporting and Dashboard development.
Experience developing software code in one or more programming languages (Java, JavaScript, Python, etc).
Hands on experience leading enterprise data warehousing and analytics projects.
Prior experience in the implementation of design and architecture processes in an Enterprise Agile Environment.
Prior experience in IT architecture or team development lead roles in large-scale, complex IT environments.
Extensive experience working in automation first environments promotions Continuous Integrating/Continuous Delivery and infrastructure as code is a definite plus.
A solid understanding of the solutions architecture of consumer-scale web solutions, distributed systems integration and cloud computing platforms is strongly desired.
Experience with AWS ecosystem and architectural patterns is strongly desired.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management of Information Systems, or related field OR equivalent work experience.

Who We Are

About Cox Automotive

There’s nothing ordinary about Cox Automotive. We are people of every background driven by our passion for mobility, innovation, client success and community outreach. We make buying, selling and owning (or simply using) cars easier for everyone. Touching more than 40,000 clients across five continents, we bring together the best brands and the best teams to propel the automotive industry forward. Some of those team members work for our iconic consumer brands like Autotrader and Kelley Blue Book, while others are creating the future of automotive at industry-facing brands like Dealer.com, Manheim and vAuto.

About Cox

We are the Cox family of businesses. We’ve been making our mark since 1898 by building and evolving world-class businesses, staying true to our values, and encouraging top talent to always look for growth and impact while building a career with us. Our primary divisions – Cox Communications and Cox Automotive – are driving a new wave of innovation, powering smart cities with powerhouse broadband communications and pioneering greener, more progressive transportation alternatives for individuals and fleet operators. We’re also expanding into new spaces like cleantech and healthcare to rev up our momentum toward building a better future for the next generation. We’re looking for the talent today who will be our leaders tomorrow. Sound intriguing? Learn more about where we are today, where we hope you’ll be going with us, and the common purpose that unites us at coxenterprises.com.

Cox is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer - All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Cox accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Cox employees, Cox hiring manager, or send to any Cox facility. Cox is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",3.6,"Cox Automotive
3.6","Carmel, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
8,A&S Performance Simulation - Systems Engineer II,-1,"**This position is for early career individuals who have less than 2 years of professional work experience and who will receive a degree during the current academic year or who received their degree within the last 18 months.***
Raytheon Missiles & Defense is a technology and innovation leader in defense, civil government and cybersecurity solutions thanks to employees who live our Values of Trust, Respect, Collaboration, Innovation and Accountability. Diversity is a part of our culture and a key to our success. When world-class talent works together in a place that is respectful and inclusive, we solve some of the world's hardest problems.

We know that a diverse company is a strong company. The people of Raytheon Technologies come from different backgrounds. We value our different perspectives and styles of tackling the worlds most complex challenges and toughest threats. Through Employee Resource Groups (ERGs), our employees are empowered to impact business results, build professional networks, advocate for causes that matter to them and contribute to their local communities. Diversity of thought is critical to the future of innovation. We leverage these unique voices to generate solutions toward a united and singular purpose: to define the future of aerospace.

Key Responsibilities:
The Performance Simulation Engineer will work within a multi-discipline team (e.g. Guidance, Navigation, and Control, signal processing, mechanical design) to design and develop differing levels of fidelity simulation models which represent the components of a system. This includes the ability to read, debug, edit and create computer programming code to enhance simulation models, creating and executing unit tests on the models to verify functionality, documenting the design and test results, and integrating with other component models in a complex system simulation environment.

The Performance Simulation Engineer will execute simulations in a high-performance computing environment, which can include the use of Graphics Processing Units (GPUs), to support missile system design/trade studies, performance assessment, and system test. This Engineer will work within a team to develop analysis of the data for the specific task as well as provide insight and understanding of the system performance, recognizing and troubleshooting any anomalies observed in the simulation results

The Performance Simulation Engineer will ensure the solutions provided meet their defined requirements and function as needed through rigorous verification and validation. This activity utilizes data from a number of sources up to and including system level flight testing. Please note: We are not seeking engineers with an AutoCAD or 3-D modeling background or network modeling from an IT perspective.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Required Education, Skills and Experience:
Masters of Science of Masters of Arts degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Software Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Systems Engineering, Computer Science, other Engineering disciplines, Physics, Math, STEM or related field from an ABET accredited curriculum with a minimum 3.00 cumulative GPA is required.
Experience coding in C/C++ (or other high order language)
Experience using tools such as MATLAB or Python for analysis of data sets
Experience in modeling, simulation, statistics, or analysis as related to understanding the behavior and performance of existing or proposed engineering solutions
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
Desired Education, Skills and Experience:
Proficiency in Linux or Unix
Knowledge/course work of radar, signal & image processing, digital communications, control theories, estimation theory and/or electro optics
Knowledge of physics, random variables, and its application to solving engineering problems
Ability to maintain frequent communication with project leads and customers
Demonstrated ability to work effectively with individuals from diverse communities and cultures
Demonstrated ability to work with colleagues who represent a diversity of work and conflict resolution styles
Location: This position is located in beautiful Tucson, AZ. Tucson has a friendly, caring and laid-back atmosphere, combined with the innovation and energy of a metropolitan region and recognized as one of Americas 10 Best Small Cities. Surrounded by beautiful mountains, colorful Sonoran Desert landscape and majestic saguaro cacti, Tucson is blessed with some of natures best work. Tucson is known for its bright blue skies, and with more than 310 sunny days per year, Tucsons fantastic weather lets residents enjoy the outdoors year-round.

Benefits:
Student Loan Repayment Contribution
Paid Parental Leave
Educational Assistance
9/80 work schedule Every other Friday off
Onsite Wellness Program Health Screenings/Flu Shots
401K Savings & Investment Plan
Paid Time Off
Rstars is an enterprise-wide recognition program that allows you to give and receive thanks for notable and exceptional performance.
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Employment is contingent on other factors, including, but not limited to, background checks and drug screens.https://www.state.gov/m/ds/clearances/c10978.htm

***Please upload a copy of your most recent transcripts with your resume when applying to this requisition***

167142

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
9,Senior HPC Systems Engineer,-1,"Raytheon Technologies is seeking a Senior Systems Engineer to support a cleared program in McLean, VA

Candidate shall be able to provide analysis, design, development, deployment, and lifecycle support for leading edge hardware and software systems. Translate mission needs into technical requirements while developing and implementing end-to-end solutions to meet requirements. Provide hands on technical direction for personnel, design and develop solutions to complex applications problems, system administration issues, network concerns, and perform systems management and integration functions.

Required Skills:

Candidate shall have a minimum of sixteen (16) years of experience to include:
• Designing, installing, testing, implementing, and maintaining complex heterogeneous high performance computing systems
• All aspects of systems engineering and administration
• Working with clustered computing systems including clustered and parallel file systems
• Broad based technical knowledge spanning all areas of IT operations and service delivery
• Proven ability to design, install, and maintain large scale Linux compute clusters and commercial supercomputing systems
• Working with clustered and parallel file systems including GPFS and Lustre
• Deploying and maintaining high performance communications fabrics including Infiniband
• Working with computational accelerators including GPU s, FPGAs
• Ability to translate requirements into end-to-end designs for systems that involve multiple interfaces and supporting data repositories
• Strong customer service skills, teaming skills, and the ability to collaborate within a cross-functional team
• Ability to explain technical issues clearly and accurately to both technical and non- technical audiences
• Excellent Communication skills, both written and oral
• Demonstrated ability to be a quick learner who can work independently
• Demonstrated ability to adjust to changing priorities
• Knowledge of Linux operating environment

Required Knowledge Skills:

Personnel shall possess knowledge and experience in:
• Analyzing user needs and translating them into concrete technical requirements.
• Maintaining a strong awareness of technical trends;
• Analyzing and recommending commercially available software and systems as well as the proven ability to incorporate new technology into the infrastructure;
• Designing, deploying, and maintaining complex heterogeneous high performance computing systems including large-scale Linux clusters and commercial supercomputers, Infiniband, and Lustre

Current Clearance TS/SCI with Positive Customer Polygraph

158162

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
10,Application Engineer - Analytics Developer,$56k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Apply

Description

Active TS/SCI with Polygraph required before consideration!

The Application Engineer will play a role in the design, implementation, and maintenance of data ingest processes for a user security alert dashboard, specifically automating the processing of customer data logs.

Required: experience with ElasticSearch, Kibana, Kubernetes, Scala, Spark streaming, pub/sub architecture (specifically Kafka)

Desired: experience with Angular 7+, Node.js, Redis, MySQL

COMSO, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",4.1,"COMSO
4.1","Fort Meade, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
11,Sr. Data Engineer,$69k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Datascan is a provider of wholesale and audit intelligence in the automotive industry. Datascan’s solutions are the most comprehensive in the industry, providing banks, independent finance companies, and captive financial institutions with clarity critical to their success – helping them manage risk while increasing productivity and profits. All of our solutions are web-based and delivered from our state-of-the-art DataScan-managed data centers.

Job Description


The Data Engineer will be working on creating solutions to implement and operationalize a data lake, with full support for ingestion of data from various sources. Additionally, the Data Engineer will implement security and governance controls within the data, manage a cataloging solution, and automate solutions for transforming data sets using state of the art big-data technologies (Hive, Spark, etc.).

Responsibilities:
Build and maintain one or more data lakes to support scalable ingesting, manipulation, and reporting of data.
Manipulate data to produce and maintain new data elements using repeatable, automated processes.
Combine and transform data into usable sets by other individuals in the organization, for example, data scientists and business users.
Build new software from the ground up utilizing industry standard best practices
Job Requirements
Experience working within AWS ecosystem (AWS S3, Glue, EMR, Redshift, Athena, QuickSight) or comparable cloud environments (Azure/GCP)
Experience extracting, ingesting, and transforming large data sets
Experience with working with multiple kinds of databases (relational, document storage, key-value, timeseries) and their associated query languages -- specifically understanding when to use one vs. another.
Experience with big data platforms such as Hadoop and Spark
Experience utilizing enterprise data warehousing systems such as Redshift.
Strong coding skills (Python, Java, C# are all reasonable)
Lots of experience working with common data formats and manipulating data within them -- JSON, CSV, Parquet
Experience working with Infrastructure as Code tools such as Cloudformation, CDK, or Terraform.
Experience handling sensitive data and governing access to it.
#LI-KN1

#WeDoITBetter",3.2,"DataScan
3.2","Alpharetta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
12,Sr Systems Engineer - Operations Analysis,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..

Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System of Systems Modeling and Architecture Directorate performs customer focused operational analysis and simulation activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). Supporting this mission are teams driving flexible integration solutions crossing all product areas (sensors, effectors, command and control, logistics and operations), developing tools and methods to evaluate system level analysis and visualization based on customer requirements. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of excellence through innovation and teamwork while championing individual diversity in a flexible work environment to meet the needs of todays workforce.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments that will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

We are looking for motivated engineers to join our team in the development of novel system of system architectures to deliver best of breed solutions to our customers. Our engineers bring broad DoD mission skills in radar, sensor, C2, and effector data analysis and analytics. The systems engineer should have expertise in Python, Matlab, or Java for technical modeling, simulation or analysis of real-world and modeled data to create deep understanding of needs/constraints and breakdown traditional stovepiped systems to assemble dynamic system-of-system solutions. The systems engineer will analyze end-to-end system needs, in particular to understand system interfaces and data connectivity requirements across the kill-chain. Tasks will include analyzing data, understanding performance requirements, developing metrics, developing or implementing algorithms to cleanse, process, and combine products from multiple systems to provide next-generation performance across the entire system of systems.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 4 years of experience in the field of engineering or related technical discipline
Computer programming experience including strong Python experience with exposure to Matlab or Java
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
Desired Skills:
Masters or PhD in Engineering, Science, Physics, Mathematics, Operations Research or other relevant technical discipline
Strong team-member and collaborator with effective written and oral communication skills
Experience participating and supporting analyses and studies to include understanding how to define and execute a study
Experience evaluating new concepts of operation and developing new technology use cases
Strong technical and analytical skills to develop credible results for presenting to the customer
Knowledge of principles such as CONOPS, system tradeoff analysis, threat definitions, and system of system assessments
Engineering domain experience in EO/IR/RF sensor, kinetic weapon, and/or electronic warfare systems
System Knowledge in warfighting Domains, including at least one of the following: Air Defense, Ballistic Missile Defense, Ship Self-Defense, Air/Land/Sea/Joint C4I, Operations in a Cyber Contested Environment, Network Centric Operations, Air Traffic Management, Critical Infrastructure Protection
Existing TS/SCI security clearance
Required Education: Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Operations Research or related discipline.

Keywords: software, systems, engineer, architecture, algorithm, DoD, C/C++, Java, JavaScript, Python, real-time computing, RF sensor, electronic warfare, operations research

At RTX, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision that is shared by RTX employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

RTX has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether you are just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, RTX offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits RTX offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor 167577

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Arlington, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
13,Controls Systems Mechanical Engineer (Mechatronics Engineer),$56k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Function: *
Due to strong growth in our business and our commitment to continuous improvement, we have an opening for a Controls Systems Mechanical Engineer. This position will focus on implementing lean manufacturing techniques across our facility, with the goal of improving quality and efficiency of the assembly process.
What you’ll do: *
· Provide engineering support for highly custom automated assembly processes

Controls/Mechanical troubleshooting

· Drive manufacturing through innovation/continuous improvement

Utilize data such as downtime, scrap, efficiencies, etc. to plan and strategize countermeasures for equipment and process problems

Proactively participant in the APQP/Gemba process

Training of Operators/Maintenance personnel

Drive YOY productivity improvements

· Design and implement electrical/mechanical systems

Maintain and update electrical/mechanical drawings

· Able to work under pressure while managing competing demands and tight deadlines

· Core Attributes

Set the direction (innovative, customer focus)

Inspire others (driven team player)

Find a way (adaptable, flexible, organized)

Show Character (integrity)

Deliver Results
What we’re looking for: *
Bachelor's degree in Mechatronics Engineering
5+ years of strong manufacturing experience
Ability to work effectively and efficiently with minimal supervision
Understanding and communicating technical details
Drive new controls technology and software (A.I.) to become a world class manufacturer
Knowledge of:

· Electrical, pneumatic, and mechanical schematics and how these systems interact

· Multi-axis servo systems/Industrial vision systems

· Networking knowledge and application

· Fieldbus Technologies (ex: Ethernet/IP,EtherCAT, IOLink, Modbus)

· Interfacing and communication with devices; analog, fieldbus, etc.

· 6 sigma problem solving

· Setup/execute a D.O.E.

· Statistical data analysis

Software Experience:
AutoCAD/SolidWorks
Rockwell Suite (Studio 5000, FactoryTalk, RSLogix)
MS Office Suite
Who we are: *
Means Industries*, headquartered in Saginaw, MI, is a Tier 1 global automotive supplier of high value transformational propulsion-system technologies. Established in 1922, Means continues to foster a culture of collaboration through two business units, Means Propulsion Systems and Means TransForm Products. Our passion for problem solving drives everything we do and we remain committed to producing high quality innovative technology solutions for our global customers.
For more information about our company and to apply to this position, please visit our website (www.meansindustries.com).

Means is a division of Amsted Industries (www.amsted.com), one of the world’s largest transportation component manufacturers. Based in Chicago, Amsted specializes in products that serve the rail, heavy-duty vehicle, automotive, construction and general industrial markets. Amsted is one of the largest 100 percent employee-owned companies in the United States.

Means supports and cultivates creativity through a collaborative cross functional work environment. By nurturing innovation at all levels of the company, Means’ desire for progress and improvement helps launch pioneering, transformative technologies within the automotive industry.

With a high level focus on people development, you can grow and develop through diverse work experiences and quality training opportunities. Means is experiencing exponential growth and supports a culture where employees take pride and ownership in their work. As an employee owned company, you will recognize your direct impact on the business and be part of its success (US Only).

Means offers a comprehensive range of benefits including medical, dental, vision, 401(k) with employer matching, a health savings account with contribution for US employees and an excellent retirement package.

Means is an Equal Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. No agencies.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
Mechanical Engineering: 1 year (Preferred)
Manufacturing: 5 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.meansindustries.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"Means Industries
3.9","Saginaw, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1922,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
14,ETL Developer,$59k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Reporting to the ETL Lead of Information technology, the ETL Developer is responsible for the loading, extraction, transformation, organization, and reporting of complex international data that spans 5 Latin American countries. The incumbent will have experience working with “large data” that spans several countries.

Responsibilities:
Create complex data loading processes for Operational Data Stores, Data Warehouses and Data Marts that satisfy all functional and technical requirements.
Responsible for extracting data from various sources, transforming the data as required, and loading it to various target (ETL) database(s) and/or structures
Analyze and review complex object and data models and the metadata repository in order to structure processes and data for accuracy, efficiency, and maintainability
Work with various levels of project managers, data modelers, DBAs, and system administrators to design load processes and identify potential problem areas.
Collaborate with the Data Architect to understand, interpret, and implement complex data integration requirements.
Work with internal business clients to solve data integrity issues and ensure timely data availability.
Assist in data load monitoring and problem resolution. Take action to resolve recurring issues.
Serve as an expert for DataStage software development who can advise team on best practices, capabilities and limitations,
Act as SME to team in the plan, design, and delivery of BI and Data Warehouse solutions
Assess existing DataStage code and determine refactoring.
Advice on the application of standards/methodology practices to the project
Open to learn the new technologies like Informatica ,Tibco Data virtualization
Qualifications:

Experience:

Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience in Computer Science, Information Systems, or other related field.
Minimum of Five years of experience with developing code using IBM’s InfoSphere DataStage
Experience delivering BI and Data Warehouse solutions with both Dimensional and Relational modeling a plus.
Automotive Lending or Financial Services industry experience desired

Skills & Knowledge:

Minimum of Five years of DataStage (v8.5 and later versions)
Proven experience with SQL and relational databases (Oracle 11g preferred)
Solid design, coding, testing and debugging skills
Strong analytical and good communications skills
Knowledge of standards and practices in BI, Data Warehousing, ETL and DataStage
Ability to develop DataStage guidelines and standards
Excellent communication skills are essential.
Familiar with: Windows, Unix/Linux, PL/SQL, Shell Scripting

#LI-CH1",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Detroit, MI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
15,Commercial Building Engineer,-1,"JOB SUMMARY:
Under the supervision of the Senior Building Engineer and in conjunction with Property Management/Ownership supports the implementation, documentation of work orders, standards, policies and procedures relating to the engineering department.

REPRESENTATIVE FUNCTIONS OR DUTIES:
Maintains and cleans mechanical, electrical and shop areas.
Maintains and performs repairs to buildings, utilities, grounds and equipment
Records all pertinent data in building logbooks and makes all appropriate daily entries via work order system.
Performs procedures and tasks and other routine maintenance duties including but not limited to light and ballast replacements, plumbing and minor electrical repairs, garbage collection, ceiling tile replacement, roof maintenance, lock repairs, painting, light carpentry and monthly building / roof inspections.
Performs miscellaneous tasks as assigned by Property Management / Ownership.
Fosters a work environment that promotes energy conservation and continuous improvement of engineering functions.
Actively functions as a team member.
Demonstrates commitment to quality of service.
Maintains regular attendance in the workplace.
Provides highest quality of service to the tenants, staff and visitors at the facility.
Effective communication to the Property Management team and tenants.
Location*
Orlando, Florida
Job Requirements*
3+ years in a commercial environment
Experience with HVAC, plumbing and light electrical
HS Diploma or GED required
Full-time (40 hours / week); mandatory on-call rotation

Uniforms are provided annually

Competitive pay, benefits included

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Building Maintenance: 1 year (Preferred)
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Pay Frequency:
Bi weekly or Twice monthly
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
This Job Is:
Open to applicants under 18 years old, provided it is legally allowed for the job and location
A good fit for applicants with gaps in their resume, or who have been out of the workforce for the past 6 months or more
Open to applicants who do not have a college diploma",2.4,"Commercial Real Estate Company
2.4","Orlando, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
16,Data Engineer,$65k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,"Alignment Healthcare
3.5","Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
17,Senior Mechatronics Engineer (Biotech),-1,"Join a small but rapidly growing startup that is developing exciting new life sciences technology. Play a key role in the development and commercialization of technology and products that will have a major impact on the medical and life sciences fields!

We are seeking a Mechatronics Engineer - someone with a mix of education and experience in mechanical, electrical, and software engineering disciplines. In this role, you will contribute to the automation of our product, designing, building, wiring, and programming to improve the product’s performance and manufacturability.

This position is full-time and is based in Newark, California.

Primary Responsibilities:
Take ownership of the industrial control panel sub-system (power distribution, data acquisition, and control electronics). Understand the existing prototype design and drive improvements to make it robust, production, and manufacturing ready.
Automate all aspects of tool manufacture, from assembly to alignment and calibration to high-level performance qualification. Utilize a mixture of computer vision, data & image acquisition, robotics & motion control to reduce error and bottlenecks in manufacturing.
Automate measurements that qualify optical/mechanical/electrical sub-system performance and perform accelerated life-time testing to prove the reliability of these sub-systems.
Secondary Responsibilities:
Support continual design improvements that improve on existing performance limitations or enable full process visibility and control (ie. through additional sensing/actuation hardware or improved software control).
Support the operations team that maintains and runs a fleet of our instruments. Troubleshoot any issues that occur and determine root cause, implement process or design improvements, and directly contribute to tool reliability and up-time.
Required Qualifications:
BS or MS degree in Mechanical, Electrical, or Software Engineering with 5+ years of experience.
Demonstrated experience working on or designing an industrial control panel – power supply sizing, wire harness design, part layout, and selection.
Demonstrated experience controlling hardware (motion stages, cameras, acquisition electronics) from software (Matlab, Python, C#, C++, etc.).
Hands-on and independent work style, with excellent organizational and communication skills.
Bonus Qualifications:
Hardware or embedded system programming experience (FPGA or HPS, VHDL, Verilog, etc.).
Understanding of classical motion control (PID, lead-lag controller, feedforward).
Industrial control and communication experience (PLC, EtherCAT, etc.).
Experience designing custom PCBs and electronics for mixed-signal processing.
Benefits:
Full medical/dental/vision (100% employee covered)
401K with matching
Paid vacation
Job Type: Full-time
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Mechanical or Electrical Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Newark, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
18,CO-OP (Systems Engineer),$34k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

We currently have an opportunity for a Summer 2021 Co-op in the Medical Devices R&D Division to join a Systems Engineering team, providing solutions to technical problems associated with new or launched apheresis medical devices under the guidance and supervision of senior team members.

The position is located in our Lake Zurich, IL corporate office.

Responsibilities

Developing system- and subsystem-level requirements for medical devices that include mechanical/electrical hardware, software, disposables, and labeling.
Developing test methods to explore design options and challenge requirements.
Owning test execution, including making observations, analyzing data, and interpreting and documenting results.
Presenting data summaries and design options to other engineers and non-technical members of the development team.
Generating clear and detailed technical documentation.

Requirements:
Minimum two years of undergraduate classwork in an engineering field (biomedical or mechanical preferred). GPA of 3.0 or higher.
Available to work 3 terms which may include summers, as a Co-op.
Proficient in Word and Excel.
Strong technical, mathematical and laboratory skills, including trainability in Good Laboratory Practice (GLP) and handling of bio hazardous materials.
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including trainability in Good Documentation Practice (GDP) and requirements definition.
Working knowledge of data analysis and statistics preferred.
Excellent organizational and time management skills, as well as the ability to think and work independently.
Must be authorized to work in the United States; the Company will not sponsor work visas or other employment authorization.

Additional Information

We offer an excellent salary and benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, as well as life insurance, disability, 401K with company match, and wellness program.

Fresenius Kabi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disabilities, or protected veteran status.",3.5,"Fresenius Kabi
3.5","Lake Zurich, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
19,"JPSS Ground Systems Engineer, Senior Systems Engineer I",-1,"The Joint Polar Satellite System (JPSS) program is developing the next-generation weather satellite system and operating the current weather satellite constellation to provide decision quality weather data to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) and the nations weather data users. Raytheon is developing, deploying, and sustaining the JPSS Command, Control, and Communications Segment (C3S), the Interface Data Processing Segment (IDPS), and the Field Terminal Segment (FTS). For more information on JPSS, see: https://www.raytheon.com/capabilities/products/jpss

The Mission Support Team (MST) of Joint Polar Satellite System (JPSS) is seeking a Ground Systems Engineer to provide support to the JPSS Common Ground System (CGS) operated by Raytheon at the NOAA Satellite Operations Facility (NSOF) in Suitland, Maryland.

The Ground Systems Engineer will be responsible for understanding the entire system to include Space/Ground links, Spacecraft, Ground Station support equipment, Data transport systems, all ground software/hardware architecture and network interfaces, especially with the White Sands Tracking and Data Relay Satellite System (TDRSS). The GSE will be tasked by GSE Lead and report to the Engineering & Technical Support Lead.

Travel may be required inside and outside the Continental United States (5%).

Duties include, but are not limited to:
Develop and approve mission plans and procedure changes.
Direct technical interface, as-required, with satellite, sensor, and ground software factories.
Supporting member of Mission Support Team interface for System Test development/execution.
Participate in anomaly resolution teams.
Review all data on performance from the mission planner and analysts. Contribute to validation of the data. Track related Work Requests.
Perform all tasks from team leadership.
Lead anomaly resolution team when required.
Coordinate System Upgrade technical activities.
Ensure system resources are available to support all mission operations, training and maintenance activities.
Required:
Ability to pass a National Agency Check (NAC) in order to get a USG Common Access Card for access to the system at the satellite operations facility.

Desired Skills:
Experience and knowledge of complex, distributed ground systems to include satellite ground station equipment and procedures. This includes:
Experience and knowledge of complex, distributed ground systems to include satellite ground station equipment and procedures. This includes:
Network (LAN/WAN) architecture, protocols and equipment.
UNIX and Microsoft® Windows® 2000 domains.
Knowledge and experience with Ground System and Satellite Operations or I&T.
Software/system test and validation processes.
Standard Operations Procedures (SOP) development and validation.
Experience with Raytheon software systems (ECLIPSE , EQUINOX , ESC ) and science data processing systems are highly desired.
Minimum of four years experience with Satellite ground systems and supporting operations. Previous experience working at the NSOF, Suitland, MD.

Normal work hours are between 8am to 5pm. When required, various mission activities will require a flexible work schedule, sometimes during off-hours, weekends and possibly holidays depending on mission needs.

Required Education:

Degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math (STEM) and four (4) years relevant experience.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 169357

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Suitland, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
20,Sr. Ruby/RoR Software Engineer,$58k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Housecall Pro is headquartered in beautiful San Diego, CA and is open to candidates from San Diego, San Francisco or Denver, CO. We are currently fully distributed although excited to introduce a hybrid work model in the future that will allow for a combination of both distributed and in-office work!

At Housecall Pro, we are focused on making the lives of service professionals better by helping them to incorporate technology into their daily workflow. We are the operating system for service labor across the US and Canada.

We're looking for a Senior Software Engineer to work on advanced projects on our flagship Ruby/RoR application. You will be responsible for the development and refinement of new features across our product line. Your primary focus will be to work directly with the product management team to conceive, develop, and refine our core web applications and deliver outstanding experiences and value to our customers. You will work in an iterative, data driven environment to refine the application. Your leadership skills will be important in mentoring junior teammates and conducting rigorous code reviews across the teams you work with. A strong commitment to collaborative problem solving, sophisticated design, and the creation of quality products is essential. Your customer-centric focus is critical for our and our customers' success.

Our Engineering team is extraordinary. We're a hardworking and focused team driven to deliver industry-leading apps to our service professional customers. Our success is their success. Our team of entrepreneurial, enthusiastic and client-focused team members are the ""engine room"" of Housecall Pro, helping our customers operate and grow their businesses.

Responsibilities:

Design, develop and deploy features for Housecall Pro's core Ruby/RoR applications
Ensure the performance, quality, and responsiveness of applications
Work with product management to refine initial concepts features that deliver customer delight
Build and execute a high velocity of smart, highly performant server side A/B tests to increase business metrics
Stay up to date with new Growth and Personalization tools
Identify and correct bottlenecks and fix bugs
Develop and maintain code quality standards and enforce them across the team
Continually introduce architectural improvements and refactorings to the code baseline
Write automated tests at the appropriate architectural level
Conduct code reviews and architectural reviews for features developed by other members of the team
Lead feature teams in their weekly iterations
Maintain and improve our continuous integration and development environments

Core Qualifications:

Ability to work at a fast pace with a drive to quickly deliver value to our customers
BS, MS or Ph.D in a computer science / computer engineering program
3-10 years industry experience developing commercial Ruby/RoR applications
1-2 years experience leading teams and performing code reviews
Advanced knowledge of Ruby/RoR
Data Driven
Attention to detail and an eye for design
Familiarity with ReSTful APIs used to connect our Android, iOS, and Javascript applications to the web application
Experience with performance and memory tuning with tools
Proficient understanding of Git
Strong proficiency with continuous integration/continuous deployment
Experience with Kotlin a plus
Experience with Swift a plus
Experience with Javascript/React a plus
Experience with MaterialUI a plus

Why Housecall Pro

Housecall Pro is a mission-driven company. Our co-founder/President built a software company to help service professionals like his father (a house painter), get to a better life.
We save our service professional time, and help them, in turn, to delight their end-customers.
We are tackling the last, large market ($700b+) untouched by technology and unencumbered by a dominant competitor.
Our goal is to build a $10 billion+ company that is a powerful brand to home service providers and consumers
We have fun at work. Really.
We have a N.A.P. (No Acronym Policy) so we all speak the same language.
Competitive compensation and benefits (medical, dental, vision, life, disability, employee assistance program, 401K)
We strive for true inclusion and belonging and want our passionate employees to bring their whole selves to work. Housecall employees have created groups to make the world better such as Housecall Pride (LGBTQIA+), We Stand Together (equality) and Women of Housecall.
Equity in a growth stage startup backed by top-tier VCs
Paid holidays and self-managed (unlimited) paid time off

Housecall Pro celebrates diversity and we are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees to include equal treatment and opportunity in all aspects of recruitment, selection, and employment without regard to gender, race, religion, national origin, ethnicity, disability, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, veteran or military status, or any other category protected under the law. Housecall Pro is an equal opportunity employer; committed to an environment free from discrimination, harassment, and retaliation.",4.6,"Housecall Pro
4.6","San Diego, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,Data Engineer,Employer Provided Salary:$45-$55 Per Hour,"StarsHR has the following contract opportunity available with our client in St. Louis.

Data Engineer

Required
5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
Expert level proficiency in SQL.
Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.) • 5+ years experience with developing ETL/Data Pipeline solutions.
Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing
Desired:
Experience developing and utilizing Data Lakes.
Experience with data privacy concerns
Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
Experience contributing to open source projects
• Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create",4.6,"StarsHR
4.6","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
22,Sr Systems Engineer - Platform Integration - Air Operations Centers,-1,"Platform Infrastructure - Early Warning and Defense Operations Systems Department

One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System Design & Architecture Directorate is the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The more than 2,100 employees provide requirements definition and design at the system, subsystem and component level every day in a collaborative environment which is characterized by respect for the individual, problem solving in a team setting, consensus oriented solutions, and results based recognition. Supporting this mission are teams providing domain expertise and creative solutions in surveillance, naval and missile defense based radar system design, sonar and undersea sensor system design, integrated air and missile defense systems engineering, command and control/battle management system design, combat system and platform architecture design and integration, software intensive system engineering, cyber solutions and algorithm development for signal processing, tracking and discrimination systems. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of achieving excellence through thought and team work while leveraging individual diversity conducive to a flexible work schedule and environment.
Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

The Early Warning and Defense Operations Systems (EWDOS) Department supports RMD by providing world class Sensor and Weapon Systems Engineering. Domain Expertise includes Situational Awareness, Network Design, Battle Management, Battlespace Integration and Interoperability Command and Control, Communications, for Domestic and International customers.
The EWDOS Department is looking for talented senior systems engineer with the technical expertise and engineering leadership skills to join a team of engineers that designs and develops world-class Sensor and Weapon systems in our Tewksbury and Andover, MA, locations

Job Description:

Required Skills:
Minimum of 4 years of experience in the field of engineering or related technical discipline
Knowledge of the infrastructure design and implementation of complex systems involving network, OS and COTS configuration in a cyber-hardened environment
Experience with IT and/or network and system administration including OS configuration
Experience working in a small team environment with strong interpersonal skills and teamwork
Proven technical analysis data analysis, troubleshooting, identifying root cause and problem solving skills
Proven ability to develop, document, and maintain processes, methods and tools
Proven ability to clearly articulate complex technical concepts both verbally and in writing
DOD Clearance, or the ability to obtain within 1 year from date of hire
Desired Skills:
Experience with operating system configuration for Windows, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and VMWare
Experience with information security tools including: anti-virus, Vulnerability Assessment, HIDS/NIDS, host-based or endpoint security solutions, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), and Security Incident and Event Management (SIEM) and centralized auditing tools
Experience with automation tools to support a continuous delivery pipeline
Experience with scripting in Python, Ruby or Powershell
Experience with Microsoft Active Directory, Windows Group Policy Objects and identify and access management best practices
Experience with security features and/or vulnerability analysis of various operating systems as defined by Intelligence agencies, NIST, DISA (STIGs) and USCYBERCOM
Knowledge complex command and control systems involving multiple sensors and effectors
Knowledge of Link-16 networking and interfaces
Experience with Juniper systems
Experience with hyper converged platforms
Proven ability to interface with customers and lead technical solutions to complex User requirements
Experience with Matlab modeling and analysis
Required Education:Bachelor of Science degree in an Engineering discipline

Keywords: systems, engineer, converged, network, Juniper, STIG, link-16
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

Raytheon Technologies has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization. 170004

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
23,Full Stack Java / Angular Software Engineer,-1,"We are seeking a full stack software engineer with 3+ years of Java / Angular professional programming experience in building high-performance, scalable, enterprise-grade applications. The right candidate must be a self-starter, and demonstrate excellent problem-solving skills. The roles and responsibilities of a Java / Angular developer include developing Java / Angular applications in full software development lifecycle, from design and development to testing. You will be working with our talented engineers in delivering high-volume business applications for mission-critical enterprise systems.
Responsibilities*
Learn and implement company’s existing mobile framework
Support the entire application lifecycle (concept, design, test, release and support)
Write well designed, testable, efficient code
Discover, evaluate, and utilize new technologies within the mobile landscape
Ensure designs and deliverables are in compliance with specifications
Build new features end-to-end through prototyping, validation, implementation, launch, and further iteration
Support continuous product improvements by researching alternative approaches or technologies
Troubleshoot and debug errors, and deliver quality code with attention to details
Requirements*
Self-Starter, self-managing with strong initiative, and a team player with an Entrepreneurial Attitude as well as attention to detail
At least 3 years of experience working with object-oriented programming languages
At least 3 years of working experience in Java / Angular development
Possess knowledge of web technologies (TypeScript, JavaScript, Angular, CSS, JQuery, or ASP.NET)
Must have work experience in Relational Databases (SQL Server and Oracle)
Excellent knowledge of in-memory data structures and key-value databases.
Able to learn new technologies on own without formal training
Experience with Kendo UI is a plus
Working knowledge with Amazon AWS, specifically with EC2, EBS and S3 is a plus
Experience working in Linux environments
Must be professional and have the ability to write functional definition documents
Education Required*
BS or MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related field (mathematics, EE)

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Java/Angular Development: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.interprosoft.com",3.8,"InterPro Solutions
3.8","Stoneham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
24,Sr Systems Engineer II - Systems Integrator,-1,"Are you a Systems Integrator who wants to be Hands On Hardware and test missile products?

Do you intentionally work toward getting the job done instead of doing the job?

The Weapons & Platforms Center (W&PC) within the Systems Integration and Test Directorate is seeking candidates for the position of Sr. Systems Engineer II to perform the role of Systems Integrator Engineer for development and production programs. The selected candidate may lead and/or contribute to support test planning, integration, testing, and analysis. Candidate should have experience in Hardware Integration of missile systems, to lead technically diverse teams and drive RF/EO Technology of missile systems to produce data stream outputs with high fidelity for advanced multi-sensor waveforms and key interfaces for product integration and field qualification and requirement verification. These include oversight at development gate reviews, Consent to Ship (CTS), Test Readiness Reviews (TRRs) and other events, which ensure the integrity of the design, integration, verification and test processes. The candidate is responsible for integration and test execution, which result in successful completion of test events at all levels of system integration including lab, system verification and qualification and associated analysis of test data.

U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.

Job Description:

The position is located in Tucson Arizona with responsibilities for integration, verification and field qualification test activities including the following:

The candidate will be part of integration and/or field test teams with skills in missile builds, qualification testing, design verification testing, hardware system integration and data analysis. May participate in the development of test objectives collaboratively with Hardware in the Loop / Computer in the Loop Systems leads. May be required to provide programmatic coordination and technical oversight in a lab/field setting to drive test equipment integration for testing and troubleshooting. The hardware systems under test, entail the build, test and integration, including review and analysis data elements to provide detailed reports of results. Should test failures occur, perform root cause and corrective action analysis as required. Accountable for pedigree control and completeness of all documentation that includes the creation and presentation of Consent to Ship (CTS) and Test Readiness Review (TRR) Packages. Able to support field testing and occasional travel for durations typically one to two week durations. Support leadership with providing proposal support including of Basis of Estimates (BOEs) for integration and field Qualification test support requests from customers. Champion respect, ethics and diversity initiatives within the organization.

Required Education, Skills, and Experience:

U.S. Citizenship required

B.S. in Electrical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Systems Engineering, Physics, Math or other related engineering discipline. Six (6) years of technical/engineering experience in a test environment with emphasis in test planning and/or execution.

Must have experience with 4 or more of the following areas:
Hardware Systems Integration
Platform Integration/Flight Test
Field test support activities
Telemetry Analysis
Experience developing and evaluating requirements
Understanding and working knowledge of troubleshooting and failure process
Advanced understanding and use of lab/field test equipment
Experience with Verification and Validation methods and associated activities
Experience creating integration and verification strategies to support efficiency improvements
Other Requirements:

Must be willing to relocate to Tucson, AZ (relocation package available)
Strongly prefer an existing Secret Department of Defense (DoD) Clearance (will need ability to obtain access to proprietary programs)

Desired Skills:
Experience developing and evaluating requirements
Understanding and working knowledge of troubleshooting and failure process
Advanced understanding and use of lab/field test equipment
Demonstrate strong analytical and problem solving skills
Able to perform successfully in an environment with frequent and direct interaction with customers and peers
Able to work well in diverse teams and the ability to multi-task
Customer oriented and results driven
Excellent communication (oral and written) skills
Experience in RF/EO integration of hardware systems with high level of understanding of digital signal processing algorithms, advanced waveforms, antenna patterns, and techniques used in resource-constrained missile systems
Demonstrated understanding of RF spectral and temporal effects for sensor and backgrounds, including clutter, multipath, self-interference, grounding and shielding, and mitigation factors
Demonstrated experience in integrating RF/EO sensor output, either modulated waveforms or streams of digital samples used for real-time representation of RF/EO scenes data collection / analysis (including Telemetry)
Test Systems design experience and collaborating across multiple engineering disciplines, such as electrical, electronics, mechanical, software, and computer engineering
Experience in integration with test equipment, telemetry data analysis tools, and missile systems host platforms
Technical leadership with capture/pursuit experience, including contribution or authoring of white papers, RFI responses, proposal of technical volumes, or related experience
Demonstrated experience managing and presenting technical data to Stakeholders and Customer community, in design reviews and technical interchange meetings
Understanding and working knowledge of troubleshooting and failure process
Advanced understanding and use of lab/field test equipment
This position requires the successful issuance, transfer or maintenance of any clearances and/or accesses necessary for the position. Non-US citizens may not be eligible to obtain a security clearance. The Defense Industrial Security Clearance Office (DISCO), an agency of the Department of Defense, handles and adjudicates the security clearance process. Security clearance factors include, but are not limited to, allegiance to the US, foreign influence, foreign preference, criminal conduct, security violations and drug involvement. Additional detail regarding security clearance factors can be obtained by accessing the DISCO website at: https://www.state.gov/security-clearances

167939

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tucson, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
25,Tier 3 Full Stack Software Engineer,$91k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"We shape the future of intralogistics with robotic, data-driven and flexible automated solutions that achieve exceptional value for our customers. Swisslog helps forward-thinking companies optimize the performance of their warehouses and distribution centers with future-ready automation systems and software. Our integrated offering includes consulting, system design and implementation, and lifetime customer support in more than 50 countries. Swisslog is a member of the KUKA Group, a leading global supplier of intelligent automation solutions with more than 14,000 employees worldwide.

Swisslog designs, develops and delivers best-in-class automation solutions for forward-thinking hospitals, warehouses and distribution centers. We offer integrated systems and services from a single source – from consulting to design, implementation and lifetime customer service. Behind the company’s success are 2 300 employees worldwide, supporting customers in more than 50 countries.
The Healthcare Solutions portfolio comprises automated material handling and drug management systems for hospital facilities that increase efficiency and enhance the
patient experience in forward-thinking hospitals. Swisslog automated material handling solutions provide quick, flexible and safe transportation of medications, specimens and basic
supplies throughout hospitals and across medical center campuses, while its medication management solutions address packaging, labeling, storage and dispensing for inpatient and
outpatient pharmacies.

Tier 3 Full Stack Software Engineer

Location: Westminster, CO

As a Tier 3 Software Engineer you will be working on a key software product and primarily helping to enhance our customers' experience. You will work closely with and support, realization and software engineers to troubleshoot and solve difficult problems for our customers. This will involve experience navigating complex legacy software with multiple components. You will contribute to the software design and effectively address problems of systems integration and compatibility.

YOUR TASKS:

Core Skills:
Provide 2nd and 3rd level support as a primary duty
Design and develop high-volume, low-latency applications for mission-critical systems and deliver high-availability and performance
Contribute in all phases of the development lifecycle
Write well designed, testable, efficient code
Ensure designs are in compliance with specifications
Prepare and produce releases of software components
Support continuous improvement by investigating alternatives and technologies and presenting these for architectural review
Collaborate with a team of software engineers and assist less experienced members of the team
Follow and foster agile methods in software development as defined by the organization
Maintain an awareness of new technologies and their applicability to improving the framework and business
Responsible for the delivery of an entire software project or part of a project, including design, implementation, testing, integration (in-house) and documentation
Monitor, track and communicate project status
Develop and test software in accordance with requirements, test cases and design documentation
Guarantee the compliances of the QA rules and guidelines
Document developed software applications and tools
Technical Knowledge:
Object-oriented analysis and design.
Enterprise software development.
Experience with Agile software development tools and methodologies – Confluence, Jira.
Demonstrated competence in designing, implementing and delivering high performance and complex Java EE solutions.
Technologies: Java 7, J2EE, Servlets, EJB, Spring, Spring Boot 2.0, Hibernate, JavaScript, JMS, Annotations, EclipseLink, Primefaces JSF, jUnit, Mokito, Power Mokito, XML, Keycloak, log4j, RegEx
Webservices: POI, Flyway, Selenium.Server: Apache Httpd, Weblogic 12.x Experience with Spring
Frontend: Angular, HTML, CSS.
Database: Knowledge of SQL server 2012 relational and document-oriented database design, programming knowledge (JDBC, SQL, XML, JMS) and performance tuning.
Build tools: Ant, Maven, and Gradle
Operating systems: Primarily Windows, some Linux development experience
Continuous integration tools: Jenkins, Sonar, Team City
Experience with SOA, micro-services, ELK-stack, Kafka, Zookeeper, graph-databases, real-time data processing
Customer focus:
Has extensive experience in supporting customers and troubleshooting difficult customer code related problems.
Customer service-oriented attitude, top-notch time management, and quality driven designs
Respond to internal customers promptly and competently
Work with Realization and Product Management on Customer Software Solutions
Deliver standard, easy to deploy and configure Customer Software Solutions
Proactively work to develop and maintain good working relationships within the department, company, and customers

YOUR PROFILE:

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's or Master's degree in computer science or related field
At least 10+ years relevant work experience and track record in Software Development
Strong Java (SE, EE) Skills
Enterprise frameworks: JPA, JMS, Web Services, Spring, Spring Boot
SQL programming
Understanding of Relational database concepts, architecture and SQL programming
Excellent skills in problem solving and communication
Designed, delivered and managed Java EE and Spring projects
Deep knowledge of application integration and UI design
Ability to lead projects and manage projects
Experience in a commercial software development environment
Knowledge in OO-Design and JAVA architectures
Software design and development experience with web-based user interfaces
Good SQL Server database design and programming knowledge (JDBC, SQL)
Multi-year / multi-project experience
Desirable but not Essential:
Experience in the field of inventory management systems, supply chain or logistics, medical or health care software

WE OFFER

Swisslog offers challenging work in a globally networked environment as well as competitive base salary, comprehensive benefits including health/dental and above-market 401K!

OUR SOLUTIONS DELIVER RESULTS. OUR EMPLOYEES DELIVER SOLUTIONS.

Swisslog is an EEO Employer, Females/Minority/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity

Swisslog’s FMLA policy can be found at:
http://www.dol.gov/whd/regs/compliance/posters/fmlaen.pdf

Federal law requires employers to provide reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you require reasonable accommodation to complete the application or to perform your job, please contact Human Resources at jobs.healthcare.us@swisslog.com.

Contact
Andy Levine
Talent Acquisition Manager",3.5,"Swisslog Healthcare
3.5","Westminster, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1915,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
26,Senior Health Data Analyst I,$74k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
27,Validation Project Engineer,-1,"Validation Project Engineer*
UPM Pharmaceuticals, Inc., (www.upm-inc.com), a contract drug development and manufacturing company for the pharmaceutical industry, located in Bristol, Tennessee, is seeking a Validation Project Engineer.

Responsible for all aspects of validation project work associated with equipment, facility and utility qualifications to ensure compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practices and UPM’s quality requirements. Provides or reviews rationale and justification supporting validation methodology and approach. Responsible for validation project planning, project management, process/equipment modification evaluations and interacting with third party supplier and/or customers. Responsible for familiarity with specified equipment in order to comprehensively explain its function and design and assist in troubleshooting. Develops and reviews documentation such as validation protocols, change controls, SOPs, risk assessments, annual product reviews, etc. as needed.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Evaluate equipment/systems to design testing and validation studies to ensure consistency of data production and compliance with manufacturer and UPM specifications, with cGMPs, with national standards and with company policies and procedures.
Write, execute, review and summarize Installation, Operation and Performance Qualific
ations (IQ/OQ/PQ) for new and existing equipment, systems and utilities. Determine process capability of new equipment.
Perform requalification of equipment, systems and utilities as required.
Identify deviations encountered during protocol execution, write deviation reports and help develop appropriate resolution.
Assist in developing, planning and executing Validation Project Plans.
Work closely with Operations, QA and Facilities staff to plan validation activities.
Adhere to department and project deadlines, expectations and priorities while developing realistic goals for timely completion of projects. Maintain validation project timeline(s) and status.
Participate in compliance audits as needed. Develop and complete corrective actions as assigned.
Participate in evaluating and recommending new equipment or process changes.
Provide technical assistance to troubleshoot equipment or process problems and design testing to determine possible causes or solutions.
Assess, evaluate and perform testing necessary to close out change controls in a timely manner.
Develop departmental standard operating procedures and facilitate the development of operating procedures for new equipment.
Support process and cleaning validation as needed.
Education/Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree in a science/engineering related field and at least six years of pharmaceutical validation experience in a GMP environment, or equivalent combination of education and experience.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Experience:
Pharmaceutical Validation: 6 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"UPM Pharmaceuticals
4.2",Bristol,-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
28,LabVIEW Developer/Architect (Control & Data Acquisition Engineer),$70k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Your Opportunity: *
As a LabVIEW developer/architect (controls and data acquisition engineer) you will work with Los Alamos National Laboratory (LANL) in delivering a new National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) flash X-ray radiography capability at the Nevada National Security Site (NNSS) for the Advanced Sources and Detectors Project (ASD). This radiography capability is a multi-pulse linear induction accelerator, Scorpius, to be commissioned at the NNSSs U1a Complex by 2024. A national project team comprised of personnel from LANL, Sandia National Laboratory (SNL), Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory (LLNL), and Nevada National Security Site (NNSS), as well as academic and industrial partners, will research, design, build, install, and commission Scorpius to fulfill the Department of Energy (DOE) National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA) subcritical experiment program mission needs. The LANL ASD Technical Development office (ASD-TECH) is responsible for coordinating and executing these activities.

You will be working with the technical leads for various Scorpius systems to support the design and development of instrumentation and control systems, process control systems, and data acquisition systems. You will also assist with the design and documentation of key elements such as the control room layout, network layout, controls schematics while working collaboratively with a large team of scientists, vendors, and engineers to provide instrumentation and controls systems and data acquisition systems for various Scorpius systems. Your work will have a signification impact on our nations safety and security.
What You will Do: *
Develop instrumentation and controls software utilizing LabVIEW when possible to automate operation of process controls equipment and accelerator components.

Assist with design and testing of a virtual Scorpius software emulator.

Design and develop instrumentation and controls, and data acquisition systems for the downstream transport, detector and global controls systems while working under the direct supervision of a Lead Controls Engineer.

Develop and revise design drawings and instrumentation and controls schematics using Autocad or Autocad Electrical.

Assist with design and layout drawings and schematics for various systems within Scorpius project.

Involvement with vendor and SMEs in acquiring requirements and design of control software to be developed and integrated into the overall global control system for Scorpius.

Produce materials for technical reports, documents, presentations, and concept papers.

Partner with multiple engineering disciplines to accomplish the work.
What You Will Need: *
Certified LabVIEW Developer or LabVIEW Architect.

10 years of experience with NI LabVIEW and in the design and implementation of signal conditioning electronics, analog and digital I/O, and software development.

Bachelors degree in engineering (Electrical, Mechanical, or Chemical preferred) or equivalent work experience.

Experience with Ethernet industrial communications, RS485 and RS232 communications.

Experience and knowledge of equipment rack design, power supplies, and electrical power distribution.

Experiences with NI hardware platforms including CompactRIO, CompactDAQ, and/or PXI.

Experience with the design and development of Data Acquisition hardware such as NI hardware, LabVIEW PXI chassis, various interface cards, oscilloscopes, and digital multi-meters.

Experience with LabVIEW development to include custom drivers for various equipment, FPGA development and troubleshooting.

Able to define, design, develop, test, debug, and maintain LabVIEW code for machine control software.

Proficient with AutoCAD or AutoCAD electrical.

Excellent verbal, interpersonal, and written communication skills.

Motivated self-starter with strong attention to detail and ability to work independently.

Accelerator experience is preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity: *
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status and any other protected class under state or federal law.
What We Offer: *
We know benefits are important to you. Therefore, we offer an array of excellent benefits including medical, dental, and vision insurance, generous paid time off policy, and 401(k) employer contribution. Furthermore, you will have access to a health savings plan, flexible spending plan, and superior paid holidays offering.

TechSource has been providing superior science and engineering consulting services to a multitude of government clients for over twenty years in several locations across the United States. We are passionate about our people because we know our people are what drives our success. We believe that trust is the key to our relationships with our clients, our communities, and our people. We pride ourselves on our honesty, our ethical behavior, and our open and straightforward communication. Integrity is at the core of everything that we do.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
LabVIEW: 10 years (Required)
instrumentation and controls: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://techsource-inc.com/about/careers
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.5,"TechSource, Inc.
4.5","Los Alamos, NM",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
29,Fusion Software Engineer (mid/senior),$59k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Team

The Fusion team is responsible for developing perception algorithms to detect and identify objects for Torc's autonomous driving systems, allowing the system to understand and react to the environment around the vehicle in real-time. Our algorithms utilize 3D point cloud data from LiDAR and objects detected in radar returns. The team also implements the sensor fusion algorithms that combine this data and provide probabilistic state estimation.

We work closely with other engineering teams in behavior and motion planning to create innovative solutions for our Level 4 autonomous system.

About the Role:

Torc's perception team is looking for experienced software developers to assist in the development of production quality sensor fusion algorithms. In this position you will develop algorithms that use sensor data from LiDAR, RADAR, and cameras to detect, classify, segment and predict obstacles in the vehicle's surrounding environment.

Responsibilities:
Develop production ready, reliable software for deployment on automated vehicles
Implement sensor fusion algorithms to predict and measure objects from multiple sensors
Process and analyze data from LiDAR, RADAR, and cameras to asses performance of existing algorithms
Optimize and improve upon existing algorithms
Work with a winning team of robotics engineers and software developers to advance cutting edge technology
Qualifications:
Expertise in Kalman filters, sensor fusion, state estimation
3+ years of experience with inertial navigation systems and vehicle coordinate frames
3+ years of experience with software and algorithm optimization and multithreading
Familiarity with production quality software deployment and testing
3+ years of Experience in C++ programming skills
Advanced degree/Masters in Robotics, Computer, or Electrical Engineering, or related technical field
Strong problem-solving skills and ability to troubleshoot complex software and hardware systems
Unit and regression testing experience
Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:
Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees
Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance
401K plan with employer matching
Annual learning and development stipend
Leadership development training
Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment
Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
30,Linux Engineer - Senior,$68k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Role:

We are seeking an experienced Linux Engineer to support the integration and deployment of autonomous software to vehicles operating all over the world. You will be responsible for working closely with engineers to drive the technical road map of infrastructure operations that supports both internal development and remote fleet management.

Responsibilities:
Contributing to the design of innovative solutions for all aspects of software build, deploy and test processes.
Working with cross-functional teams to develop best practices for configuration and release management.
Designing and implementing systems responsible for data acquisition and analysis from remote vehicles in the field.
Proactively identifying more efficient solutions for integrating software with complex hardware components, through on-vehicle troubleshooting and log analysis.
Competencies:
Expert-level knowledge of Linux platforms
Proficiency with networking fundamentals and troubleshooting methods
Continuous integration/Continuous delivery concepts and tools
Management of technical infrastructure (bare metal and cloud-based)
Agile methodologies (Scrum, Kanban)
Containerization and virtualization (Docker, Kubernetes)
Familiarity with C/C++, Python, shell scripting
Troubleshooting skills (real-time and in-depth analysis)
Performance metrics and analysis
Test automation principles and design
Qualifications:
Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related technical field
4 or more years of relevant industry experience
Has appropriate certifications-Red Hat Certified Engineer (RHCE) or Red Hat Certified System Administrator (RHCSA)
Perks of Being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:
Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees
Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance
401K plan with employer matching
Annual learning and development stipend
Leadership development training
Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment
Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
31,Sr Integration and Test Responsible System Engineer II,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

We are seeking a Systems Engineering Center (SEC) EO/IR Payload Integration and Test Lead Systems (LSE) Engineer within the Space Systems (SS) Mission Area of Raytheon Technologies Intelligence and Space business. The LSE will help drive the successful execution of the team on an Electro-Optical/Infrared (EO/IR) Payload Program.

Responsibilities include interfacing with cross-functional product teams, sub-contractors program management, and functional managers as well as non-engineering organizations such as finance, operations, supply chain, contracts and mission assurance.

The I&T System Engineer will:
• Plan, coordinate, execute and communicate the test activities with the cross-functional team responsible for delivering an EO/IR earth imaging system, subsystems, products and services as directed by the Program Manager.
• Ensure the system engineering objectives are achieved on schedule, and consistent with quality and technical standards while meeting the program cost targets. Foster culture in-line with high performance and cohesive teams necessary to meet these targets.
• Share oversight of execution on all aspects of the design, development, integration, and test of the SEC IPT space work products
• Work alongside the Chief Engineer and IPTL to manage the SEC payload and subsystems.
• Have extensive knowledge of EO/IR applied to space systems and FPAs, due to the complexity of the technology development, and integration and test planning and experience to achieve the technical performance and objectives of the program.
• Provide technical support to the entire EO/IR product life cycle development activities, including: requirements analysis, validation and verification; hardware and software design and development; system level integration, interface definition; test planning; operations development.

Required Skills:
• 6+ years engineering experience with at least 4 years working space hardware.
• Experience supporting an EO/IR imaging space project testing
• Experience in developing and executing system level interface, integration and test plans for space projects
• Experience with the requirements development and flow down process as applied to test.
• Experience with the technical reviews (PDR, CDR etc)
• Experience with system or subsystem level Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V)
• Experience establishing and maintaining working relationship with all levels of the organization, including customers, users, and other peer groups
• U.S. Citizenship status is required
• A DOD Secret Clearance

Desired Skills:
• Ability to carry out design of spacecraft subsystems
• Experience with Opto-Mechanics
• Familiarity with Integration and Test of space hardware activities such as radiometric, thermal, vibration and EMI testing
• Knowledge of environmental test methods and practices (e.g. Dynamic, Vibration, EMI, TVAC)
• Knowledge of EO/IR STE design, testing or operation
• Working with operations staff, sub-contractors, team members and customers
• Experience with SEIT tools such as STK, MATLAB, C++, and/or Python

Required Education:
Bachelors degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related STEM degree

Desired Education:
Advanced degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related discipline.

#ideasinorbit
#Space2020
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
165825

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
32,Software Engineer - Data,$104k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Mixpanel

At Mixpanel, our mission is to increase the rate of innovation. Not only as a company but for the businesses we serve. Through our analytics platform, companies can analyze how and why their users engage, convert, and retain in real-time across web, mobile, and smart devices. Then they can use that data to improve their business and products.

Mixpanel serves over 26,000 companies from different industries around the world, including Twitter, Expedia, and Ancestry. Headquartered in San Francisco, Mixpanel has offices in New York, Seattle, Austin, London, Barcelona, and Singapore.

About the team:

The Data Engineering team's mission is to make the decision making process at Mixpanel as data-informed as possible. The team is responsible for the overall health and accuracy of the company's key metrics. It owns the systems that collect, enrich, load, and transform data to provide employees at the company with insight into multiple dimensions of the business. This team also owns tooling and frameworks that aim to make it easier to share knowledge about the data and facilitate collaborative analysis.

About the role:

As a founding member of the Data Engineering team, you will be responsible for building, automating, and maintaining data collection and analysis tools to run our internal operations. You will work closely with partners within Mixpanel to understand their data needs and deliver solutions. Because a lot of our customers are also likely to require the same kind of solutions that we need internally at Mixpanel, you'll have the unique opportunity to influence our product offerings through your work.

Responsibilities
Own the implementation and measurement of the company's key metrics
Work with internal product and engineering teams to implement rich data collection for internal use
Build and maintain ETL jobs for centralizing data into our Google Cloud data lake
Build and maintain tools to automate data modeling and data quality checks
Work with internal partners including Executive Team, Marketing, Business Operations, Customer Support, Finance, Growth, and others to assist with their data needs
Put in place tooling and frameworks to facilitate data governance and shared analysis between internal organizations
We're Looking For Someone Who Has
4+ years of experience building and managing data collection pipelines
A software generalist who is comfortable working across the full stack
You'll work with at least one of these languages Javascript, Python or Go
Familiarity with cloud and warehousing technologies
Nice To Haves
We run in Google Cloud and rely heavily on BigQuery, Cloud Storage and our internal ETL frameworks to automate tasks
Great communication and interpersonal skills
Individuals who are motivated by enabling and helping others within the company be data driven
Benefits and Perks
Competitive Medical, Vision, and Dental Care and 401(K)
Wellness Reimbursement
Generous vacation policy
Company wide holiday shut down
Volunteer time off
Culture Values
Be Open: When knowledge becomes open, we can come together as a team to collaborate around a shared purpose
Customer Focus: Our customers' success is our success
Lead Change: Everyone at Mixpanel has the capacity to make an impact on the business
Results Oriented: Driving results in a measurable way ensures we stay focused on the highest impact initiatives
One Team: We can't win without each other
Why choose Mixpanel?

A clear market leader in the product analytics space, Mixpanel has raised $77M from world-renowned VC firms like Andreessen-Horowitz, Sequoia, and YC, and our revenue has grown significantly since then. Our ambitious, collaborative team makes it possible by finding creative solutions to new challenges with scaling, reliability, design, and customer service.

Mixpanel is an equal opportunity employer supporting workforce diversity. We actively encourage women, people with disabilities, veterans, underrepresented minorities, and LGBTQ+ people to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status. Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

#LI-RT1",3.7,"Mixpanel
3.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
33,Big Data Engineer,-1,"Big Data Lead Developer*
Our growing organization is seeking a skilled professional to serve as an internal resource for our specialized focus in the field of Big Data/Hadoop Development. We provide Fortune 500 clients throughout the United States with IT consultants in a wide-ranging technical sphere.

In order to fully maintain our incoming nationwide and international hires, we will be hiring a *Big Data Lead Developer* for our Atlanta, GA (US) headquarters to coach/mentor our incoming classes of consultants. If you have a strong passion for the various Big Data platforms and are looking to join a seasoned team of IT professionals, this could be an advantageous next step.

This is a full-time internal position that *requires relocation* to Atlanta. No travel required after relocation. The Big Data/Hadoop SME will take on the following responsibilities:
Interviewing potential consultants to ensure all onboarding employees will be successful in Big Data domains prior to each onboarding
The design, development and maintenance of our best-in-class Big Data/Hadoop development training materials
Training, guiding and mentoring junior to mid-level developers
Preparing mock interview situations to enhance the esteemed learning process provided by the company
Acting as a primary resource for individuals working on a variety of projects throughout the US
Interacting with our Executive and Sales team to ensure that projects and employees are appropriately matched
Prepping consultants for interviews for specific assignments involving development and implementation of Hadoop and other environments
The ideal candidate will not only possess a solid knowledge of Big Data infrastructures, but must also have a fluency in the following areas (allowing for fluid interactions with other team members scattered across the entry to senior level spectrum):
Hadoop development and implementation
Strong in Object Oriented Development in Scala/Java platform
Hands on experience in big data technologies including Scala or Spark, Hadoop, Hive, HDFS.
Strong SQL skills and experience
Designing, building, installing, configuring and supporting Big Data Clusters Spark/Kafka
Translate complex functional and technical requirements into detail design Implementing ETL process for integration of data from disparate sources
Cloud Experience is a plus
Skills Include:
5+ Years of professional experience in the IT Industry
Bachelor’s Degree in the Computer Science field
Good knowledge in back-end programming, specifically Java/Scala
Good knowledge of database structures, theories, principles and practices
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven understanding with Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Hive, and HBase
Good aptitude in multi-threading and concurrency concepts
Able to work in Atlanta, Georgia
Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Experience:
Big Data: 5 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Enhance IT
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
34,Sr Integration and Test Responsible System Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

We are seeking a Systems Engineering Center (SEC) EO/IR Payload Integration and Test Responsible Systems (RSE) Engineer within the Space Systems (SS) Mission Area of Raytheon Technologies Intelligence and Space business. The RSE will help drive the successful execution of the team on an Electro-Optical/Infrared (EO/IR) Payload Program.

Responsibilities include interfacing with cross-functional product teams, sub-contractors program management, and functional managers as well as non-engineering organizations such as finance, operations, supply chain, contracts and mission assurance.

The I&T System Engineer will:
• Plan, coordinate, execute and communicate the test activities with the cross-functional team responsible for delivering an EO/IR earth imaging system, subsystems, products and services as directed by the Program Manager.
• Ensure the system engineering objectives are achieved on schedule, and consistent with quality and technical standards while meeting the program cost targets. Foster culture in-line with high performance and cohesive teams necessary to meet these targets.
• Share oversight of execution on all aspects of the design, development, integration, and test of the SEC IPT space work products.
• Work alongside the Chief Engineer and IPTL to manage the SEC payload and subsystems.
• Have knowledge of EO/IR applied to space systems, due to the complexity of the technology development, and integration and test planning and experience to achieve the technical performance and objectives of the program.
• Provide technical support to the entire EO/IR product life cycle development activities, including: requirements analysis, validation and verification; hardware and software design and development; system level integration, interface definition; test planning; operations development.

Required Skills:
• 4+ years engineering experience with at least 2 years working space hardware.
• Experience supporting EO/IR imaging space project testing
• Experience in developing and executing system level interface, integration and test plans
• Experience with the requirements development and flow down process as applied to test
• Experience with the technical reviews (PDR, CDR etc)
• Experience with system or subsystem level Integration, Verification and Validation (IV&V)
• Experience establishing and maintaining working relationship with all levels of the organization, including customers, users, and other peer groups
• U.S. Citizenship status is required
• A DOD Secret Clearance

Desired Skills:
• Ability to carry out design of spacecraft subsystems
• Familiarity with Opto-Mechanics
• Familiarity with Integration and Test of space hardware activities such as radiometric, thermal, vibration and EMI testing
• Knowledge of environmental test methods and practices (e.g. Dynamic, Vibration, EMI, TVAC)
• Familiarity with EO/IR STE design, testing or operation
• Working with operations staff, sub-contractors, team members and customers
• Experience with SEIT tools such as STK, MATLAB, C++, and/or Python

Required Education:
Bachelors degree in Engineering, Math, Science or related STEM degree

Desired Education:
Advanced degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related discipline.
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#ideasinorbit
#Space2020

165826

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
35,ATE and AXI Test Engineer,$36k-$58k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sanmina Corporation (Nasdaq: SANM) is a leading integrated manufacturing solutions provider serving the fastest-growing segments of the global Electronics Manufacturing Services (EMS) market. Recognized as a technology leader, Sanmina Corporation provides end-to-end manufacturing solutions, delivering superior quality and support to Original Equipment Manufacturers (OEMs) primarily in the communications networks, defense and aerospace, industrial and semiconductor systems, medical, multimedia, computing and storage, automotive and clean technology sectors. Sanmina Corporation has facilities strategically located in key regions throughout the world.

ATE and AXI Test Engineer

Job Purpose:

Designs, develops, and implements cost-effective methods of testing PCBAs using ICT and Flying Probe ATE machines. Prepares test and diagnostic programs, designs test fixtures and equipment, and completes specifications and procedures for new products. May be responsisible for setting the parameters and testing customer samples. Some Senior Test Engineering guidance will be provided.

Nature of Duties:

Create and Modify ICT and Flying Probe Programs to be used on HP3070 and Takaya APT test machines
Create test procedures, debug guides, and perform operator training
Participate in weekly yield reviews and continuous improvement meetings
Work directly with engineering, manufacturing, and quality departments regarding process improvement
Statistical analysis of ICT and Flying Probe test results and incoming supplier data
ICT and Flying Probe test capacity analysis, and drives additional requirements with customers
Gage RR, correlation studies, Cp/Cpk analysis, and Post build reports
Participate in Lean Six Sigma projects
Driving solutions to ICT and Flying Probe related problems
Sourcing and ordering fixtures used for ICT and Flying Probe test

Education and Experience:

Bachelor's Degree a relative engineering field
3 years experience in a Test Engineering role using HP3070 ICT and Takaya Flying Probe machines
1-2 years experience in creating ICT and FP test programs
3 years experience in PCBA test environment
Ability to work in a fast-paced environment required
Proficiency in understanding product documentation, including schematics and test specifications
Must be able to communicate effectively, verbally and written
Good interpersonal skills
Able to lift 40 lbs.
Able to use hand tools

Experience in the following areas is a plus:

AXI 5DX and Vitrox program development
Software development
Contract Manufacturing experience
Proficient in Google Suite
Knowledge of Agile
Electronic debug to component level
Proven knowledge of production electronic assembly, inspection, test process

Sanmina is an Equal Opportunity Employer – M/F/Veteran/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",3.1,"Sanmina Corporation
3.1","Manchester, NH",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
36,"Senior Principal Frontend Data Visualization Engineer – Secureworks – Austin, TX or US Remote",-1,"Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) a global cybersecurity leader, enables our customers and partners to outpace and outmaneuver adversaries with more precision, so they can rapidly adapt and respond to market forces to meet their business needs. With a unique combination of cloud-native, SaaS security platform and intelligence-driven security solutions, informed by 20+ years of threat intelligence and research, no other security platform is grounded and informed with this much real-world experience. www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview

We are looking for a highly motivated UX engineer to design and build user interfaces for a next generation security platform that will advance the state-of-the-art in network defense. This role requires a UX engineer that can take ideas from concept to reality and work well in a fast-paced, startup-like, collaborative team of product managers, software engineers, data scientists, and security researchers.

The ideal applicant will have experience developing rich User Interface dashboards consuming large amounts of Data. If you’re a UX engineer with proven experience designing and developing innovative, intuitive, and beautiful interfaces that people love, we need your help to push the boundaries of user interface design and bring the most innovative security product concepts to life.

To learn more about one of our newly launched products that you will help develop new features for, explore here.

Responsibilities
Lead data visualization efforts in D3, to create responsive and highly usable data representations
Build intuitive user interfaces from the ground up using the latest web technologies
Collaborate with a diverse team of engineers, data scientists, and security researchers
Communicate and present your work in a clear and simple manner
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules
Requirements
Minimum of 8 years as a UI Frontend Engineer or Developer
Minimum of 5 years of experience with JavaScript, HTML, CSS3/SASS/SCSS, and TypeScript
Minimum of 5 years Designing and Developing Interactive Data Visualizations using D3
Preferences
Minimum of 3 years of experience with Angular (latest versions)
Proficiency with Git and continuous integration/continuous delivery
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, or equivalent work experience
Experience using Material Design
Experience with Docker, Kubernetes, and microservice architectures
Knowledge of UI security issues and best practices to prevent vulnerabilities
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8",Florida,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
37,Systems Engineer (Voyage Management System),$40k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Voyage Management System Expert Location: Newport RI (Naval Undersea Warfare Center) *
KMS Solutions is seeking a highly motivated individual to provide engineering and program support for development and maintenance of the Voyage Management Systems (VMS) at the Naval Undersea Warfare Center, Newport RI. Fleet experience as an SSN/SSBN Navigator and/or an understanding of US Navy systems engineering procedures and product engineering methodology is desired. Candidates with an appropriate education and experience are invited to apply at http://www.kmssol.com.

This position is available immediately. Salary is dependent on experience and education.
Job Overview & Responsibilities *
The successful candidate will be part of a team of engineers and technicians providing engineering and technical support for Undersea Warfare Systems to the Naval Undersea Warfare Center (NUWC), in Newport, RI. Duties and responsibilities include:
Analyze VMS systems to ensure conformance with engineering design and performance specifications.
- Research and analyze VMS system designs, specifications, manuals, and other data to determine readiness for operational deployment.
- Track and document VMS performance issues and provide recommended solutions. - Investigate VMS performance system failures and make recommendations to ensure safe and effective operation and deployment and eliminate or reduce potential of system failures.
- Evaluate the feasibility, design, operation and performance of equipment, components, and systems of VMS systems
The candidate will be a member of a multidisciplinary engineering team consisting of mechanical, electrical, and software/firmware engineers. Our multi-disciplinary team is heavily involved in system engineering, safety engineering and cybersecurity efforts for development of new undersea platforms, equipment, and weapons systems.
Qualifications *
Required skills: *
• Experience with the Voyage Management System (VMS)

• Eligibility for a DoD secret clearance

• Ability to communicate, both orally and in writing, to all levels of the customer organization.

• Capable of effectively working and problem solving in both independent and team environments.

• Extensive working knowledge of PCs, network hardware, operating systems software, electromechanical systems design, development, testing, and operational knowledge.

• Working knowledge of Microsoft Office products, particularly Microsoft Word and Excel.

• Customer/Client Focus
Preferred Skills: *
• Three (3) or more years of related experience with VMS

• Current DoD secret clearance

• Fleet experience on an SSN/SSBN Navigator or Assistant Navigator

• Experience with the BYG-1 combat system

• Experience with the U. S. Navy system engineering procedures including the Technology Insertion/ Advanced Processor Build (TI/APB) process.

• Bachelor's Degree in Engineering or equivalent experience
Company Overview *
KMS Solutions, LLC, is dedicated to providing high quality consulting and technical services to commercial and Government clients. Our principals are experienced in and dedicated to serving the needs of US Government related activities. Specific market areas include the US Navy, the US Intelligence Community, the Department of Defense and its C4ISR programs, and other Federal technology and human capital management related activities. Our employees support decision makers at the highest levels of industry and the federal government with systems engineering, human capital development, and advisory & assistance professional services.
Affirmative Action/EEO statement *
KMS Solutions provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.
Other duties *
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time",3.4,"KMS Solutions, LLC
3.4","Newport, RI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
38,Data Architect,$65k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Architect holds a key position in a hands-on Enterprise Architecture team where we identify improvement opportunities, define strategies and solutions, develop and implement such solutions. The Data Architect will focus on helping the company constantly improve our management of and access to data, minimize data risk for the organization, and help control technical diversity. The Data Architect will regularly provide oversight and expertise to the DBA and Development teams to ensure good database design, performance, and adherence to architectures, standards and best practices. The Data Architect will interact with business leaders for detailed business understanding, requirements elicitation, project scoping and updates.

Duties:
Contribute to critical business projects
Provide expert level guidance on Microsoft SQL Server best practices and performance tuning, and mentor project teams through successful implementation of approved designs
Run independent periodic database health evaluations on critical databases, troubleshoot issues in data processing and performance, and provide updates to IT Management
Actively participate in all database designs and continually review those designs to ensure they follow good database design principles, align with the business needs, and align with our enterprise strategies, standards, and best practices -- anticipating potential problems with proposed solutions and offering ways to reduce risk and improve longevity
Lead development of reporting frameworks, ETL processes, and data quality improvements to help realize data strategies
Contribute to enterprise standards, architecture strategies, architectures, solutions, and the intermediate goals that will help us achieve them
Maintain a current understanding of new technologies and trends and prepare recommendations for if, when, and how they should be incorporated into the enterprise
Minimum Qualifications:
Minimum of 7 years' experience in information technology.
Minimum 3 years as a senior DBA or senior database developer.
Senior level expertise in Microsoft SQL Server
Senior level expertise in Microsoft data technologies (SSIS, SSMS, SSRS, SSAS, PowerBI, etc.)
Proven ability to multi-task and self-prioritize to meet tight deadlines and shifting priorities
Ability to balance competing pressures from both the business and IT leaders
Ability to analyze problems logically and objectively and apply sound judgment in assessing possible solutions
Ability to quickly assess an issue or need and guide teams towards correct decisions
Database design and operations expertise
Project management skills
Strong troubleshooting and abstraction skills
Excellent interpersonal, communication, negotiating, and interviewing skills.
Excellent documentation and organization skills with the ability to present technical findings in a clear and concise manner
Ability to understand how businesspeople think and communicate that understanding effectively to technology staff
High degree of risk management skill.
Knowledge of development lifecycle & methodology
Experience in creating as-is and to-be diagrams and performing gap analysis
Experience interacting with offsite teams
Preferred Qualifications:
Willingness to stand with the various teams in time of crisis
Desire to take ownership of issues and seeing them through completion
Takes pride in delivering quality end-to-end solutions
Improves efficiency of IT projects through streamlined processes and reuse of solutions
Seeks to improve flexibility of solutions through new technology or processes
Working familiarity with big data, no-SQL, and other data technologies
Visio -- architecture diagrams, data diagrams, process flows, use-case diagrams
PowerPoint -- Executive presentations, architecture diagrams
MS Office, Sharepoint, MS TFS
Working familiarity with Embarcadero
Working familiarity with iServer",2.6,"Select Portfolio Servicing
2.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
39,Application Engineer IV - Analytics Eng Focus (TS/SCI w/Full Scope Poly),$109k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

At Optiv, we’re on a mission to help our clients make their businesses more secure. We’re one of the fastest growing companies in a truly essential industry.

In your role at Optiv, you’ll be inspired by a team of the brightest business and technical minds in cyber security. We are passionate champions for our clients, and know from experience that the best solutions for our clients’ needs come from working hard together. As part of our team, your voice matters, and you will do important work that has impact, on people, businesses and nations. Our industry and our company move fast, and you can be sure that you will always have room to learn and grow. We’re proud of our team and the important work we do to build confidence for a more connected world.

Job Description

The Application Engineer will play a role in the design, implementation, and maintenance of data ingest processes for a user security alert dashboard, specifically automating the processing of customer data logs.

Qualifications
Active TS/SCI clearance with Full Scope Poly required
Education: Master's Degree + 6 years of software development experience (or Diploma/GED + 12 years, Associate's Degree + 10 years, Bachelor's Degree + 8 years, or Doctorate Degree + 4 years)
Required:
Experience with ElasticSearch, Kibana, Kubernetes, Scala, Spark streaming, pub/sub architecture (specifically Kafka)
Desired:
Experience with Angular 7+, Node.js, Redis MySQL
#LI-MS1

Additional Information

Why you'll love it here:

If you are seeking a culture that supports growth, fosters success and moves the industry forward, find your place at Optiv! Optiv's mission is to deliver comprehensive, integrated cybersecurity programs to optimize customer security programs to be more effective, efficient, manageable and measurable. Our aim is to become the world's largest cybersecurity solutions integrator by leveraging our expertise in security technology, market leading services, and innovative approaches. We have served more than 12,000 clients of various sizes across multiple industries, we offer an extensive geographic footprint, and have premium partnerships with more than 350 of the leading security product manufacturers. Optiv is a privately-held company backed by KKR, a leading global private equity firm.

With Optiv you can expect:

• An entrepreneurial and collaborative environment

• A competitive total rewards program

• Professional training opportunities

• An engaging and fun culture

• Opportunity to work with industry-leading, talented peers",2.7,"Optiv
2.7","Fort Meade, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
40,Systems Engineer/Administrator (Salesforce Platform Experience Required),$49k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Acuity is seeking a Systems Engineer/Administrator to be the primary system administrator and analyst for the Salesforce.com Enterprise Edition environment. The engineer will build, maintain, and manage custom reports, dashboards, and workflows. We are seeking an engineer with experience in the following areas:
Managing Salesforce security including roles, profiles, sharing rules, workflows, and groups.
Proven ability to take on a leadership role, and train Salesforce users.
Strong communication skills, with the ability to communicate with Business and IT members across the organization.
Additional job functions of Acuity's systems engineers can be found within ""Essential Functions"".

Responsibilities


ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Provide support and maintenance for distributed or open systems servers.
Provide support and maintenance for all virtualization of servers.
Provide support and maintenance for AIX, Linux, Microsoft Windows operating systems.
Provide support and maintenance for data replication systems.
Provide support and maintenance for 3rd party applications as necessary.
Knowledge of progressive security as it pertains to the networking, operating systems, software, and hardware of assigned servers.
Experience with tapeless backup / recovery systems and documenting these processes.
Detailed understanding and experience with network protocols.
Experience with Disaster Recovery planning and testing.
Train local and remote users on operating system software packages and hardware operation.
Test new software products and releases as well as hardware devices.
Assist in establishing standards and trouble reporting procedures.
Assist in system performance monitoring, reporting and tuning.
Assist in the integration of multiple hardware platforms.
Participate in the Disaster Recovery plan and rehearsals.
Design new or revised architectures to include the software, hardware, and communications to support the total requirements and provide for present and future cross-functional requirements and interfaces.
Remain abreast of company and industry directions.
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications


EDUCATION: Bachelor’s or Associate Degree in Computer Science, MIS or equivalent and continued field specific education.

EXPERIENCE: 3-5 years practical experience in computer operations, applications and/or technical support or information security.

OTHER:
A keen interest and aptitude for problem identification and resolution.
Full understanding of operating system hardware, software, network components, security, and/or database management system.
Ability to provide exact audit trials and recovery points during project life cycles to ensure maximum system stability.
Ability to work cooperatively with technical and non-technical system users and industry vendors.
Good listening ability as well as the ability to competently train others.
Willingness to respond to problems with little notice as well as to adjusting off hours scheduling to meet company project installation dates.
This position is classified as exempt.",4.9,"Acuity Insurance
4.9","Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
41,Development Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Link Logistics Real Estate (“Link”) is an industrial real estate operating platform owned by The Blackstone Group Inc. Link currently manages a national portfolio of high-quality, well-located industrial assets totaling over 400 million square feet throughout the U.S.
The Development Team is responsible for overseeing Link Logistics $1.5b development pipeline that includes ground up construction, build to suits and major redevelopments of existing assets. The Development Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the Development Team with the administrative oversight of all development-related reporting, data management, and project monitoring. This position will be exposed to all facets of commercial real estate.

Establish and monitor project budgets and schedules in Yardi for all developments through the project life cycle
Project future revenue by entering and maintaining market lease assumption for speculative buildings in Forecast Manager
Manage project documentation in Yardi and confirm proper records are maintained for all developments
Work with the Development teams on accurate cashflow projections and update as budget and schedules evolve
Coordinate the “Close Out” process of completed developments and ensure all documentation is received and financial records are finalized
Work with Yardi consultants to improve reporting capabilities and data management
Ensure timely payments of development expenses and accurate coding
Assist in ad-hoc reporting and new development initiatives
Support all phases of the Development from acquisition through lease-up
Assist in preparation of the monthly Development Executive reporting and quarterly Board Book

BA or BS in relevant field of study (Finance, Accounting, Real Estate, Business Management or similar)
Must be a team player
1-2 years’ experience in the development or real estate industry preferred
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint; familiarity with Yardi also a plus
Detail-oriented
Ability to multi-task effectively in a fast-paced work environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
EEO Statement
Our company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Our employment decisions are based on individual qualifications, job requirements and business needs without regard to race, color, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, religion, disability, citizenship status, national origin, pregnancy, veteran status and or any other legally protected characteristics. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations, if you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email employment@liprop.com
#LI=MB1",3.4,"Revantage Corporate Services
3.4","Fort Washington, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
42,Senior Electrical Engineer - PECVD,$87k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Lam….

Together we move the Atoms that move the World:

Imagine working on the front lines of innovation! As one of the semiconductor industry's leading suppliers of wafer fabrication equipment and services, our technology depends on finding and hiring the best and the brightest employees. We know that our dynamic, global team of exceptional employees is essential to our continued growth.

Lam Research - where successful people want to work:

We are a company comprised of people who work hard, deliver outstanding results and maintain a sense of humor during even the most challenging times. This is truly a rare opportunity. Lam Research is a market leader where our core values are not just words on the back of your badge. Given the criticality of this role to Lam Research's success, this philosophy starts with you.

Job Responsibilities

In addition to regular responsibilities, the Senior Electrical Engineer establishes methods and procedures on new assignments.

Acts as a resource for colleagues and manages small projects.
Designs, develops, and modifies semi-complex to complex electrical/electro-mechanical systems
Designs, tests and troubleshoots mixed-signal circuit boards that bridge the sensors and actuators with the high-level system software
Utilizes a real-time distributed control system to meet wafer performance requirements
Conducts concept and feasibility studies for new and next generation products
Works with multidisciplinary engineering design team to design and modify custom and OEM system components
Works with suppliers to prepare detailed design, prototype fabrication, design testing/verification, and managing production release
Coordinates with internal customers to define system level controls architecture
Participates in cross-functional design reviews
Other Job Responsibilities

General Responsibilities /Job Functions:

• You will be responsible for performing professional electrical engineering research, design, development, modification, and evaluation in support of electrical and electro-mechanical systems/subsystems, embedded systems, control systems, and AC/DC power systems.

• You will assist the Subject Matter Expert to develop, define/refine functional specifications for electrical and electro-mechanical systems/subsystems, embedded systems, control systems, and AC/DC power systems.

• You will work with a multidisciplinary engineering design team: electrical, mechanical, software, technical support, productivity engineers, and suppliers, on the design, modification, of custom and OEM systems components.

• You will need to prepare and analyze test plans and procedures to assure that technical and operational requirements are met and properly demonstrated.

• You will be responsible for evaluating equipment to establish operating data, conducting experimental tests, and analyzing the pertinent material and data in preparation of your presentation at design, project, and program reviews.

Minimum Qualification

Minimum of 8 years of related experience with a Bachelor’s degree; or 6 years and a Master’s degree; or a PhD with 3 years experience
Very good oral and written communication skills in English
Excellent IT knowledge, e.g. MS Windows, MS Office products
Hands-on experience with design and productization of electrical control systems, electrical CAD Systems (Zuken E3)
Practical experience with sensors, actuators, field busses (e.g. Ethernet, Serial, EtherCAT), measurement and controls technology
Excellent working knowledge of applicable electrical related standards like UL, CE, IEC, SEMI
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Outstanding analysis and trouble-shooting skills
Ability to drive functional requirements and execute in a dynamic team environment
Proven successful hands-on experience in electrical design of complex systems, control of complex systems, and AC/DC power systems
Proven successful hands-on experience in the design, development and realization of analog and digital electronic circuits, from schematic, validation, to final engineering release onto products
Working experience in electrical circuit design and development CAD software or similar, SPICE modeling, System modeling (e.g. SIMULink or similar), or other equivalent
Proven successful hands-on experience in RF and plasma systems is plus
Ability to occasionally travel to vendor and customer sites is a plus
Preferred Qualification

Semiconductor capital equipment power distribution design experience
Experience with PCB design process
Has experience in applying system design models like the Systems “VEE”
Appreciates learning and understanding challenges and limitations within other disciplines on system designs
Understanding of system integration into customer facility
Willingness to travel to international locations
More About Us ….

Our work is everywhere you look – even if you can’t actually see it. Lam Research goes deeper than software or chips to the heart of the process that enables chip creation. So if you want to help power the components that empower everything, join us.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability.",3.9,"Lam Research
3.9","Tualatin, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1980,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
43,End User Compute Engineer - Senior,-1,"As an EUC Engineer - Senior, you’ll be responsible for the management of all desktop and laptop systems, including standard image creation and maintenance (physical and virtual), distribution of applications, virus and patch management, and participation in software evaluation and testing.

Maintain/install end user software and hardware: Troubleshoot/resolve issues in a timely manner on Laptops/Desktops/Thin clients/peripheral devices/MS Windows OS/MS Office/ Local and web-based applications.
Software Administration: Active Directory Users and Computers and Security Group, Citrix and VMWare Horizon.
Ticket Queue: Monitor and respond to electronic tickets and phone calls from internal and external clients for both trouble and task oriented issues, and provide clearly written documentation regarding the problem, task, and resolution.
Other IT Related Support: Routers and switches, AV equipment, Printers, Security Systems and Proximity key card systems/Cable management. Maintain a clean and orderly IT storage area.
Administrative tasks: Attend meetings both locally, and via teleconference. Meet with local vendors and technicians. Maintain asset tracking software with up-to-date data.
Documentation: Create and collaborate on documentation pertaining to projects, tasks and other business needs.

Education: Bachelor’s Degree in IT related field or relevant work experience
Advanced knowledge of Windows Server (2008-2019), Windows 7/8/10 and Mac OS
Experience with workstation management system and desktop imaging
Knowledge of Office 365 and Exchange
MCSE certification or equivalent work experience – preferred
ITIL V3 certification – preferred
Experience in a VDI setting – preferred
Experience with MDM solutions – preferred
Experience:
Minimum 5 years of IT experience to include the following:
Understanding hardware and software deployment methodology, relative to desktop computing, ticketing system environments, and etc
Coordinating and maintaining comprehensive physical asset management of technology equipment
Collaborating with HR and Purchasing partners to streamline Desktop Management policies and procedure
Supporting a remote user base in a multi-location, global environment
Driving consistent improvements to raise the quality and efficiency of desktop management service provided to all employees
Ensuring internal groups are fully coordinated through hardware and software deployment life cycles
Providing technical/personal mentorship and guidance to team members on a regular basis
Proven ability to work on multiple projects concurrently with ease, maintaining organizational standards across each project
Other Knowledge, Skills, Abilities or Certifications:
Ability to work independently and in a team environment; perform follow through on tasks
Ability to maintain software and hardware inventory
Ability to multi-task and prioritize/re-prioritize work
Ability to keep abreast of the latest developments in hardware and software technologies
Strong sense of self-motivation, analytical skills, organization and attention to detail
Excellent troubleshooting, problem-solving, and customer service skills
Ability to interact with clients in a professional manner over the phone, in person, and in writing.
Ability to work under pressure, in a fast-paced work environment and support on-site and remote end-users
Microsoft Office proficiency
Must be able lift monitors and computers and other hardware; sit for extended periods at a desk performing routine tasks on a computer; provide cable management under, and around desks and work stations, and use simple computer tools like a screw driver. Heavy lifting to 50 lbs.
Consilio’s True North Values
Excellence - We strive to make every client our advocate
Passion - We DO because we CARE
Collaboration - We win together through teamwork and communication
Agility - We flex, adapt and embrace change
People - We value, respect and invest in our teammates
Vision - We create clarity of purpose and a clear path forward
Consilio, LLC is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status",3.4,"Consilio
3.4",United States,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Legal,Accounting & Legal,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
44,"Systems Engineer, Virtualization and Infrastructure",$40k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"About NECI

NECI, an Emerson Impact Partner, is the leading Digital Automation solutions provider transforming manufacturing, lab operations, process development and process control across a range of process industries in New England. NECI relentlessly seeks to drive the outcomes that change the game for our clients and is seeking team members to join in our mission.

The Role

As a Systems Engineer on the Lifecycle Solutions engineering team you will provide a wide range of Distributed Control System (DCS) platform services and solutions to our New England industrial automation installed base customers, as well as performing automation platform projects including software/hardware upgrades, virtualization infrastructure design and commissioning, adoption services, and other DCS performance or IT/OT solutions.

NECI provides a culture that enables self-starting individuals to positively impact customer outcome and business value, while cultivating values of team collaboration, passion for excellence, entrepreneurial spirit and others. Our customer base includes Life Science, Pharma, Power, Specialty Chemical, Pulp & Paper, and others.

How Youll Be Successful
Self-started & learning minded
Ability to solve problems and make decisions
Organizational and development skills
Ability to work with tools & technology
Customer focused
What Youll Do
Assist the Lifecycle Solutions Lead Engineer with infrastructure network design, installation, commissioning and maintenance activities in a Microsoft OS environment, often utilizing either VMWare or HyperV virtualization platforms.
Support design and build activities for Life Science customers and others in a Quality controlled methodology. May involve extensive documentation, internal testing, Factory Acceptance Testing, and Site Acceptance Testing. In many cases this will involve ASTM2500 verification-level delivery.
Perform infrastructure maintenance, security updates, diagnostics, and data backups of DCS workstations or servers, following Emerson Automation Solutions guidelines for select support agreement customers. Support of other infrastructure related activities under active Managed Services contracts.
Liaison with Dell, VMWare, VEEAM, Cisco, and other third-party partners.
Troubleshoot DCS control systems at the virtual, physical network, controller, and I/O level, in order to resolve customer problems in an efficient manner and keep their system running.
May involve supporting customer contracts for 24/7 emergency response and preventive maintenance, although after-hours emergencies are typically once per month or less.
What Youll Bring
BS Engineering or Engineering Technology, or Associate Degree with 2 or more years of relevant experience.
Strong communication skills and ability to interface with customers, and good writing skills.
Strong computer hardware troubleshooting and Microsoft OS knowledge.
Knowledge of HyperV or VMWare virtualization.
Knowledge of Dell computers and server hardware is preferred.
Knowledge of network switch configuration and/or firewall configuration a plus.
DCS platform knowledge or troubleshooting experience is a plus.
Strong communication skills and ability to interface with customers.
Ability to travel, rarely overnight, to customer sites.
Ability to support on-call duty on a rotating monthly basis.
Heres What Youll Get
Highly competitive Medical and Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts for medical expenses and dependent care expenses
3 Weeks of Vacation + Holidays
401(k)
Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP)
Employee Referral Bonus
Professional Development Reimbursement
NECI paid Basic Life & Short-Term, Long-Term Disability Insurance
Voluntary Benefits - Accident, Term Life, Whole Life Insurance
Flu Shot Clinic & First Aid/AED/CPR Classes
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States.

Policy on Third-Party Unsolicited Resume Submissions: Please note that any third-party unsolicited resume submissions will immediately become the property of NECI. NECI will not pay any fee to a submitting employment agency, person, or entity unless a signed agreement is established.

Please Note: NECI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.2,"NECI
4.2","Mansfield, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
45,HVAC Lead Engineer,$16-$44 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"SUMMARY:

The Lead Engineer is responsible for the mechanical engineering of environmental control units and providing guidance/direction to a team of Engineers to the successful completion of projects. Assists in design, development, implementation, and analysis of technical products and systems.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Designs, develops, analyzes, documents and supports testing of products, systems or subsystems
Provides guidance/direction to team of Engineers & Designers from Interns to Senior level
Implements designs successful in meeting technical, cost, weight and manufacturability requirements
Possesses a good mixture of analytical skills and hands-on abilities
Estimates own work, and sanity checks supporting team members’ estimates
Reports progress and status in a concise manner
Available for limited travel as needed
Supports, communicates, reinforces and defends the mission, values and culture of the organization
Adheres to all quality and safety standards
Supports other projects and performs duties as assigned
QUALIFICATIONS:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility listed above satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

EDUCATION

Bachelor of Science (BS) degree in Mechanical Engineering from an accredited engineering program; Master’s degree in Engineering and/or PE license preferred

WORK EXPERIENCE

Minimum of six (6) years’ experience in an engineering environment including experience leading engineering personnel; knowledge of the Refrigeration Cycle and its application on military and commercial equipment; Thermal, Flow and FEA/CFD analysis experience in ANSYS or similar software preferred; Structural analysis experience in ANSYS or similar software preferred; Solid Modeling experience in SolidWorks is preferred; Product Data Management experience in EPDM or similar data management system is preferred; Experience in defense industry preferred.

OTHER JOB RELATED SKILLS AND ABILITIES:
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work with customers, vendors, employees and managers at all levels within the company
Possesses strong leadership ability
Possesses effective oral and written communication skills
Possesses high attention to detail
Possess strong skills with demonstrated proficiency in standard business software packages (e.g., Microsoft Office)",3.0,"HDT Expeditionary Systems, Inc.
3.0","Florence, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1937,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
46,Space Systems - Senior Level - Opto-Mechanical Responsible Systems Engineer (RSE),-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space Systems is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space Systems. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The Systems Engineering Center (SEC) is seeking strong, technically sound engineers committed and passionate about creating innovative, cost-effective solutions for complex remote sensing applications as a Responsible Systems Engineer with a focus on the opto-mechanical aspects of the hardware. The successful candidate will be a member of the Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance and Communications Department. In this position you will take ownership of the unit level specification, support unit level assembly and integration, provide verification oversight of testing to ensure execution of the Requirements Verification Plan and Test Requirements Document at the unit level, complete technical review of Test Procedures, support Failure Review Board and Engineering Review Board, and perform final compliance assessment and documentation to sell-off the opto-mechanical assemblies and deliver to the Systems Engineering Team. In this role you will also generate and deliver requirements verification reports for system level requirements. This position will require proactive interaction and collaboration with personnel from various engineering functions and disciplines.

Required Skills:
Minimum 8 years of engineering experience
Strong background in Mechanical / Optics / Opto-Mechanical Engineering Design or Hardware
Experience with requirements verification, validation and sell-off including verification report generation and review
Experience with data review of opto-mechanical lab, test, and supplier data
Experience with supporting formal reviews such as Test Readiness Review (TRR), Engineering Review Board (ERB), Failure Review Board (FRB), or Consent to Ship Review (CTSR)
Experience with requirement management using IBM Rational DOORs
Demonstrated problem solving, organization, coordination, and planning skills
Team oriented individual with strong interpersonal communication and technical writing skills to enable effective personal interaction and collaboration with a multi-discipline team
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI within last 24 months required
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems
Desired Skills:
Experience in Space Systems
Experience with requirements flow down, maintenance and management of requirements through the use of DOORS requirement database management tool
Experience with opto-mechanical design integration
Experience with payload level concept of operations (CONOPS) and command and telemetry database (C&T DB)
Knowledge of Focal Plane Arrays
Knowledge of optics, optical design, or optical performance parameters
Knowledge of Electrical-Optical / Infrared (EO/IR) payload design
Flexibility in capabilities and willingness to support the team across various systems engineering, integration, and test roles to support program success
Pro-active and self-motivated individual
Demonstrated proficiency in analytical skills, strong written and verbal communication capability, and ability to work in an integrated product team environment
Experience in support of generating Verification Compliance Requirements Matrices, Requirements Verification Plans, Test Requirements Documents, Test Procedures and Requirements Sell-off Documents
Education:
Bachelors degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math (STEM), or Masters degree in relevant field with 8+ years of engineering experience
#IdeasInOrbit
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
169381

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
47,Building Engineer (Mission Critical Environment),-1,"ACML’s Operations team is growing! Are you looking for a challenging and rewarding career with a leading provider of customized operations and solutions? If you are a devoted and career-minded professional looking to contribute to a hard-working, dedicated team, we want to hear from you!
WHO ARE WE?*
With over 50 years of experience throughout North America, Angus Consulting Management Limited (“ACML”) is a trusted facility operations management company, with extensive knowledge managing critical environments including data centers, healthcare facilities, commercial facilities, central utility plants and Public Private Partnership projects.
WHO ARE WE LOOKING FOR?*
ACML is actively seeking *Building Engineers *located in *Manhattan – New York City* whose main responsibilities will include, but are not limited to, the following:

· Perform daily rounds and record readings for all major equipment including but not limited to temperatures, pressures, electrical readings, etc., document and inspect for irregularities in readings;

· Respond to tenant requests and emergencies;

· Review and complete daily entries into engineer's log;

· Complete preventive/demand maintenance tasks including but not limited to chemical treatment maintenance, filter changes, belt replacement, lubrications, cleaning of utility rooms, maintenance of fire prevention systems, testing and inspecting equipment for proper operation and input histories if required;

· Start-up/shutdown major building equipment as required or directed;

· Inspect, operate, maintain and repair mechanical/electrical systems including but not limited to boilers, chillers, HVAC equipment, pumps, generators, uninterruptible power supplies, life safety system, etc., and ensure all equipment are operated in a safe and efficient manner and in compliance with all applicable government codes and regulations;

· Monitor electrical power distribution system and building automation system and respond to alarms expeditiously and methodically;

· Be familiar with critical environment systems and equipment, mitigating risk by proactive inspections and reacting to abnormal incidents according to best practices;

· Complete any duties as requested by the client’s Standard Operating Procedures in order to minimize risk to critical floor operation;

· Use the Angus Anywhere maintenance management system to administer preventive and demand maintenance tasks;

· Receive and verify shipments and maintain inventory of spares, consumables and tools;

· Maintain a concise control document record of all procedures carried out, inventory of paper forms and control documents providing a concise record of procedures carried out;

· Oversee contractor activities;

· Assist other contractors/trades as required;

· Maintain a clean work environment.
HOURS OF WORK: *
· Day and Afternoon Shifts, Monday – Friday, with some overtime opportunities on weekends or evenings.
WHAT WILL YOU BRING?*
· Our ideal candidate would be a Building Engineer with facilities maintenance and operations experience, excellent knowledge of OSHA, building codes and regulatory procedures (NYC);

· 5+ years’ experience in the operation and maintenance of critical facilities;

· You should have strong technical capabilities in building systems and equipment;

· You should have knowledge an understanding of HVAC, Plumbing, Electrical systems and BAS;

· You should have completed a related diploma/degree/certification in FM maintenance/engineering;

· Ability to communicate effectively in English (oral and written);

· Critical or Mission Critical Environments experience an asset;
WHY SHOULD YOU APPLY?*
We work hard to find the right people and provide opportunities for them to flourish.

We offer a collaborative environment with experienced leaders and room to grow. We are a company that values integrity, continuous improvement and operations excellence.

If you’re as excited about the future of our company as we are, we would love to hear from you! We welcome and encourage all qualified candidates to submit a detailed resume.

Please click on the link below if you are interested in applying for this position:

https://acml.applytojob.com/apply/2IEskr6Raa/Building-Engineer-Mission-Critical-Environment?source=INDES

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Weekends
Experience:
operations and maintenance of critical facilities: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Angus Consulting Management Limited
2.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,"Senior Product Data Analyst, Consumer",$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Car shopping is complicated. At CarGurus, we use data and technology to make it simple, giving people the tools they need to confidently find, buy, finance, or sell a car. The best part? Our work makes a real impact. We're the most-visited car-shopping site in the US, and we're expanding globally. Ready to come along for the ride?

About the Role

At CarGurus we use data, not hunches, to inform decisions. Product Analysts play a key role in crafting the data narrative for these decisions. We love to collaborate, we're excited by a challenge, and we believe that ownership enables us to grow.

This Product Analyst role will support the Consumer Products team, where you will have opportunities for outsized positive impact. Your data insights will play a big part in helping millions of site visitors have a more transparent and enjoyable car shopping experience. We are looking for thoughtful, daringly curious candidates who can dive into complex data and draw insightful conclusions. You'll work cross-functionally with many departments and partners, and gain exposure to multiple dimensions of the business.

Our team values diversity in experience and backgrounds—we do our best work when we create a space for different voices and perspectives. Whatever unique experiences or skill sets you bring to the table, we look forward to learning from each other

What You'll Do:
Conduct exploratory data analysis across disparate data sources (e.g. website usage, dealer behavior patterns and customer insights) to understand the performance of existing products and see opportunities for new product offerings
Partner with the product, engineering, marketing, sales, and finance departments to grow our business, including recommending and advocating for performance improvement ideas
Define metrics to evaluate business performance, products and experiments; build reports and dashboards to monitor and understand them
Communicate and present data analysis, visualizations, and insights to key partners
Be a voice and advocate for using data to improve the quality of our decision making
Mentor data analysts on technical and professional development
Who You Are:
4+ years of experience in data analysis (experience in consumer internet, digital marketing or SaaS product data a plus)
Proficiency in SQL and Python/R, or other scripting language
Strong grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Knowledge of BI and reporting tools, or demonstrated ability in learning new tool
Ability to influence multiple stakeholders to adopt new data-driven approaches and achieve shared business goals
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
CarGurus Culture:

At CarGurus, we invest in our people's professional growth with everything from learning and development programs to tuition reimbursement. Want to work on projects that expand your skill set without sacrificing your work/life balance? You got it. We also strive to provide perks and benefits that employees actually care about like free lunch, commuter subsidies, and more. That includes equity in the company—our way of showing that we want you here for the long haul.

We work hard every day to build the world's most trusted and transparent automotive marketplace, but trust and transparency don't just apply to our consumers. They extend to our talent, too. We aim to create a workplace where everyone feels they can bring the ultimate expression of themselves and their potential—where you don't just fit, you thrive. We don't discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

In addition to the US, CarGurus operates sites in Canada, the UK. We have offices in Cambridge, MA; Detroit, MI; Dublin, Ireland; San Francisco, CA and London, UK. Check out our careers page to learn more.",3.9,"CarGurus
3.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
49,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Noregon develops and offers remote and in-shop diagnostic software, hardware, data analytics and diagnostic tool management to consumers within the heavy-duty trucking industry. Noregon is looking for Embedded Software Engineers that are ready to put their skills and expertise alongside the brightest minds to impact the industry that keeps us going! Software Engineers at Noregon design, develop, and install software solutions to build high-quality, innovative and fully performing software.
This is located in Greensboro, NC. We are offering paid relocation assistance and a $3,000 sign on bonus to join our team!*
Software Engineer Responsibilities: *
Work with our Engineering team and customers to define requirements and specifications. When the customer speaks, we listen!
Implement complex software and program functionality and getting the opportunity to pitch your results to the management team.
Participate in or even lead requirements, design, code and test plan reviews.
Accumulate and use industry information to improve the quality of products and services.
Provide input to Test Engineers.
Mentor and provide guidance on technical issues to less experienced team members.
Provide effort and duration estimates of engineering work to Account and Program Managers.
Develop code, documentation and specifications in accordance with our Quality Assurance plan.
Effectively deal with team members at levels. We hire brilliant people who play well with others. Our Software Engineers demonstrate tact, good judgment and great composure.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: *
Demonstrable evidence of understanding and experience with all phases of the SDLC
Experience in Embedded Linux and/or FreeRTOS preferred
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Experience with C++, C#, .Net, SQL
API
TCP/IP Socket programming
Embedded Systems development is a huge plus!
Device Driver development
Machine to machine communications
Interface to hardware
IoT (Internet of things) development
UML and communications protocols
Knowledge of multi-threaded programming and associated constructs
Deep understanding of object-oriented design concepts and design patterns
Ability to complete task with a high level of autonomy
Experience working with automotive protocols is a plus!
Requirements: *
Ability to work onsite in Greensboro, NC
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or Engineering
5+ years as a software Engineer
Experience in Embedded Systems preferred
Microsoft Certified Solutions Developer preferred
U.S. citizenship required
Working with our team: *
Noregon employees demonstrate tact, good judgement and great composure with everyone in our organization
Must possess excellent oral and written communication skills
A positive attitude to navigate with teams and all personalities
Exceptional problem-solving skills
Why you want to work here: *
We like to have fun and encourage a work-life balance!
Monthly employee events to recognize that we value you! Cookouts, baseball games, holiday parties, food trucks, fantasy football, etc.
Recognition programs with substantial prizes
Ping-pong tables in our break rooms
14 days paid time off
9 paid holidays
4 Weeks Paid Parental Leave
Paid sabbatical every 5 years of service
Flexible schedules
Comprehensive health, dental, vision, disability, and life insurance coverage
Pet insurance
401 (k) with company contribution
Great location in the heart of North Carolina’s Piedmont (Greensboro)
Paid relocation packages for eligible positions
Competitive Salary
Innovative Industry Leader
Company Information: *
Noregon specializes in creating custom software solutions and products for the commercial transportation and military industries. In addition to in-shop diagnostic solutions for the commercial fleet and repair industry, Noregon provides expertise in e-business, client-server, & embedded applications along with onboard vehicle network development. For more information on Noregon services and products.

_The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed, but are not to be seen as a complete list of responsibilities, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. Also, they do not establish a contract for employment and are subject to change at the discretion of the employer. Noregon Systems, Inc is an EO Employer AA: M/F/Veteran/Disability. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other protected class._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Signing bonus
Experience:
Software Engineering: 4 years (Required)
C++: 2 years (Preferred)
C#: 2 years (Preferred)
Embedded Software: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
This is not a remote position. The position is located in Greensboro, NC. Would you be willing/able to work in Greensboro, NC? Noregon does offer paid relocation for new employees.
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.noregon.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/NoregonSystems/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.7,"Noregon Systems, Inc.
3.7",North Carolina,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
50,Senior Downstream Development Engineer I,$92k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"The candidate will be a key contributor within a group responsible for performing purification process development, including small-scale experiments, scale-up, technology transfer and support for programs that bring new biopharmaceutical products to pre-clinical, clinical and commercial manufacturing phases. The successful candidate will be a leading contributor during execution of purification activities for the department, including troubleshooting problems, analyzing data and authoring technical reports and memos.

The candidate will design and carry out experiments for purification process development, optimization and characterization studies for therapeutic proteins. The scope includes IND- and BLA-enabling studies and preparation of regulatory submissions. The experimental studies involve both lab scale and pilot plant runs, including, but not limited to toxicology, clinical and validation batches. The individual will seamlessly collaborate and communicate within the framework of cross-functional, multi-disciplinary process development teams. In addition, the candidate will interact extensively with other departments such as research, internal manufacturing, external contract manufacturing, facilities/engineering, supply chain, project management, procurement and quality.

The individual will work autonomously to discover solutions for problems of broad scope and complexity under general guidance. The candidate will contribute to the development of novel processes and techniques that provide Shire with competitive advantage. In addition, the candidate is expected to exercise sound judgment to leverage established practices and lessons learned from difficult experiences, leading to best practices and procedures.

In particular, the candidate will lead efforts to improve and build up additional high throughput screening (HTS) using Tecan and other liquid hndling robotic systems within the downstream process development group. The expected applications include screening of process conditions (resins, buffer conditions, etc.), optimization of process conditions and purification of crude cell culture fluids for analysis of product quality attributes. The candidate will also integrate high throughput analytical instruments to the Tecan system to enable quick analysis of product-related and process-related impurities.

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
51,Senior Systems Engineer – VDI,$61k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future*
Become an integral part of a diverse team while working at an Industry Leading Organization, where our employees come first. At ManTech International Corporation, you’ll help protect our national security while working on innovative projects that offer opportunities for advancement.
Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented Senior Systems Engineer – VDI to join our team in Springfield, VA.
The Senior Systems Engineer – Virtual Desktop Infrastructure (VDI) serves as the Subject Matter Expert (SME) in the technologies, systems, applications, and services which make up the Activity’s IT Enterprise VDI solution. Specifically, the Senior Systems Engineer will be responsible for the designing, implementing, managing, maintaining, securing, and life-cycle management of the Citrix XenDesktop and NetScaler solutions deployed on multiple sets of enterprise-level IT systems in support of the Activity’s data center environments.
The Senior Systems Engineer directly supports the Activity’s Operations and Maintenance (O&M) teams in overseeing all VDI-based tasking of deployed operational Infrastructure Citrix solutions. This will include, but may not be limited to, all Guest Virtual Machine (VM) activities for the Cirtix XenDesktop applications (delivery controller, storefront direction, etc.), machine catalogs, delivery groups, Persistent and Non-Persistent images, and physical and virtual NetScaler models, to include NetScaler FIPS models. Desktop images will be regularly updated, tested, and deployed with both Operating System (OS) and third-party vendor application updates to maintain compliance, Information Assurance (IA), and Security (InfoSec) requirements.
When VDI issues, incidents, and/or problems arise, the Senior Systems Engineer provides direct troubleshooting and problem resolution support, to include Root Cause Analysis (RCA). The Senior Systems Engineer also produces and maintains documentation of the VDI solution to include the system, sub-system, and components in the Activity’s IT Hosting portfolio, including as-built documentation, capacity/performance plans, and all other areas of system life-cycle planning.
The Senior Systems Engineer also works directly with the Activity’s IT Architecture and Engineering (A&E) team to consistently explore, investigate, research, analyze, assess, implement, and transition new technologies to an operational state to modernize and improve upon existing infrastructure solutions.
Position Qualifications* :
Shall have 7 or more years of progressive experience in a VDI systems engineering, or similar, role capturing requirements, designing, engineering, implementing, securing, and operating and maintaining enterprise-level VDI solutions for a globally dispersed IT enterprise.
Shall have 5 or more years of experience designing, engineering, implementing, and maintaining solutions in secure processing environments which must adhere to U.S. Government Information Assurance and Security standards such as the Defense Information Systems Agency (DISA) Security Technical Implementation Guides (STIGs).
Shall have 3 or more years of proven hands-on experience performing O&M of VDI solutions that are using the Citrix XenDesktop 7 suite and Citrix NetScaler 11, or newer, to provide enterprise-level virtual desktop and application offerings.
Demonstrated experience with utilizing, supporting, and maintaining Windows Server 2012 R2 and/or Windows Server 2016 operating system (OS) as a VDI server platform and Windows 7 and/or Windows 10 OS as a desktop platform in a VDI environment as part of an all-encompassing VDI solution.
Demonstrated experience implementing and supporting application virtualization through an assortment of technologies including Citrix XenApp, AppLayering, and/or Enterprise Layer Manager (ELM).
Demonstrated experience monitoring and assessing virtualization and storage infrastructure systems and solutions proactively for performance degradation and tuning and optimization opportunities.
Bachelor’s Degree from an Accredited University.
Shall possess GIAC Security Essentials (GSEC) or Security+ Continuing Education (CE) or Systems Security Certified Practitioner (SSCP) to meet the minimum credential requirements for Cyber IT/Cybersecurity Workforce (CSWF) as outlined in SECNAV M-5239.2.
Desired Qualifications* :
Strongly desired to be Citrix Certified Professional – Virtualization (CPP-V) and CCP – Networking (CPP-N) certified.
Technical certifications in enterprise-level virtualization and OS vendor technologies, such as Microsoft, Nutanix, and/or VMware are also a plus.
Demonstrated experience operating and maintaining Citrix XenDesktop 7.15 Long-Term Service Release (LTSR) or newer.
Demonstrated experience operating and maintaining Citrix NetScaler 12.0 and later. Additionally, experience with supporting the unique nature of FIPS model NetScalers is also a plus.
Demonstrated experience in the O&M of Citrix Machine Creation Services (MCS) and/or Provisioning Services (PVS) for desktop servicing.
Demonstrated experience in leveraging vendor and industry product documentation, to include best practices, and software-based tools to research, engineer, build, and deploy right-sized and properly tuned and configured VDI desktops.
Demonstrated experience in implementing, configuring, securing, and maintaining NetScaler Firewalls, High Availability (Active-Active, Active-Passive), Load Balancers (to include Global Service Load Balancing (GSLB)), Logging, and Two-Factor Authentication through RADIUS integration.
Demonstrated experience utilizing, supporting, and maintaining Citrix monitoring products like Command Center, Director, Insight, and/or NetScaler Management and Analytics System (NMAS).
Demonstrated experience leveraging Microsoft PowerShell for the purposes of automating and orchestrating routine, as well as complex, administrative and operational tasking. Experience using Microsoft PowerShell to support Infrastructure as Code (IAC) and Configuration as Code (CAC) in a production enterprise environment is a plus.
Familiarity with proactively monitoring VDI implementations for performance degradation and tuning and optimization opportunities.
Familiarity with Public Key Infrastructure (PKI) and Secure Socket Layer (SSL) certificate generation, use, and upkeep as it pertains to Citrix-based solutions.
Familiarity with hyper-converged infrastructure (HCI) technologies, such as the Nutanix Enterprise Cloud Platform, and their capabilities to offer scalable converged compute and storage for enterprise-level virtual workloads. Prior experience using Nutanix ECP as the Hosting platform for VDI solutions is a plus.
Familiarity with basic Networking troubleshooting concepts and approaches.
Clearance Requirement: * Top Secret/SCI with counterintelligence (CI) polygraph (in-scope within the past 7 years)
ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SQL: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 1 year (Preferred)",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","Springfield, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
52,Sr. Software Engineer - TS/SCI Required,-1,"As a Senior Software Engineer at Synergist, you will work with a team of developers on a specific project critical to one of our customer’s needs. You'll be an active contributor on an Agile Software development team to deliver custom solutions to the customer. You will perform design, development, and testing activities related to assigned tasks and manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables.

**Position Requires a Top Secret Clearance with a Full-Scope Polygraph**

Degree and Years of Experience
BS degree in Computer Science or a similar technical field of study and 8 years of experience software development/engineering experience. An additional 4 years of experience may be substituted for the degree.
Responsibilities
Be an active contributor on an Agile Software development team to deliver custom solutions to the customer.
Perform design, development, and testing activities related to assigned tasks.
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables.
Minimum Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. Citizen.
Ability to lead, direct, and/or mentor a software development team.
Ability to collaborate across multiple teams and develop ideas, architectures and agreements to support the interfaces between products.
Software development experience in one or more programming languages such as Java, Python, C++, Ruby.
Experience developing software within a Linux environment.
Experience working with any of the following: web/mobile application development, distributed systems, user interface development, big data analytics.
Excellent communication skills.
Passion for technology and the drive to learn new programming languages and frameworks.
Desired Qualifications:
We realize that we are about to enumerate a bunch of skills and experience here. Don’t worry if you don’t have all of these, but we’d like you to have touched some of these technologies or concepts or at least be familiar with them.
Experience with NoSQL technologies such as MongoDB, REDIS, Neo4J, etc.
Experience with Relational Databases such as MySQL, Oracle, POSTGres
Experience with developing RESTful Services using a framework such as Jersey, Spring MVC, CXF
Experience with an Enterprise Integration Framework such as Apache Camel, or Spring Integration
Experience with JMS to include messaging Frameworks such as Apache ActiveMQ or Apache Artemis.
Experience with Spring to include Spring Boot, Spring Data
Experience with the Java Persistence API through a persistence framework such as Hibernate, OpenJPA
Experience developing and deploying applications to Servlet containers such as Tomcat or Jetty or Application Servers such as Glassfish, JBoss, Weblogic
Experience developing Applications with NodeJS
Experience with JavaScript frameworks such as Ext-JS, AngularJS, Vue or React.
Experience with Javascript, Flex, JSP, HTML, CSS, SpringMVC, or equivalents for UI developers and Spring, Hibernate, JPA, Servlets or equivalents for Java developers
Experience developing web applications leveraging ES6 and component based packaging
Experience with Bootstrap framework.
Experience with JQuery
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce
Experience developing applications within utility clouds such as AWS, Rackspace, or Heroku
Experience wtth continuous integration tools such as Gitlab I or Jenkins
--

Know anyone who may also be interested in a position with us? Refer them and receive a substantial referral bonus! https://synergistcomputing.com/referral",5.0,"Synergist Computing
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
53,ITS/CAV Engineer,$32k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) / Connected and Automated Vehicle (CAV) Engineer (062001)

SRF Consulting Group, Inc.

SRF Consulting Group is a well-established and award-winning transportation engineering, planning, and design firm providing services throughout the Midwest. At SRF, our employee-owners help shape the culture and future of our business. As a 100% ESOP company, team members share in the company’s growth and prosperity and receive stock ownership on a vesting schedule for their retirement. SRF also provides our team with a 401(k) and company match plan, a comprehensive health benefits package, competitive salaries, paid professional certifications and memberships, flex-time scheduling, generous time-off programs, vacation time carry-over, and multiple professional development programs to choose from.

Position:

We are seeking an experienced and motivated Engineer to lead the planning, design, research, and deployment of technology systems such as:

Connected and automated vehicles
Active traffic management systems
Vehicle detection
Traveler information systems
Intelligent work zones
Intersection conflict warning systems
Roadway weather information systems
Transit technologies
Wireless and fiber networks

Responsibilities:

Project and task management
Interaction with clients and internal groups
Preparation of plans, specifications, and estimates
Data analysis
Technical writing
Field inspections
Integration and troubleshooting

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in civil engineering, traffic engineering, or a related engineering field
Two or more years of engineering experience
ITS, CAV, or technology systems experience
Excellent interpersonal skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proficiency in Microsoft Office and CADD applications

Office location note: we are currently located near 394 and 494 in Plymouth but will be moving to West End area of St Louis Park fall of 2020.

Visa sponsorship is not available for this position.

SRF Consulting Group, Inc., is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer.",4.0,"SRF Consulting
4.0","Minneapolis, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1961,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
54,Principal / Senior Software Engineer,$95k-$190k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal / Senior Software Engineer*
VA Boston Healthcare System, Boston, Massachusetts

Come join us in Boston at The VA Boston Healthcare System (VABHS), New England's premier referral center for Veterans' healthcare. VABHS is the largest recipient of VA research funds in the nation and ranked #3 among 146 VA facilities nationally for overall employee satisfaction.

The _Million Veteran Program_ (MVP) is a national research program to learn how genes, lifestyle, and military exposures affect health and illness. Since launching in 2011, over 825,000 Veteran partners have joined one of the world's largest programs on genetics and health.

Veterans who partner with MVP contribute to improving the lives of fellow Veterans and ultimately, everyone. Scientific discoveries from MVP are already underway, helping us reach our goal of transforming health now and for future generations.

The Million Veteran Program (MVP) has several positions open for Principal/Senior level Software Engineers who are *US Citizen* and have solid experienced in System design, Database and Application development.

A successful candidate will be a hands-on Software Engineer / architect to support the ongoing product development, as well as maintaining a complex array of supporting subsystems. Ideal candidate will be both technical and passionate about science and healthcare.

Qualifications
*MUST be a US Citizen and MUST clear a US government background check*
Extensive experience with Design and development of Web application, web services (REST ), C# or Java, JavaScrip
Experience with Relational Database Management System (RDBMS), such as SQL Server, MySQL, Oracle
Experience with ETL tools is preferred (SSIS and Pentaho Data Integration)
Experience with continuous integration practice and tools such as Jenkins
Minimum 10+ years of demonstrable professional software development experience
Must have strong communication and documentation skills
B.S. Degree or higher in Engineering / Math / Science
Applicants should submit a cover letter and CV or inquiries to _through Indeed_. Include *“Senior Software Engineer”* in the e-mail subject line. *US Citizens only please.*

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
https://www.boston.va.gov/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/VABoston
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"VA Boston Healthcare System
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
55,Information Systems Security Engineer (ISSE),-1,"****This position is contingent upon contract award.*****
Raytheon Technologies intends to offer a proposal in support of STARGAZER. An experienced Senior Information Systems Security Engineer focusing on established programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large data sets.
Job duties may include but are not limited to:
Conducting mathematical, statistical, or other data-driven problem solving analysis to identify business operations or intelligence questions by internal and external customers
Work independently with minimal supervision by first line supervisor or government client
Required:
Four (4) or more years experience maintaining security posture of the customer's compute environments, including cloud environments
Experience managing the full lifecycle of, and workflows for, security accreditation projects under the ICD503 Rev. 4 framework
Extensive knowledge of customer's information system security policies, and risk management framework
Five (5) or more years experience creating and maintaining security system plans (SSP) and other security relevant documentation for computer systems and applications
Desired:
Demonstrated ability to effectively engage with customer Information System Security Managers (ISSMs) to ensure security compliance of systems
Experience obtaining IC reciprocity for at least one security accreditation project
Security Clearance: TS/SCI with Full Scope Polygraph (FSP)

This position requires a U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

160181

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Herndon, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
56,Space Systems - Senior Level - Concept of Operations (CONOPs) Responsible Systems Engineer (RSE),-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence & Space Systems is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence & Space Systems. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The Systems Engineering Center (SEC) is seeking strong, technically sound engineers committed and passionate about creating innovative, cost-effective solutions for complex remote sensing applications. In this role you will be the Concept of Operations (CONOPs) Responsible Systems Engineer (RSE) of a payload. The successful candidate will be a member of the Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance and Communications Department. In this position you will take ownership the Concept of Operations document, Users Guide, and Command and Telemetry Database. Responsibilities include verification and validation of the CONOPs requirements. The CONOPs RSE will also collaborate with the team performing system level test to provide technical expertise in the payload commanding and operation per the CONOPs document and C&T Database. The CONOPs RSE will also support Failure Review Board for quick resolution of anomalies found during testing. This position requires proactive interaction and collaboration with external customers and consultant in addition to various engineering functions and disciplines on the internal team.

Required Skills:
Minimum 10 years of engineering experience
Experience with the development and maintenance of concept of operations (CONOPs) documents
Experience with the development and maintenance of a command and telemetry database (C&T DB)
Strong experience in functional and performance test execution, or, collaboration / support of test execution from the CONOPs and C&T DB perspective
Experience with requirements verification, validation and sell-off including verification report generation and review
Experience with supporting formal reviews such as Test Readiness Review (TRR), Engineering Review Board (ERB), Failure Review Board (FRB), or Consent to Ship Review (CTSR)
Experience working with external customers and consultants
Demonstrated problem solving, organization, coordination, and planning skills
Team oriented individual with strong interpersonal communication and technical writing skills to enable effective personal interaction and collaboration with a multi-discipline team
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI within last 24 months required
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems
Desired Skills:
Experience in Space Systems
Experience with payload level CONOPs and command and telemetry database
Knowledge of Electrical-Optical / Infrared (EO/IR) payloads
Flexibility in capabilities and willingness to support the team across various systems engineering, integration, and test roles to support program success
Pro-active and self-motivated individual
Demonstrated proficiency in analytical skills, strong written and verbal communication capability, and ability to work in an integrated product team environment
Experience in support of generating Verification Compliance Requirements Matrices, Requirements Verification Plans, Test Requirements Documents, Test Procedures and Requirements Sell-off Documents
Education:
Bachelors degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math (STEM), or Masters degree in relevant field with 10+ years of engineering experience
#IdeasInOrbit
169378

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
57,Lead Information Security Engineer - Infrastructure,$83k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"BigCommerce is disrupting the e-commerce industry as the SaaS leader for fast-growing, mid-market businesses. We enable our customers to build intuitive and engaging stores to support every stage of their growth.

BigCommerce is growing our cybersecurity team. You will influence the culture and direction moving forward.

As the BigCommerce e-commerce SaaS platform handles information at a large scale, we need to anticipate and protect against attackers targeting BigCommerce or our customers. As a Lead Information Security Engineer, you will perform realistic offensive security exercises to simulate real attacks, to test and improve our detection and response capabilities, and to identify how attackers could infiltrate and move inside our infrastructure.

You will work closely with team members and affected product teams to improve our detection capabilities and design defense-in-depth controls that limit attackers' ability to move inside our network. Whether working on our Google Cloud systems, researching the latest in computer technology or keeping BigCommerce internal systems humming, BigCommerce customers rely on us to keep things running. We're back-end experts: protecting privacy and ensuring the security of our platform.

We are looking for a full-time Lead Information Security Engineer, who wants to make an impact at every level of society through protecting more than 60,000 merchants sitting on the BigCommerce e-commerce SaaS platform. By protecting our merchants, you will be powering innovators, creative thinkers, entrepreneurs and business owners around the world to be successful at each stage of their business.

The Lead Information Security Engineer will direct the work of the Cybersecurity Infrastructure Security Team. In this role, they will monitor, analyze, and detect Cyber vulnerabilities, events and incidents within information systems and networks. Lead Cyber Defense efforts to maintain our security toolsets, establish a framework by which cyber risk can be measured and quantified. Conduct multiple-disciplined penetration tests. Development of domain or problem-specific tools that leverage identified vulnerabilities, research on the latest exploitation techniques and threat vectors, and design and configuration of representative test environments. They will support various training events and mentor others.

Their main mission is to lead the Information Security Operations team to excellence in their efforts to protect the BigCommerce platform and BigCommerce customers and employees from cyber threats.

What you'll do:
Evangelize security within BigCommerce
Protect BigCommerce merchants, their shoppers, and the company
Seamlessly improve BigCcommerce's security posture with minimal impact to our employee's daily operations
Assess security on existing infrastructures
Respond to information security incidents, providing technical expertise and conduct forensics
Reduce time-to-detect and time-to-remediate by driving the automation of security event management, vulnerability assessment, and intelligence correlation
Provide security guidance and experience to engineering teams
Provide domain expertise regarding security events that impact applications and network design
Mentoring team members in best practice around information security standards
Design secure information systems that protect company data, empower users and drive business growth
Regular and ongoing pen testing of BigCommerce's changing environment
Utilize data to help generate insights into threats and build solutions
Who you are:
Bachelor's degree in CS, EE or MIS; or equivalent experience
7 + years of experience in security engineering, system and network security, cloud security, authentication and security protocols, cryptography, and infrastructure security
Passion for Information Security
Experience using various penetration testing tools (e.g. such as, Burp Suite, Metasploit, Nessus, etc.) on Windows and Linux
Have supported PCI, ISO 27001, and SOX audits
Develops scripts, tools, methodologies and best practices to improve team capabilities (e.g. SIEM)
Knowledge of security testing standards and practices (is a must)
Proficient in Identity Management best practices
Scripting skills (e.g. Python / Perl / Ruby, shell scripting) a significant plus
Experience in using network protocol analyzers and sniffers, as well as the ability to decipher packet captures
Excellent verbal and written communication
Proven ability to work effectively with stakeholders, staff, vendors, and external consultants
Exceptional ability to provide a high level of support with a customer first attitude
Exceptional ability to seek out opportunities to increase internal client satisfaction and deepen client relationships
Passionate about technology, and a strong desire to make our environment better
Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
A desire to help and train users so they better understand the solutions we offer
Presentation experience, conferences, white papers, bug bounties are a plus most Welcome.
Desired but not mandatory, relevant information security certifications (e.g. OSCP, OSCE, SANS GCIA, SANS GCIH, SANS GPEN, SANS GCFA and CISSP)
Diversity & Inclusion at BigCommerce

We have the opportunity to build not only a great business, but a great company, with soul. Our beliefs and commitment to diversity and inclusion are a central part of achieving that.

Our dedication to diversity and inclusion is grounded in two things: a moral belief in the dignity, value, and potential of every individual, and a practical belief that diverse, inclusive teams will create the best outcomes for our customers, partners, employees, and company. We welcome everyone to be a part of our journey.

Current BigCommerce Employees: Please use the internal job board to apply for openings.

#LI-GC1",4.2,"BigCommerce
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
58,Oracle DBA / Systems Network Engineer,$47k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor's degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 5 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 3 years of relevant experience. Agile experience preferred.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Department of Defense Top Secret security clearance is required at time of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

General Dynamics Mission Systems has an immediate opening for a Oracle DBA/Systems Network Engineer. This position provides an opportunity to further advance the cutting-edge technology that supports some of our nation’s core defense/intelligence services and systems. General Dynamics Mission Systems employees work closely with esteemed customers to develop solutions that allow them to carry out high-stakes national security missions.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

Performs Oracle Database Administration
Performs requirements analysis, requirements definition, requirements management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, detail trade studies, systems integration and test (verification), validation and interface definition studies of subsystem or system elements under supervision of the lead systems engineer
Performs technical planning, cost and risk analyses, and supportability and effectiveness analyses for subsystems and system elements
Performs customer requirements analysis, develops system requirements and defines allocations to lower levels (elements and components)
Performs detailed technical analyses for a subsystem or system elements
Develops and evaluates systems, networks and information systems to ensure designs meet applicable governmental security specifications
May provide system accreditation/certification evaluation and test support to ensure all technical security features (e.g., identification, authentication, access control, labeling, and auditing) of the system are considered and function properly
May develop system security documentation on both new and fielded information systemsÂ
Participates in Modeling and Simulation
Researches and analyzes data, such as vendor products, COTS components, GFE/CFE, specifications, and manuals to determine feasibility of design or application
Supports the generation of technical engineering products by using the appropriate standards, processes, procedures, and tools throughout the system development life cycle\May provide leadership and/or direction to lower level employees
Independently determines proposed approach to solutions
Contributes to the completion of major programs and projects
Plans and executes project tasks for activities described above
Creative, innovative responsibilities requiring advanced decision-making skills
Defines processes for technical platforms, system specifications, input/output and working parameters for hardware and/or software compatibility
Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions
Designs a complete and complex framework, system or product
Identifies, analyzes and resolves system design weaknesses
Regular contact with senior levels of internal work groups
Works under limited direction
Contact with Deputy Program Managers Engineering (DPME) and other professionals within the Engineering department and with project teams across the company
Frequent contact with external customers
Travel may be required
Provides resolution to a diverse range of complex problems
Independently determines approach to solution

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Oracle database experience
Windows client/server and VMware vSphere/vCenter Engineering and design
Windows 2003-2012 Domain design and engineering with Active Directory, DNS, RemoteApp and all other Microsoft technologies.
Configuration and management of Cisco switchgear
General networking knowledge required including architecture and hardware
Video and data storage management
Knowledgeable in RAID configuration
Server authentication
Server virtualization
Security setting and hardening for systems
Proficient use and understanding of systems engineering concepts, principles, and theories
Proficient knowledge of other related disciplines
Proficient with requirements management & system modeling tools
Recognizes various architectural patterns
Proficient in Microsoft Office applications
Proficient written and verbal communications skills
Able to sell concepts and ideas
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Proficient ability to grasp and apply new information quickly and effectively handle complex assignments
Shows initiative on assignments, exercises independent judgment and professionally executes projects with little direction
Proficient ability in communicating issues, impacts, and corrective actions
Proficient ability to clearly report relevant to sound systems engineering design

#CJ2

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 12,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran

To learn more about the General Dynamics Mission Systems Pittsfield facility, click HERE.",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Pittsfield, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
59,Actuarial Data Engineer,$78k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Actuarial Data Engineer

About Swiss Re Corporate Solutions

Swiss Re is one of the world’s leading providers of reinsurance, insurance and other forms of insurance-based risk transfer. We anticipate and manage risks, from natural catastrophes and climate change to cybercrime.

Swiss Re Corporate Solutions is the commercial insurance arm of the Swiss Re Group. We offer innovative insurance solutions to large and midsized multinational corporations from our approximately 50 locations worldwide. We help clients mitigate their risk exposure, whilst our industry-leading claims service provides them with additional peace of mind.

Swiss Re Corporate Solutions offers a flexible working environment where curious and adaptable people thrive. Are you interested in joining us?

About the Role

The Corporate Solutions actuarial team is looking for a data engineer to partner with the actuaries in providing industry-leading loss propensity projections. Specifically, the role will be responsible for:

Building data assets to facilitate loss analysis
Automating reports to reduce manual effort
Streamlining actuarial methods to increase turnaround time

Based on experience and interest, this role may evolve to include extraction of external data for internal analysis, development of portfolio analytics, and application of data science techniques to improve estimates.

About the Team

We are the actuarial team providing support to multiple Corporate Solutions insurance businesses across North and Latin America. Key responsibilities for our team include the calculation of portfolio loss projections, development of rating plans, and selection of costing parameters. To achieve these goals, we seek to use innovative data sources and analytical models to improve traditional actuarial methods and refine our estimates of loss exposure. This role will report directly to the Head of Actuarial Data & Analytics for the Americas within Corporate Solutions.

About You
Experience with SQL, Python, and R required
Familiarity with Spark SQL, PySpark, JavaScript and APIs preferred
Bachelor or Master's Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, Statistics or other relevant quantitative field
Strong work ethic and self-starter who can deliver results quickly
Good communication skills and the ability to translate technical concepts
Knowledge of insurance concepts preferred but not required.

Swiss Re is an equal opportunity employer. It is our practice to recruit, hire and promote without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, age, pregnancy, sexual orientations, marital status, military status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Decisions on employment are solely based on an individual's qualifications for the position being filled.

During the recruitment process, reasonable accommodations for disabilities are available upon request. If contacted for an interview, please inform the Recruiter/HR Professional of the accommodation needed.",3.9,"Swiss Re
3.9","Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1863,Company - Public,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
60,Software Engineer Mid to Senior Level - UAS,$60k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented mid to senior level Software Engineer to join a diverse team to create unique solutions for complex problems. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The position involves joining a team whose responsibility is to create software that trains our armed forces to operate an Unmanned Aerial System (UAS). Direct communication with customers, end users, and team members occur on a regular basis.

The team consists of exceptionally talented developers with strong fundamental skills that collaborate in high-performance fashion to achieve challenging objectives. The team follows Agile software development practices, shares a passion for solving complex problems, delivering exceptional software, improving software development processes, and exceeding customer expectations.

IND3
Basic Qualifications


Candidate must possess a Bachelor's Degree or Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or equivalent. A candidate with a Bachelor’s Degree must have 5 years of relevant experience or 3 years of experience with a Master’s Degree. Candidate must demonstrate knowledge of C#, .NET, C++, or Java as well as data structures, object-oriented design, and effective unit and software integration testing.

Candidate must have experience developing and/or integrating distributed system software components with an understanding of network protocols, concurrency, and asynchronous communication.

Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications


Knowledge and experience with one or more of the following are a plus:

- Agile software methodologies (e.g., Scrum)

- .NET technologies such as WCF and WPF

- Modern C++ (e.g., C++11, C++17)

- Git and Azure DevOps Server

- Reverse engineering and debugging

- Design patterns

- Socket-based communication protocols (e.g., DIS, CIGI)

Examples of programming completed as part of the candidate’s undergraduate or graduate degree program, or as developed and maintained for hobby/recreational purposes, are highly desired for review and evaluation (e.g., links to personal GitHub account are acceptable).

Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.07.03-135

Closing Date:
09/30/2020

#CJ

#LI",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
61,Software Engineer - Machine Learning/AI,-1,"Software Engineer - Machine Learning/AI

Expedition Technology is currently searching for a mid to senior level Software Engineer who will develop, maintain, and enhance complex software systems. The applications we develop integrate cutting edge areas of software development with a focus on machine learning and process-intense computing, novel algorithm development, manipulation of extremely large data sets, and real-time systems.

Our Software Engineers responsibilities will include working closely with other engineers to develop software products within an R&D environment and provide guidance on writing code that will enable machine learning applications running novel algorithms to work efficiently. He or she will resolve software problem reports and utilize software design methodologies appropriate to the development environment. There will also be opportunities for system design, to include hardware/software trade offs, software reuse, as well as requirements analysis and synthesis from system level to individual software components.

QUALIFICATIONS
Must be a US Citizen and able to obtain a US Government security clearance of Top Secret or higher.
3 years + experience with full-stack software product development within a Linux-based environment
Knowledge of any or all of the following languages: C++, Python, Java, Javascript (Python is primary language used.)
Bachelors degree in computer science or a related discipline from an accredited school (4 years of additional experience may be substituted for such a degree)
Strong communication skills and a willingness to collaborate in a team-oriented environment
Expedition Technology is an employee-owned defense and aerospace technology small business that has become a market leader in developing software applications running advanced machine learning algorithms for the DOD and Intelligence Communities. We offer a collaborative team-based culture, a people-first mentality and a focus on cutting edge solutions.

We offer self-directed, company-paid, comprehensive medical, dental and vision benefits. Additionally, our team enjoys a 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off, tuition reimbursement programs and a student loan repayment option. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud that our dynamic and collaborative culture along with our generous benefits package allowed us to earn a spot on the 2019 Washington Business Journal's Best Places to Work List.

If you are interested in seeing for yourself why our employees' voices made us a Best Place to Work, we'd love to talk with you.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
62,Enterprise Data Steward Leader Virtual Hiring Event,-1,"PepsiCo: Hiring Innovative Technology Leaders Now!

Event Details
Date: Thursday, October 22, 2020

What We're Hiring For

SAP IT Functional Sr Specialist (Order to Cash- Pricing / Rebates)

IT SAP MasterData Conversions Lead

Route Planning and Optimization Systems Engineer

Security Compliance Lead

Enterprise Data Steward Leader

Intake Details:

Requirements

Please apply the role you are interviewing for using the link(s) above.

PepsiCo is hosting virtual hiring events on October 20 and October 22. Please RSVP to one event only. Each interview will be approximately 15-30 minutes long depending on volume of interviews in a single hour.

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Please be prepared to share your best elevator pitch so that we can use the time wisely to get to know you and answer your questions!

What to wear

Dress code is casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About PepsiCo

PepsiCo is one of the world's leading food and beverage companies in the world, with products enjoyed by consumers more than 1 billion times a day in more than 200 countries and territories. Our global reach and iconic brands make us one of the most dynamic global companies, while our tight-knit culture means we are consistently ranked as one of the best places to work.

Our technology divisions unlock digital capabilities, enhance cybersecurity safeguards, deliver data-driven insights, and create unmatched consumer and customer experiences. At PepsiCo, we know our associates make us great — that’s why raising the bar on talent and diversity is a cornerstone of our company’s value system.

Most importantly, at PepsiCo we are focused on Winning with Purpose. That means we integrate purpose into our business strategy and leverage the power of our brands to make the world a better place for the planet and our people.

We’re seeking talented individuals who will help us drive our digital transformation journey. Whether a data scientist, a technical team lead, or an engineer, we'd love to chat.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

The Enterprise Data Governance Steward Leader role is responsible for leading a global team that ensures the business and IT adhere to and maintain alignment to the Enterprise Data Governance's processes, rules and standards. The Enterprise Data Steward will act as the single point of contact for those creating and consuming data within their respected data domain(s). Additionally, they will be driving the team to interact directly with key domain and project stakeholders, other data stewards across the organization and relevant SMEs throughout the organization as necessary. This position will lead PepsiCo's Governance Council, of which they are accountable for the success of PepsiCo’s EDG program.

Please apply here: https://www.pepsicojobs.com/main/jobs/218498BR?lang=en-us&previousLocale=en-US",3.8,"PepsiCo
3.8","Purchase, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1965,Company - Public,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
63,Zscaler Support Engineer,-1,"Stage 2 Security (S2) is seeking an experienced Zscaler Support Engineer with a background in supporting large customers and / or Federal customers. Working with an enterprise network architecture and engineering team supporting our Federal customer, the Zscaler Support Engineer provides network engineering support and guidance into projects and application architecture. The Zscaler Support Engineer is responsible for the engineering, design, test, and implementation of secure and reliable network connectivity using the Zscaler suite of products (ZPA, ZIA, to include the Client Connector – formerly ZApp) leveraging the current network environment to facilitate secure access to applications and services in the cloud. Responsible for the support of the development of the Technical Requirements Document and a Detailed Design Document (DDD) for the network architecture, consistent with the associated Functional Requirements Document and DDD, before transitioning to Operations. Responsibility includes the support of all updates to all documents when there is change in the network design and/or technologies and collaborating with all stakeholders to test all related systems and application migration processes to verify that the systems meet requirements and can host applications with no degradation to performance or security. This engineer is responsible for the preparation of test reports and Implementation Plans for each change impacting the network environment.

Responsibilities:

Requirements gathering and testing.

Recommends information technology solutions to resolve customer problems.

Configure and tune an IT security system to optimize performance and/or alerting.

Integrate solutions with other technology solutions such as active directory, backups, networking devices, security solutions, etc.

Design data flow and engineer data life cycle to determine how data is originated, enriched, stored, and disposed to meets compliance and business requirements.

Produce documentation such as data flows, data dictionaries, user guides, or operating procedures, user guides, operating procedures, systems design document, disaster recovery documentation, etc.

Interface with company executives as well as government technical management or executive level personnel.

Experience building Secure Cloud Interconnect (SCI), Netbond, Direct Connect and VPN connections

Lead Migration from legacy VPN connectivity to Zscaler for the targeted user group(s)

Deploy and manage virtual servers in the cloud

Deploy and manage containers in the cloud

Deploy and manage elastic IPs and elastic network interfaces in the cloud

Deploy and manage cloud-based load balancing

Provides internal consulting, technical guidance, information and support to application developers, computer operations, company management and departmental clients. Assists in internal training programs

Must be able to work with minimal supervision and possess excellent written and verbal communication skills

Skills:

Strong understanding security threats, tactics, procedures, and remediation.

Understands a variety of IT products and protocols to integrate disparate solutions, such as routing and switching, software development, Linux, Windows, and/or cloud computing.

Previous experience implementing security controls in cloud environments.

Have experience in a variety of IT areas including networking, Linux, Windows server, cloud technologies, and virtualization

Programming language such as Python.

Minimum Requirements:

At least 10 years of hands-on experience in Network Design, Network Engineering, Network Operational Support and cloud engineering experience of Medium to Large enterprise network environments:

Zscaler Private Access (ZPA)

Zscaler Internet Access (ZIA)

Zscaler Client Connector – formerly ZApp

Palo Alto GlobalProtect

Experience with Cloud Service Routers (CSRv)

Experience building Secure Cloud Interconnect (SCI)

Experience migrating from legacy on-prem networking to the Cloud Networking

Experience with Cloud Identity and Access Management

Experience deploying and managing virtual servers in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing containers in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing elastic IPs and elastic network interfaces in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing Cloud based load balancers

Experience with implementing audit trails

Experience with Cloud based monitoring solutions

The physical demands of the job include bending, crawling, sitting, lifting 50lbs at most.

The Benefits:

As a certified “Great Place to Work”, S2 is a small business where people come first and we know and care about every employee. This drives us to provide the best possible benefits and we believe that the benefits we offer are a notch above the rest.

The Benefits at S2 include:

Medical & dental insurance premiums are 100% paid by S2 for the employee and eligible dependents

Up to $100 per month reimbursed for mobile phone expenses

Up to $50 per month reimbursed for home Internet access

Expenses paid for approved work-related training & conferences

Eligibility to participate in our 401k program after 90 days of employment

Competitive salary, which is paid bi-weekly (every other Friday)

3 weeks a year (15 days) of paid time off (PTO), accrued at 4.62 hours per pay period (includes vacation and sick time)

10 paid government holidays annually

Stage 2 Security welcomes and encourages diversity in the workplace regardless of race, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or veteran status.

If you are looking to make an impact, Stage 2 Security is the place for you.

Powered by JazzHR

F6IQn75BBO",-1,Stage 2 Security,"Kingstowne, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
64,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"At Tend, we’re combining top-notch care with soothing and safe environments, elevated hospitality, consumer-grade technology, and curated products to redefine going to the dentist as a whole-you wellness experience.

Reimagining dentistry takes a unique and diverse team, all working together through commitment, collaboration, and creativity to create the world’s first dental wellness experience. Join the team that makes going to the dentist an experience people look forward to.

We’re looking to add a Senior Data Engineer to our team who is experienced in creating SQL databases for a variety of applications and business uses. You’ll work across teams and use cutting edge tech to solve interesting, large-scale problems. Creating at a rapid pace you’ll make a direct and lasting impact anywhere that technology powers our business.
About the Role*
Design, implement and maintain reporting databases, data warehouse and OLAP data structures
Design, develop, test, deliver, and implement SQL solutions within ETL processes.
Manage day to day operations of multiple Microsoft SQL Server/Postgres databases.
Optimize databases for performance and scalability.
Develop, implement and optimize stored procedures and functions using T-SQL
Analyze, define, and document system requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls, and outputs.
Responsible for problem resolution, database configuration, capacity planning, performance tuning and optimizations.
Create and maintain database master plans, data dictionaries and disaster recovery documentation
Consults with internal and external clients to prototype, refine, test, and debug databases and obtain client approval.
Writes and maintains documentation to describe program development, logic, coding, testing, changes, and corrections.
Design, build, and deploy BI solutions (Looker)
Responsible for on-call emergency response during database failure.
Develops and maintains professional relationships
Promotes good working relationships among staff and between other disciplines and departments. Assumes individual accountability for own conduct and maintenance of professional attitude and appearance.
Approaches change in a positive manner, motivate staff to work as a team, accept constructive criticism and learn from it.
Must be able to apply principles of critical thinking to a variety of practical and emergent situations and accurately follow standardized procedures that may call for deviations.
Must be able to apply sound judgment beyond a specific set of instructions and apply knowledge to different factual situations.
Must be able to work under stress on a regular or continuous basis.
About You*
5+ years of experience with MSSQL/TSQL/BI
3+ years or more ETL concept exp
Bachelor’s degree.
Knowledge of dimensional and relational database models
Experience with web services (Both REST and SOAP).
Some programming experience.
Experience with MSSQL and/or Postgres
Our Goodie Bags are Pretty Impressive! *
Our comprehensive benefits & perks program will make you grin. Employer-sponsored healthcare coverage, 401(k) with an employer match, generous paid time off, a pre-tax commuter benefit, and much more!
Keeping the Tend Community Safe *
We’ve always been committed to providing the highest quality of care for our team and members. During this time, we are taking extra precautions to promote the health and safety of those who work and receive treatment at our studios. From enhanced PPE to sterilized equipment and staggered visit times with on-site temperature checks, we prioritize your health every step. For more information on how we’re making our dental visits safer, please visit: https://www.hellotend.com/notice
EEO Statement*
We are committed to promoting a work environment in which differences are respected, employees are treated fairly and individual contributions are valued and rewarded. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.

This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $102,859.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
Will you now, or in the future, require sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g. H-1B visa status)?
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Tend
3.5","Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
65,Staff Data Engineer,-1,"Checkr's mission is to build a fairer future by improving understanding of the past. We believe all candidates, regardless of who they are, should have a fair chance to work. Established in 2014 and valued at $2.2B, Checkr is using technology to bring hiring to the next level. Our People Trust Platform uses machine learning to help thousands of companies modernize their background check process and make hiring safer, more efficient, and more inclusive. Some of our customers include, Uber, Instacart, Doordash, Netflix, Compass Group, and Adecco.

A career with Checkr is an opportunity to work with some of the best and brightest minds, disrupt an industry for a better future, and give otherwise overlooked candidates access to employment. Checkr has been recognized in Forbes Best Startup Employers and is a top Y Combinator company by valuation.

We are looking for a Staff Data Engineer with a strong foundation in architecting modern cloud-based data pipelines that help to empower data-driven decision making across teams and organizations. As Checkr scales, so does the need to evolve our underlying data infrastructure. You will have the opportunity to work with key business stakeholders and engineering partners to help shape the long-term data strategy of our company and to build a data ecosystem that supports that strategy. While our current data platform uses Snowflake, dbt, Airflow, Kafka, and Spark, you will also evaluate open-source tools and vendors that expand our data capabilities. You will help ensure that our foundational data services and processes scale together with the rest of the company. This is an exciting opportunity to play a crucial role in the growth of Checkr!

Responsibilities:
Build, maintain and optimize critical data pipelines that serve as the foundation for Checkr's data platform and products,
Build tools that help streamline the management and operation of our data ecosystem,
Architect systems for scale and security to keep up with a huge influx of data as Checkr continues to grow,
Architect systems that empower repeatable and scalable machine learning workflows,
Identify innovative applications of data that can enable new products or insights and enable other teams at Checkr to maximize their own impact
What you bring:
6+ years of industry-related experience in a backend or data engineering role and a Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience.
Experience architecting, developing and maintaining production data services
Familiarity with modern CI/CD practices and tools (e.g., gitlab and kubernetes)
Experience and passion for mentoring other data engineers
Deep programming expertise in Python and SQL
What you get:
A fast-paced and collaborative environment
Competitive compensation and opportunity for advancement
100% medical, dental and vision coverage
Unlimited PTO policy
Fitness reimbursements
Equal Employment Opportunities at Checkr

Checkr is committed to hiring talented and qualified individuals with diverse backgrounds for all of its tech, non-tech, and leadership roles. Checkr believes that the gathering and celebration of unique backgrounds, qualities, and cultures enriches the workplace.

Checkr also welcomes the opportunity to consider qualified applicants with prior arrest or conviction records. Checkr's commitment to diversity extends to hiring talented individuals in spite of a prior criminal history in accordance with local, state, and/or federal laws, including the San Francisco's Fair Chance Ordinance.",4.0,"Checkr
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,Zscaler Support Engineer,-1,"Stage 2 Security (S2) is seeking an experienced Zscaler Support Engineer with a background in supporting large customers and / or Federal customers. Working with an enterprise network architecture and engineering team supporting our Federal customer, the Zscaler Support Engineer provides network engineering support and guidance into projects and application architecture. The Zscaler Support Engineer is responsible for the engineering, design, test, and implementation of secure and reliable network connectivity using the Zscaler suite of products (ZPA, ZIA, to include the Client Connector – formerly ZApp) leveraging the current network environment to facilitate secure access to applications and services in the cloud. Responsible for the support of the development of the Technical Requirements Document and a Detailed Design Document (DDD) for the network architecture, consistent with the associated Functional Requirements Document and DDD, before transitioning to Operations. Responsibility includes the support of all updates to all documents when there is change in the network design and/or technologies and collaborating with all stakeholders to test all related systems and application migration processes to verify that the systems meet requirements and can host applications with no degradation to performance or security. This engineer is responsible for the preparation of test reports and Implementation Plans for each change impacting the network environment.

Responsibilities:

Requirements gathering and testing.

Recommends information technology solutions to resolve customer problems.

Configure and tune an IT security system to optimize performance and/or alerting.

Integrate solutions with other technology solutions such as active directory, backups, networking devices, security solutions, etc.

Design data flow and engineer data life cycle to determine how data is originated, enriched, stored, and disposed to meets compliance and business requirements.

Produce documentation such as data flows, data dictionaries, user guides, or operating procedures, user guides, operating procedures, systems design document, disaster recovery documentation, etc.

Interface with company executives as well as government technical management or executive level personnel.

Experience building Secure Cloud Interconnect (SCI), Netbond, Direct Connect and VPN connections

Lead Migration from legacy VPN connectivity to Zscaler for the targeted user group(s)

Deploy and manage virtual servers in the cloud

Deploy and manage containers in the cloud

Deploy and manage elastic IPs and elastic network interfaces in the cloud

Deploy and manage cloud-based load balancing

Provides internal consulting, technical guidance, information and support to application developers, computer operations, company management and departmental clients. Assists in internal training programs

Must be able to work with minimal supervision and possess excellent written and verbal communication skills

Skills:

Strong understanding security threats, tactics, procedures, and remediation.

Understands a variety of IT products and protocols to integrate disparate solutions, such as routing and switching, software development, Linux, Windows, and/or cloud computing.

Previous experience implementing security controls in cloud environments.

Have experience in a variety of IT areas including networking, Linux, Windows server, cloud technologies, and virtualization

Programming language such as Python.

Minimum Requirements:

At least 10 years of hands-on experience in Network Design, Network Engineering, Network Operational Support and cloud engineering experience of Medium to Large enterprise network environments:

Zscaler Private Access (ZPA)

Zscaler Internet Access (ZIA)

Zscaler Client Connector – formerly ZApp

Palo Alto GlobalProtect

Experience with Cloud Service Routers (CSRv)

Experience building Secure Cloud Interconnect (SCI)

Experience migrating from legacy on-prem networking to the Cloud Networking

Experience with Cloud Identity and Access Management

Experience deploying and managing virtual servers in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing containers in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing elastic IPs and elastic network interfaces in the Cloud

Experience deploying and managing Cloud based load balancers

Experience with implementing audit trails

Experience with Cloud based monitoring solutions

The physical demands of the job include bending, crawling, sitting, lifting 50lbs at most.

The Benefits:

As a certified “Great Place to Work”, S2 is a small business where people come first and we know and care about every employee. This drives us to provide the best possible benefits and we believe that the benefits we offer are a notch above the rest.

The Benefits at S2 include:

Medical & dental insurance premiums are 100% paid by S2 for the employee and eligible dependents

Up to $100 per month reimbursed for mobile phone expenses

Up to $50 per month reimbursed for home Internet access

Expenses paid for approved work-related training & conferences

Eligibility to participate in our 401k program after 90 days of employment

Competitive salary, which is paid bi-weekly (every other Friday)

3 weeks a year (15 days) of paid time off (PTO), accrued at 4.62 hours per pay period (includes vacation and sick time)

10 paid government holidays annually

Stage 2 Security welcomes and encourages diversity in the workplace regardless of race, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or veteran status.

If you are looking to make an impact, Stage 2 Security is the place for you.

Powered by JazzHR

F6IQn75BBO",-1,Stage 2 Security,"Kingstowne, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
67,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"About Narrativ

Narrativ is a technology platform for brands to unlock, manage, and grow their share of product reviews on the open web.

Why is this important? We've seen a decade's worth of e-commerce growth in 2020, and the emergence of a smarter consumer who demands a better way to buy than ads. They're turning to expert product reviews on trusted sources ranging from The New York Times to their favorite YouTuber. But only Amazon is reaping the benefits today, commanding a $40B monopoly on product reviews online.

Narrativ's patented technology empowers everyone to win. We build the tech and tools to turn honest reviews that tell the whole story about a product into a multibillion dollar acquisition channel for all brands. Teams at Sephora, Best Buy, L'Oreal and hundreds of others already partner with Narrativ to yield more efficient results than Facebook and Google.

Our work breaking Amazon's monopoly and fixing broken and out-of-stock links on the Internet has gotten us recognized by The World Economic Forum as a Technology Pioneer and by Fast Company as one of the best places to work for innovators.

Why you should work here:
We're growing, fast: Narrativ's platform hosts 50+ partners spending $20mm+ a year including Best Buy, L'Oreal, Sephora, Bed Bath & Beyond, Home Depot, Nordstrom, and Samsung. We've doubled revenue so far in 2020.
We have a talented team: We're a team of 50+ from places like Amazon, Facebook, Google, and Etsy with a female founder that's been awarded by the Financial Times, Forbes, and Inc. We're hiring quickly, with plans to double our team in the next year.
We're challenging the status quo: Breaking monopolies and diversifying industries is in our DNA. Come join us on our mission to democratize product recommendations for all and build a better internet for shoppers.
Come join us on our mission to build a better Internet for shoppers!

The Job:
A data engineer at Narrativ will build and scale a first-class data platform. You understand the history of batch and streaming big data systems, know when awk outperforms Hadoop map-reduce, and have spent a lot of time thinking about the best ways to handle schema drift. You care deeply about making scalable systems from simple, reliable, and correct building blocks. You can explain the advantages and disadvantages of a wide range of data structures depending on the desired use case. You can articulate when a general solution is good enough, and when a specialized solution is necessary.

You are Narrativ's Data Engineer

Mission
Build and maintain batch and streaming data systems
Enable scalability and observability for batch and realtime data streams
Collaborate and build tools so all engineers can easily ""do the right thing"" with regard to scalable batch and streaming data requirements.
Key Results
Merchant product feed can ingest datasets of 10M+
Create performant and straightforward patterns for OLTP, OLAP, streaming ingest and enrichment, creating search indexes, etc
Requirements
5+ years of experience with big data systems such as Hadoop, Spark, Flink, Kafka, Storm, Heron, NiFi, Hive, etc
Understanding of different serialization and storage formats like Avro, Parquet, Thrift, Protocol Buffers, FlatBuffers, JSON, CSV, XML
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL), non-relational (Redis, Cassandra/Scylla), and warehouses (Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery
Experience with streaming data technologies and patterns
Experience with orchestration frameworks like Airflow, Oozie
Expertise in a general purpose programming language
Strong experience in SQL

Bonus
Expertise in Scala, Java, or Kotlin
Experience in Elixir
Working knowledge of probabilistic data structures and algorithms like count-min sketch, hyperloglog, bloom filters, reservoir sampling, etc
Important Notice: We are putting the health and safety of our employees first. For the balance of 2020, we'll be working from home. WIth so much uncertainty in the world, this is a decision that helped eliminate the anxiety associated with commuting and gave our teammates one less thing to worry about.

Narrativ is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.",3.6,"Narrativ
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
68,Senior Software Engineer - Java Developer,$90k-$120k (Employer Est.),"Senior Software Engineer - Java Developer
Location


New Jersey, Camden

Job Code

32406

# of Openings

1

Apply Now

Primary responsibilities include supervising development cycles and managing business expectations for distributed applications that drive Subaru of America’s multi-tier systems supporting MySubaru Customer Web Portals and Telematics Applications.

The following duties are expected of the individual in this role:
Should be able to play a key role in providing estimates, perform technical reviews, providing technical leadership to the team.
Strong analytical, problem solving, debugging skills.
Good technical documentation skills.
Coordinate project work with the development and QA testing teams. Must execute code reviews. Must be able to provide technical direction to the development team.
Work with business partners and outside vendors to collect and confirm project business requirements.
Ensure work is completed on time and in accordance with our coding standards, conventions, and practices.
Work independently on long term projects, conduct meetings with stakeholders to see projects through.
Development of web applications, web components, and web services.
Follow the complete life-cycle of a project from conception to deployment.
Architect new projects with the Manager of Application Development.
Follow project specifications to complete tasks.
Troubleshooting and debugging.
Test and manage project deployments and production releases.
Maintains current knowledge of IT development methodology, architecture design, and technical standards. Ability to lead and mentor developers.
Communicates with project manager on a frequent basis. Identifies tasks and issues that may have an impact on service levels or schedules. Provides realistic task deliverables estimates.
Strong abilities to analyze data, conduct research, think analytically and work in a diverse group situation
Experience in working with offshore teams is a Plus
High level of organizational, written and oral communication skills
Experience in Automobile Domain is a Plus
Education/Experience:

The ideal candidate will possess a BA/BS degree in Computer Science (Masters degree in Computer Science a plus) with 6 plus years of overall development and 3 plus years of enterprise software experience. Must have excellent verbal communication, written communication, and social interaction skills.

Tech Skill Requirements:
6+ years of experience in Java, J2EE in a large enterprise environment.
Experience in providing support to production systems, Troubleshoot production issues, perform root cause analysis and implement fixes
Strong experience with Core Java, Servlets, JSP, JDBC, JSTL
Should have strong experience in Spring framework– Spring Core, Spring MVC, Spring data JPA, Spring Security
Hands on Experience in ORM frameworks like Hibernate, IBatis
Experience in developing REST and SOAP web services and Microservices
Experience with scripting languages like JavaScript, JQuery is mandatory.
Experience in developing web-based applications using HTML, CSS, Ajax, Bootstrap 3.x
Experience in AngularJS is preferable
Experience developing SOA Suite (OSB, BPEL) services and composite applications is preferable.
Good knowledge and experience with Oracle 11g/12c
Prior experience with Apache Tomcat and Apache webservers
Good hands on in using IDEs like MyEclipse/NetBeans
Should have used SVN for branching and merging of code and good with version control
Experience with handling tools & utilities like Maven, Jenkins, SonarQube, SQL Developer/SQL Navigator etc.
Must be open to providing off-hours production support.",3.8,"Subaru of America
3.8","Camden, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1968,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
69,Radar Systems Engineer,-1,"The Systems Integration and Test's Missile Defense Programs Department currently has an opportunity for a talented engineer in the integration and test of hardware and software of Radar systems. The Missile Defense Programs Department provides system engineering, integration, and test expertise to the radar and sensor systems programs within RMD. In this role you will may perform various engineering activities depending on your experience and skill level, such as system test requirements development, planning, execution, and analysis for system integration and verification in hardware-in-the-loop facilities, flight tests, and sell-off of production radar systems; technical support on-site and as reach-back for deployed sensor systems; and modeling and simulation.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Support planning, design and execution of integration and verification tests for hardware and software modifications
Support Flight Test planning, execution, analysis, and reporting
Prepare plans, procedures, and test cases
Develop detailed integration information sheets and detailed verification information sheets
Update the engineering test environment for use by the hardware, software and systems test teams including configuration management of hardware, software and firmware
Perform work on DOORS requirements database to update and maintain the Verification Cross Reference Matrix
Perform integration and test activities at the specified CONUS location
Support Acceptance Testing and DD250 of radar
Required Skills:
Minimum 6 years of experience in an engineering role with system integration or test of DoD systems
Experience working with EO/IR sensors, RF/Radar sensors, missiles/interceptors, ICBM / hypersonic / MRM / SRM threats, discrimination analysis, detection/tracking, or Command and Control (e.g., C3I, C4I, etc.)
Experience with creating plans, test scripts, and/or conducting performance analysis
Experience with programming in MATLAB, C/C++, Python, or other programming language
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
Desired Skills:
Familiarity X-Band radar technology (such as AN/TPY-2, SBX, etc.)
Experience as a radar systems engineer with one or more of the following; developing radars or radar sub-systems, operating radars, testing radars, developing software for radar systems
Familiarity with Early Warning radar technology (UEWR, Cobra Dane, etc)
Experience with root cause analysis of radar systems and interoperability
Master's Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics or related technical discipline
Understanding of radar signal and data processing
Strong MATLAB knowledge and experience
Experience with DOORS or related database
Required Education:

Bachelors Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics) or related discipline

169096

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Woburn, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
70,Software Engineer/ Administrator,-1,"FFT, a leader in foam fabrication, has an opening for a Software Engineer/Administrator to join the team at their Corporate facility in New Richmond. Primary responsibilities will include research, design, and development of software applications, in conjunction with a manufacturing environment, by performing the following duties:

• Customize Epicor ERP 10 (Enterprise Resource Planning) Software & SSRS development.

• Work with key users to understand current business processes to aid in the development of design requirements.

• Manages facilities and corporate with multi-company and inter-company integration projects for the organization while acting as a champion to adhere to company best practices and standards.

• Aid users in troubleshooting issues in day-to-day operations of the ERP applications

• Works with the software team on the development, implementation, installation, and operation of ERP systems upgrades for the organization. Manages and audits aspects of functional systems.

• Work with software team and key users in the organization to develop software system testing, programming, and documentation procedures.

• ERP and SQL systems administration, process scheduling, and support of EDI processing.

• Works with key user and customers to fulfill specific requirements from Quote to Cash process, including labeling, shipping and EDI Inbound, outbound document needs.

• Control security and access with the ERP applications per corporate guidelines.

• Be part of a team responsible for learning and understanding the ERP systems and processes used by Federal Foam Technologies in order to support existing applications and to define, test and implement enhancements and updates. Process mapping background is a plus.

• Monitors help desk reporting and call system as needed. Responds to calls as applies to your area and\\or as assigned.

Qualified candidate will have a Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university in and a minimum of three years of related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience, and ability to utilize the following technologies proficiently:

SSRS Reporting Development and SQL Administration

SQL Query Development and Analysis, Object Oriented Design, C#

MRP/ERP and Financial Systems, including EDI, Engineering, Shop Floor, Shipping Integration

Microsoft Office 365 experience

Experience with Data Analytics and Dashboards

Strong problem solving skills with ability to prioritize multiple projects

Excellent verbal and written communication with strong problem solving and organizational skills

Software development life cycle and Agile methodologies, Knowledge of Azure DevOps a plus

Ability to utilize resources to keep up with new technology

SharePoint Administration and User Support a plus

Experience with Epicor ERP 10 Software, including development and support of dashboards, queries, BPM directives, customizations and reports.

We offer a competitive comp/benefit package including a matching 401k plan. If you are interested in being considered for this position, please send a resume with cover letter to:

Federal Foam Technologies, Inc.
Attn: Human Resources
600 Wisconsin Drive
New Richmond, WI 54017

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",4.7,"Federal Foam Technologies, Inc.
4.7","New Richmond, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
71,System Integration Engineer,-1,"System Integration Engineer
Job Description *
Are you an experienced systems engineer who enjoys tackling hard scientific problems? Promaxo, a diverse, passionate, and growing team, is seeking an organized and self-motivated professional to fill our newly created System Integration Engineer position. You will significantly contribute to building next generation point-of-care MRI systems with sophisticated mechanical, electrical, and software components. Your primary responsibilities include:

• You will be the subject matter expert in systems engineering. You understand the existing and emerging technology factors, best practices and lessons learned, skillset requirements, implementation options and the factors thereof, and the schedule, cost, and performance implications of hardware and software engineering cycles.

• You will lead a small group of engineers and technicians in designing and prototyping our
MRI systems.

• You will be responsible for the success of multiple projects, including product design and transferring into production.

Are you interested in applying your skills towards developing novel low-field MRI systems? As we control hardware design, manufacturing, data processing, and software engineering, our office is a truly inspiring mix of experts from a variety of domains.
Requirements *
• PhD in Mechanical, Electrical, Biomedical Engineering, Physics, or closely related field with at least 5 years of relevant R&D lab experience in conceiving, planning, and conducting research and analysis for complex technological problems of considerable hardware engineering scope.

• At least 3 years of experience leading small teams in providing support in hardware engineering and integration.

• Experience providing rapid prototyping or development, designing and prototyping PCBs, working with laboratory equipment including oscilloscopes, network analyzer.

• Able to interpret technical documentation and schematics (electrical, wiring, and mechanical drawings).

• Core fundamentals of math & sciences: mechanics, electronics, basic electromagnetic theory, etc.

• Prior experience with signal processing and/or MR imaging physics.

• Creativity and innovation.

• Excellent verbal/writing skills.
Other Beneficial Experience and Skills *
• Experience performing test and evaluation activities, especially hardware elements/ factors.

• Preferred experience with RF analog hardware (preamplifiers, electromagnetic coils, RF shielding, etc.)
About Promaxo *
Patients are at the core of what drives our innovation. Promaxo develops customer-centric technological solutions with the purpose of enhancing the quality of care each patient is provided.
Join a workplace that values diversity in thought, integrity, and teamwork.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Experience:
leading a team in hardware engineering and integration: 3 years (Required)
relevant R&D laboratory: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Company's website:
www.promaxo.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Promaxo,"Oakland, CA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
72,"Engineer, Information Security - Lead",$95k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Find a Better Way...
...to use your skills and experience.
This is the time to let your talent come to life. To maximize your knowledge and use it for the greater good. To work with the best professionals using state-of-the-art technology, and improve lives with your innovative ideas and ambitious dreams. Find a better way: the Sysmex Way.
...to improve the lives of others.
Headquartered in Kobe, Japan, Sysmex is located in Lincolnshire, Illinois. Renowned worldwide for the very finest in quality, innovative diagnostic equipment and information-management systems, we apply science to enhance the quality of life on a global scale. Our agile, resourceful team is committed to realizing critical breakthroughs in laboratory diagnostics, information technology, workflow analysis and life sciences for the clinical laboratory.
...to build a promising future.

We currently have a great opportunity available for a Information Security Engineer - Lead. The Information Security Engineer Lead has the responsibility to implement and monitor our computer networks for security issues, install security software, and document any security issues or breaches identified. The Information Security Engineer Lead is responsible for technical and business alignment with other team members or departments including information security project design, implementation or monitoring, research and development on new processes and procedures for best practices. The Information Security Engineer Lead is a company-wide resource who is the technical lead for other Information Security Engineers. The position has the responsibility to implement and support Sysmex IT products and networked security systems. The position is responsible for the configuration of information security matters applicable on hardware/software and third party software; the installation of operating systems and application software; and the installation and support of hardware, operating system, and databases always aligned to our internal information security and technology policies and standards as well as its best practices. The Information Security Engineer Lead is responsible for the system security administration. Design, develop, and implement the operating environment in synergy to other IT/IS members for like technologies; support and maintenance of operating systems in the existing network base; and research and development on new processes and procedures for best practices regarding to data integrity, confidentiality and availability..
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
1. Monitor computer networks for security issues.
2. Architect, design and manage operating system security upgrades (i.e. new and current Sysmex WAM or internal Data Center environments) including F5, Firewalls, Networks configuration.
3. Install security measures and operate software to protect systems and information infrastructures, including firewalls and data encryption programs. Install, configure, and maintain Operating Systems, Network Systems and Application level systems to support the Enterprise.
4. Perform project implementation, tests and uncover network vulnerabilities as related to IT Security systems. Fix detected vulnerabilities to maintain a high-security standard. Stay up-to-date on information technology and security trends and news.
5. Support the development of company-wide IT Security Policies and procedures. Research security enhancements and make recommendations to management.
6. Investigate security breaches and other cyber security incidents. Help colleagues install security software and understand information security management.
7. Ensure network and system availability and security.
8. Responsible for configuration, design and management of operating system security and third party security components.
9. Responsible for troubleshooting system security integrity, confidentiality and availability aligned to system stability, performance, and scheduled tasks.
10. Assist and work with database administrators or any other IT member for design, maintenance and support and provide technical support to on-site labs (i.e. wiring, ordering, installing, and configuring lab computer/networks).
Percentage of Travel: 10%

Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology or Security, Computer Science or MIS desired (or work related experience). 10-15 years of relevant experience required.
Previous experience in Information Security is desired. Master’s degree with a specialization in Information Security preferred.
Certificates will be considered as a plus:
CISSP – Certified Information System Security Professional
Ethical Hacker certificate
CCSP – Certified Cloud Security Professional
CCNA certification
RHCA for Linux or MCSE for certifications.
Fluency in English is considered as mandatory.
Spanish or Portuguese fluency will be considered as a plus.
Operating Systems Security Administration experience and support of servers. Antivirus and Malware Detection, IDS/IPS, SIEM, Server Remediation, Cisco Devices and Microsoft VMWare experience.
LANs, WANs, WLANs, Routers, Switches, Firewalls, VPN, purpose-built equipment and other hardware/software to required specifications.
Sysmex is proud to be an EEO/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",3.3,"Sysmex America
3.3","Lincolnshire, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
73,Senior Weapons Systems Engineer,-1,"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
This position provides Senior Weapons Systems Engineer support services to the Naval Surface Warfare Center, Dahlgren Division (NSWCDD), Platform Integration (H40) Division. The Unmanned & Expeditionary Weapon Systems division designs, develops, and integrates safe, innovative, and effective weapon control systems, detection systems, sensory, and weapon systems onto manned, unmanned, land, air, and sea platforms for the warfighter to include lethal and non-lethal weapons, guidance and control, unmanned and autonomous systems, advanced sensory, and weapons effectiveness for surface warfare, maritime operations, expeditionary warfare and special operations.
The position supports all technical and engineering stages of development, test, integration, and fielding of safe and innovative weapon control systems, detection systems support, advanced weapon systems support, autonomous system support, mechanical and electrical technician support towards assembly and integration. Other duties indirectly supporting these efforts include providing business operational and financial reporting support, writing technical documentation, maintaining technical databases, and editorial support of technical publications.
Duties and Responsibilities:
develop and refine designs for systems, subsystems, components, and interfaces for new and existing weapons systems, manned and unmanned systems, lethal and non-lethal systems, robotic systems, and weapon control systems.
generate design models; drawings; specifications; interface control documents; and the appropriate technical and integration data, analyses, and technical documentation to support engineering design decisions.
refine hardware designs for, weapons, manned and unmanned systems robotic systems, lethal and non-lethal systems, and weapon control systems, subsystems, and components to document the appropriate product baseline for production and resolve deficiencies discovered during the manufacturing process and user operation.
provide subject matter expertise and recommendations on system, subsystem, and component readiness for initial outfitting and system deployment.
perform technical writing for technical and administrative publications.
conduct the configuration control and shall maintain cognizant oversight at all stages of document generation and maintenance.
perform technical writing for assembly procedures, system test procedures, user operation instruction manuals, and preventative maintenance and troubleshooting procedures.
perform technical editing of existing Government documents and presentations to ensure technical consistency, format consistency, and proper grammar.
shall conduct the configuration control and shall maintain cognizant oversight at all stages of document generation and maintenance.
prepare and review engineering drawings, engineering sketches, and Computer-Aided Design (CAD) systems and produce clear and technically accurate electrical and mechanical drawings based on design tolerances and specifications.
To Land This Job, You Need:
A Bachelor of Science (BS) degree from an accredited college or university in an engineering, scientific, or technical discipline.
Fourteen (14) years professional technical experience, including at least six (6) years of specialized engineering experience towards one of the following areas;
weapons systems (minor and large gun, and small munitions)
weapons system architecture
or DoD Certification (interface control documents, tracking weapon system compliance to sponsor capability production documents, and performing airworthiness assessments).
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Dahlgren, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
74,Sr Systems Software Quality Engineer,-1,"Job Description:

Whats YOUR Mission?
Here at Raytheon Missiles and Defense (RMD), we work together as one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place. Our innovation spans all domains: from land and sea to air, space and cyberspace. We are inspired by a noble mission that is shared by RMD employees around the globe and an inclusive culture that empowers employees and celebrates their contributions.

The RMD Mission Assurance (MA) organization enables engineering quality solutions, capabilities and services to the business. Most important is collaboration with our functional partners and customers (internal and external) to execute and solve problems quickly and efficiently. MA embeds itself throughout the engineering lifecycle to prevent defects from reaching the warfighter and to ensure flawless program execution to meet quality, cost, schedule and technical objectives.

We have an immediate need for a Systems (SE) Quality Engineer (QE) to join the SW Assurance - Land Warfare & Air Defense East Section located in Andover, MA. The SW Assurance - Land Warfare & Air Defense East Section is responsible for partnering with Engineering to ensure work products are free from defects throughout the engineering lifecycle.

Key Responsibilities:
Assess Engineering work products (Peer Reviews, Configuration Control Boards, Code Reviews, Product Readiness and Sale, etc.) to identify and eliminate in-phase defects
Perform project data analysis to drive root cause and correction action
Participate in test preparation and execution to ensure requirements are verified
Review Risk and Opportunity data to lead projects to eliminate risks and/or realize opportunities
Investigate failures, participate in failure review boards, support failure investigation teams and drive root cause analysis
Drive continuous improvement

Basic Qualifications:
Minimum of 6 years of Systems Engineering, SW Engineering, SW Testing or equivalent SW lifecycle experience or SW Quality Engineering
System Requirements definition and System Integration and Test experience.
Ability to obtain Department of Defense Secret Clearance
Required Education: Bachelors degree in Engineering or Mathematics

Preferred Qualifications:
Masters degree in Engineering
Existing Secret Clearance
Root Cause Analysis and Corrective Action expertise
Raytheon Six Sigma Principal Specialist or Expert
Domain knowledge in Systems/SW Requirements, SW Coding and/or Testing
Domain knowledge in Agile, DEV/SEC/OPS, Code Analysis and/or Test Automation techniques
Demonstrated Applied Critical Thinking Skills
Ability to influence without authority, experience with cross functional teams
Experience in multiple phases of the program / product life cycle
Ability to prioritize work load in a multi-tasking, resource constrained work environment
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including experience presenting to leadership & negotiation skills
American Society for Quality (ASQ) Certification, R6s Expert or Six Sigma Black Belt
Mission Assurance Certification Software Level 4 or 3
166665

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Andover, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
75,Senior Maintenance Engineer,-1,"Who We Are

Ocado is a UK based company admitted to trading on the London Stock Exchange (Ticker OCDO). It comprises one of the world's largest dedicated online grocery retailers, operating its own grocery and general merchandise retail businesses under Ocado.com and other specialist shop banners, together with its Ocado Solutions division.

The Ocado Solutions division is responsible for providing Ocado's innovative advanced robotics technology, known as the Ocado Smart Platform (""OSP""), to our major retailer clients around the world. OSP comprises access to Ocado's physical infrastructure solutions, running highly efficient warehouse operations for the single pick of products, together with the entire end-to-end proprietary software applications and advanced robotics required to operate a world-class online grocery business.

Our unique, proprietary and industry-leading technology is set to transform the shopping experience of consumers around the world. We have partnered with Kroger to help it redefine the grocery customer experience in the United States through the adoption of the centralized, automated model of online retailing provided by the Ocado Smart Platform.

Come join us as we build our North American team, bringing world-class innovation and technologies to one of the most exciting global markets for e-commerce.

What You Will Do

The Senior Maintenance Engineer will report directly to the respective shift assigned Engineering Team Manager. This position will undertake reactive and planned engineering maintenance activities and improvement works at the Customer Fulfillment Center (CFC) on material handling equipment (MHE) such as conveyor networks, lifts, cranes, belts, etc.

The Senior Maintenance Engineer's day-to-day responsibilities include:

Reacting to MHE breakdowns (both mechanical and electrical), locating the fault, analyzing the issue and completing the fix in a timely manner to keep operation downtime to a minimum.
Keeping accurate records such as work activities, tasks carried out, parts used through stores, etc.
Align, priorities and monitor KPI's that support the Customer's optimized service for its end customer/clients.
Working closely with Customers Inbound, Pick, Dispatch areas, and other support teams on a daily basis to ensure direction of labor, and planned engineering activities to fully support Ocado's assets and the Customer's daily operational goals.
Maintenance priorities and mentoring for the assigned Maintenance Engineers.
Performing assembly and sub-assembly repairs by following written work instructions, blueprints and schematics.
Working closely with other departments to find ways to increase machine reliability on existing and new equipment, diagnose equipment breakdowns and action repairs ensuring direction of labor and planned engineering activities fully support the operation.
Attending meetings as required, analyze data and find solutions to improve equipment performance whilst ensuring safe working practice and full communications are maintained at all times.
In addition, the position will be involved in projects within the business to develop an effective engineering install and commissioning.
Completing quality inspections to ensure work is completed to a safe standard.

The Senior Maintenance Engineer may be asked to perform tasks as required by management deemed as a reasonable request. This job description is a summary of the typical functions of the role, not an exhaustive or comprehensive list of possible role responsibilities, tasks and duties and is subject to review. The responsibilities, tasks and duties of the job holder might differ from those outlined in the job description and other duties, as assigned, might form part of the job.

The initial 6 to 9 months will involve training and most likely require some travel in order to obtain the training from another site in the US and/or UK. In the event the operations is undergoing its initial startup, the daily responsibilities for this role may be different while supporting the needs of a facility in its initial stages of starting its operations. Once the facility is commissioned, the roles defined in this job description will become the daily responsibilities for the Senior Maintenance Engineer.

Who You Are

To qualify for this position, you must meet the following requirements:

A minimum of five years of direct experience in the mechanical or electrical field.
A degree from a vocational school or college with a focus in the mechanical or electrical field.
Strong electrical experience preferable within a FMCG environment.
Knowledge / experience working with controls, analyzing faults and providing solutions.
Experience with both reactive and preventative maintenance.
Good technical ability relating to automation hardware and software.
Strong organization and communication skills and the ability to work in a multi-disciplined team of varying levels of technical experience.
This role involves working at height using a variety of access equipment, so you need to be comfortable working at heights.
Good technical ability relating to automation hardware and software.
Sound analytical skills with an eye for detail; good problem solving ability and a practical approach.
Experience of working with computerized maintenance management systems. Numerate and PC literate including Word, Excel etc.

This role will require flexibility due to us being a 24/7 operation and a shift pattern will be put in place that will require working days, nights and weekends.

Location

You will be based at the customer fulfillment center near Monroe, Ohio.

For a sense of who we are and what we deliver we invite you to explore online to learn more about Ocado Technology and Ocado Engineering, which directly support the Ocado Solutions division, and take the next step in what will be an amazing career with us.

What We Offer

401k Plan; 100% match up to 5% of earnings
Paid Vacation and Sick Days
10 Paid Public Holidays
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Medical and Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Health Reimbursement Account; Company Contribution of 50% of Annual Deductible
Company Paid Life Insurance
Short Term Disability Insurance
Long Term Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program

Learn about our partnership with Kroger:

Kroger Bets on Robots With Ocado Deal
Meet Ocado, Kroger's Newest Weapon in Its Grocery Delivery War with Amazon and Walmart
Check out this video about our advanced robotics technology

Ocado is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, gender, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, or any other classification as required by applicable law.",4.0,"Ocado Group
4.0","Cincinnati, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
76,Air and Missile Defense (AMD) Senior Systems Engineer / Analyst,$51k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented Senior Systems Engineer to join a diverse team to create unique solutions for complex problems. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The Air and Missile Defense (AMD) Systems Engineer / Analyst will work as a member of the Army Project Office Systems Engineering Team to produce system and software designs and develop engineering artifacts to support integration of new weapons and sensors into the existing AMD architecture. The position includes: 1) analysis and design of the interface of new weapons and sensors into the Integrated Fire Control Network (IFCN), 2) developing and allocating performance requirements across the interface, 3) reviewing, analyzing, and contributing to the IFMC system model and 4) providing engineering guidance to the Agile development teams. The position may include technical briefings to leadership on recommended courses of action, trade studies, system and software design, performance, risks, and impacts to the mission.

IND3
Basic Qualifications
The candidate must be familiar with AMD concepts and must have design experience.
The candidate must have experience in at least one of the following areas: tactical command and control systems, tactical weapons systems, tactical sensor systems, embedded software, real-time software, near real-time software, or distributed software.
The candidate should be familiar with SysML and modeling tools, such as MagicDraw; object oriented analysis and design; must be fluent in the Microsoft Office toolset; must be proficient navigating and extracting data from requirements databases
Must have a Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college (ABET preferred) in engineering, the sciences or mathematics
Must have a minimum of 5 years combined Government/DoD experience in performing the essential duties listed above
Must be a resident of Huntsville, Alabama or be willing to relocate to the Huntsville, Alabama area.
Other Qualifications


-The ideal candidate will have specific knowledge and experience with one (1) or more of the following systems: Combat Identification (CID), Identify Friend or Foe (IFF), Integrated Defense Design (IDD), Link-16, cyber, automation of embedded testing, or direct IFPC experience.

-An additional plus is knowledge in IBCS, PATRIOT, MEADS, THAAD, C2BMC, or AEGIS. The ability to “move out” with your designs, enthusiasm, independent critical thinking and a team attitude are important, as well as the ability to adapt to change in an Agile development environment.

Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.07.04-183

Closing Date:
10/30/2020

#CJ",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Senior Electrical Engineer II Air Traffic Systems Network Engineer,-1,"Are you ready to take on a fresh challenge, advance your career and contribute to making the world a safer place? Raytheon Technologies is ready to help you achieve your goals! Join our Air Traffic Systems Hardware Engineering team and get the opportunity to find purpose, thrive, and succeed. We provide bonus opportunities, an award winning wellness program, access to walking trails, outdoor patio, and great benefits that include medical, dental, vision, 401k match, student loan repayment contribution, and a flexible work schedule - to name a few. We offer 9/80 work schedules, which means that you can have every other Friday off. In addition to PTO, we also have a company shutdown over the end of the year holidays. These benefits allow for a great work environment and work/life balance for our employees.

Raytheon Intelligence and Space (RI&S) in Marlborough, MA is seeking an Electrical, Systems, or Network design engineer to join our Hardware and Infrastructure (HW&I) team in developing the next generation air traffic control and weather systems for civil and military customers around the world. Our STARS air traffic system is deployed in every airport across the US and we are looking to add to our team.

This position is for a design engineer who will work with product leads and other development team members on a variety of tasks related to the design and development of systems using primarily Commercial-Off-The-Shelf (COTS) products. Tasks will include:
Network design
Research and selection of network, servers, workstations, and other COTS hardware
Network configuration definition
System prototyping and integration in the lab
Deployment & field support
The successful candidate will be an innovator and a self-starter, able to complete tasks within our team environment, and possess strong leadership, technical aptitude, and interpersonal skills. They will enjoy being a part of our team and understand the multiple facets of a successful system deployment. The candidate must possess strong critical thinking skills and has demonstrated experience meeting system requirements, schedule deadlines, and project budgets. This is an exciting position for continued development of technical and system design skills for safety critical systems.

US Citizenship required.

Required Skills:
Experience with taking a system design concept from the block diagram or requirements level and developing a complete network design and then verifying the network design via integration and test activities
Demonstrated knowledge and practice developing and implementing computing, networking, and information technology infrastructure
Experience working in a lab environment and operating standard test equipment including network analyzers, network emulators, and network data capture tools
System level hardware integration and troubleshooting skills, including new and legacy networking hardware and protocols in support of system sustainment
Experience collaborating in development with other engineering disciplines, supply chain, suppliers, field engineering, and customers to develop and deliver safety critical systems
Effective communication skills, both oral and written, as well as a thorough knowledge of Microsoft Office products (Word, Excel, Visio, and PowerPoint)
6+ years of related work experience
Willingness and ability to support occasional domestic travel and potential international travel
Desired Skills:
Current or in-progress computing/networking certification(s) (e.g. CCNA, AWS, CISSP)
General knowledge of Solaris and Linux operating systems
Experience with air traffic control or weather system hardware
Proven innovator of new and emerging technologies
Interest and capability in task and team leadership, including: leading teams of 2 to 5 engineers on a common task or group of tasks; managing to a schedule and budget; keeping internal customers advised of status and participating in strategic decisions on planning and execution; estimating and planning new work
Education Requirements:
Requires a degree in Electrical Engineering or related Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics (STEM), or related STEM degree program from an Accredited University/School/College and 6+ years of related work experience

168294

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
78,Chief Building Engineer,-1,"Wednesday, September 9, 2020

Founded in 1969, Kidder Mathews (www.kidder.com) is the largest, independent commercial real estate firm on the West Coast, with more than 800 real estate professionals and staff in 22 offices in Washington, Oregon, California, Nevada, and Arizona. We offer a complete range of brokerage, property management, appraisal, consulting, and debt & equity finance services for all property types. The firm performs over $9 billion in transactions, manages over 60 million square feet of space, and conducts of 1,600 appraisals annually.

Kidder Mathews is an expanding, dynamic, vibrant and entrepreneurial firm and has been consistently recognized as a ""best place to work"" in multiple markets on the West Coast.

Kidder Mathews Property Management is looking for smart, structured, and highly-motivated individuals. Our compensation is competitive with a full suite of benefits offered. Each office also provides full administrative and technical support in a professional environment

Job Summary: (Overall purpose and objective)

In partnership with the entire Property Management Team, the Chief Building Engineer will work to meet the on-going maintenance demands of the team to assure a high level of professionalism regarding all portfolio maintenance requirements, including timely response to and resolution of any tenant or owner requests or concerns.

Essential Functions: (The reason this job exists is to perform these functions. These functions are performed regularly, seriously impacts other jobs, and there are a limited number of employees whom performance of the function can be distributed).

• Manage and lead team of Building Engineers and Maintenance Technicians including recruitment, supervision, scheduling, training, development, evaluation and disciplinary action of employees
• Provide coaching, direction and leadership to employees in order to achieve portfolio, company and client results
• Promote and maintain a positive working environment in alignment with Kidder Mathews values
• Conduct regular team meetings and safety trainings
• Develop and implement the preventative maintenance program for the portfolio
• Ensure scheduled inspections are completed and turned in on time; perform inspections on assigned properties
• Ensure noted items on inspection checklists which require additional follow up are resolved and/or communicated to the Property Manager
• Provide feedback to Property Manager regarding needed repairs, special services, etc.
• Ensure routine and scheduled maintenance and custodial tasks are completed (e.g. change HVAC filters, rebuild faucets, fix toilets, clear roof drains, etc.); perform these tasks on assigned properties
• Read and interpret manuals, constructions drawings, diagrams, and work orders to perform required maintenance and tasks
• Maintain quality appearance of property to Kidder Mathews and Client’s standards
• Participate in property tours or meetings with clients
• Partner with contracted vendors and ensure quality of work performed by them
• Review, monitor and/or draft scope of services/specifications for contracted services
• Partner with management to develop specifications for contracted services
• Provide direction or supervision to contracted vendors and contractors ensuring quality of work is completed as expected
• Respond to and resolve tenant service requests (e.g. running toilets, leaking faucets, etc.)
• Provide excellent customer service by interacting in a professional and positive manner with clients, vendors, coworkers, etc.
• Support and participate in annual operating and capital budgeting process as requested
• Use a variety of hand and power tools following all safety practices
• Ensure a safe, clean work environment is maintained and that all safety procedures are being followed
• Ensure that all accidents and any potential safety hazards are reported immediately

Other Functions: (Incidental to the purpose or the job. These functions are performed infrequently, and have little consequences to other jobs if not performed).
• Other job duties as requested or required

Supervisory Responsibilities: (scope of the person’s authority, including a list of jobs that report to this job).

Direct supervisory responsibility for up to 6 Building Engineers and/or Maintenance Technicians

Work Environment: (The work environment described here are representative of those that the employee must be in in order to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.)
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes, loud noise, airborne particles and both hot and cold temperatures.

Physical Demands: (The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.)
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk and hear. This position is very active and requires standing, walking, bending, kneeling, stooping, crouching, crawling and climbing all day. The employee must frequently lift and/or move items up to 10 pounds and sometimes more than 10 pounds and rarely over 50 pounds. The employee must frequently climb a ladder. Specific vision abilities are required to do this job including close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth vision and the ability to adjust focus. The employee must frequently drive an automobile.

Other Essential Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the competencies (minimum knowledge, skill, and ability) required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions).

Education/Certification:
High School diploma or equivalent; valid driver’s license, automobile liability insurance and the ability to be covered by our insurer; maintain an O7C electrical certification where applicable

Required Knowledge:
Demonstrated working knowledge of typical office building systems (e.g. mechanical, fire and life safety, electrical, HVAC, security systems, plumbing, etc.)

Experience Required:
10+ years’ experience in commercial building maintenance or related field; 10+ years’ experience operating relevant computer hardware/software (e.g. HVAC, security, MS Office, Work order system, smart phones, etc.); 3+ years in a direct supervisory role

Skill and Ability:
Ability to obtain an employee fidelity bond
Able to work with minimal supervision and lead by example
Excellent communication and organizational skills. Ability to build relationships with clients, vendors and internal partners
Ability to provide excellent customer service and mediate difficult client situations
Ability to speak, write and understand English
Professional communication etiquette with good oral and written communication skills
Demonstrated ability to function in a team environment and proactively problem solve
Ability to prioritize, multi-task and utilize resources to execute tasks within a deadline oriented environment
Demonstrated initiative and trouble shooting skills
Demonstrated ability to use relevant technology including work order system and smart phone
Willingness and demonstration of professional development and continual learning
Demonstrated ability to follow through and complete tasks
Available to work overtime and be on call as needed
Professional, clean and neat appearance
Ability to provide small hand tools as needed.
Must have dependable vehicle capable of transporting needed tools/equipment (e.g. ladder, power washer, hand tools, power tools, etc.)

Kidder Mathews is an equal opportunity employer does not discriminate based on race/ethnicity, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.

Kidder Mathews will accommodate candidates with disabilities to complete this application. Please contact recruiting@kiddermathews.com if you need an accommodation.

CA residents: We collect various personal data from employees and applicants for purposes related to employment. Please review the Notice of Data Privacy for Employees and Applicants for detailed information concerning what information we collect, the purposes for which information is collected and with whom such information may be shared. You can find this notice on our careers page at https://kidder.com/careers/.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.9,"Kidder Mathews
3.9","San Diego, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
79,nformation Systems Security Engineer (ISSE) - Cyber Security Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System Design & Architecture teamis the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The more than 2,100 employees provide requirements definition and design at the system, subsystem and component level every day in a collaborative environment which is characterized by respect for the individual, problem solving in a team setting, consensus oriented solutions, and results based recognition. Supporting this mission are teams providing domain expertise and creative solutions in surveillance, naval and missile defense based radar system design, sonar and undersea sensor system design, integrated air and missile defense systems engineering, command and control/battle management system design, combat system and platform architecture design and integration, software intensive system engineering, cyber solutions and algorithm development for signal processing, tracking and discrimination systems. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of achieving excellence through thought and team work while leveraging individual diversity conducive to a flexible work schedule and environment.

Key Responsibilities:
Supporting the development of cybersecurity requirements, design & architecture artifacts, plans and policies.
Supporting defining security development and test efforts implementation of security controls of networking devices, databases, operating systems and hardware and software components
Understanding and integrating cybersecurity development activities.
Support the development of RMF documents and controls validation testing for Authority to Operate (ATO) accreditations.
Performing analysis on cybersecurity data and test results.
Conducting cybersecurity audits to ensure appropriate implementation and compliance of the security posture.
Conducting technical and nontechnical trade studies.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring the cybersecurity solution and alternatives to those solutions.
Establish and manage a program vision.
Lead engineering execution across all IPTs, CPTs, and disciplines within the Program.
Primary Cyber Solutions POC with the customer senior counterparts.
Responsibility to manage all program engineering related activities related to the development of the exportable version of the system. Authority over and direct management of the program leads to ensure that products are delivered on time, on budget and meet system requirements.
Required:
Minimum of 8+ years of Technical (hands-on) experience related to Systems Engineering, including any of the following: System Requirements definition and analysis, System Test and Analysis, Systems Engineering Studies, Cybersecurity Engineering, Cyber Capability Integration and/or Network design & Configuration.
Experience working with the Navy and Shipyards for coordination of requirements and integration of capabilities
Familiarity with Navy ship system infrastructure and interfaces
Understanding of Systems Engineering requirements, specifications, Cyber SAFE and Experience implementing DoD and Federal Cybersecurity Assessment and Authorization (A & A) Processes, IA controls and developing and maintaining associated A & A documentation.
Experience with security features and/or vulnerability analysis of various operating systems as defined by Intelligence Agencies, NIST, DISA (STIGs) and USCYBERCOM.
Experience with Cybersecurity vulnerability testing and related network and system test tools; e.g.NMap, Nessus, Security Content Automation Protocol (SCAP).
Experience with information security tools including: anti-virus, Vulnerability Assessment, HIDS/ NIDS, host-based or endpoint security solutions, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), and Security Incident and Event Management (SIEM) and centralized auditing tools.
Experience working with the Navy and Shipyards for coordination of requirements and integration of capabilities.
Familiarity with Navy ship system infrastructure and interfaces.
Desired:
Experience with IT and/or network and system security administration, including operating system security configuration and account management best practices for UNIX, MS Windows, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and CISCO systems.
Understanding of Systems Engineering requirements, specifications, Cyber SAFE and experience implementing DoD and Federal Cybersecurity Assessment and Authorization (A & A) Processes, IA controls and developing and maintaining associated A & A documentation.
DoDI 8570.01-M IAT Level-II Compliant Certification (e.g. Security + or CISSP or equivalent).
Familiar with NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF) as described in NIST Special Publication 800-37.
Familiar with Program Protection Plan (PPP) required by DoDI 5000.02 and DoDI 5200.39
Experience with multi-level security and utilization of Cross Domain Solutions.
Experience with multi-level security and utilization of Cross Domain Solutions.
Experience working U.S. Government contract proposals as a Cybersecurity Engineer subject matter expert.
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics); advanced degree(s) Business or related discipline
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

167859

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
80,Big Data Engineer (3+ years),$56k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

What’s in it for you?

Vectorworks Inc. is a global software product company targeting entertainment, architecture and landscape industries with enterprising and intuitive solutions that allow users to create unique designs. We are looking for a Data Engineer to build, maintain, and refine our data pipelines to generate detailed metrics and reports of our software. This person will work as part of our software engineering team.

It’s an exciting time to join the Vectorworks family, and if you are looking for an opportunity to have a lasting impact on a growing team, we hope you’ll take the time to learn more about this opportunity!

Responsibilities:

In this role, you should expect to:

Build and maintain our data infrastructure
Utilize understanding of ETL principles
Exhibit a proficiency in Python and AWS analytic stack (especially S3, RDS, RS, EMR, EC2, Lambda)
Work closely with engineering and other teams to organize and extract data for analysis

Why do you want this job? Because you are:

A self-starter who is motivated to take ownership of projects and drive tasks to completion with minimal supervision
Able to provide direction and identify new areas where data can be applied to improve software and business decision making
Looking for an opportunity where you can grow and move forward with the latest trends in big data technology
Enthusiastic about improving existing data systems and adapting them to be more powerful, usable, and robust.
Qualifications:

Why do we want you? Because you have:

A Bachelor of Science degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or a related field
A minimum of 3 years’ experience developing data pipelines
Solid understanding of ETL principles and how to apply them
Proficiency in Python, SQL, Spark, and Unix shell
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate across business areas
The ability to work in a fast-paced and agile development environment
Strong interest in learning and using the latest technologies

Extra Credit:

Experience with Kibana, Redshift, and Tableau Software
Hands-on expertise in many disparate technologies, ranging from front-end user interface to back-end systems as well as all points in between
Experience with distributed computing, NoSQL, and Flask
Familiarity with software logging

Vectorworks Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer",3.2,"Vectorworks Inc.
3.2","Columbia, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
81,Linux Engineer (TS),$79k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Core Responsibilities
Administer enterprise Linux servers including operating system patching, security hardening, monitoring, and troubleshooting.
Handle the operations of data storage and indexing systems, including monitoring, backup management, and upgrades.
Configure and maintain web servers including monitoring and configuration management.
Work with customer IT teams to coordinate changes and troubleshoot intersystem problems.
Technologies We Use
CentOS and Red Hat Enterprise Linux
Nagios, Grafana, and InfluxDB
Oracle, Postgres, Cassandra, Hadoop, and Elasticsearch
NGINX and Apache HTTP servers
Cloud, virtualized, and physical x86-64 server platforms
Puppet and shell scripting
What We Value
Experience with Linux system administration
Ability to troubleshoot server hardware failures and replace components
Applied knowledge in operating system security and hardening
Experience in patch and configuration management in enterprise production environments
Exposure to the operation and configuration of database and web server technologies
Ability to participate in a 24/7 on-call rotation
Unwavering commitment to operational security and best practices",4.5,"Shine Systems
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
82,Level III Lead Engineer,$46k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ensures work assigned to Engineering personnel on shift is completed safely and efficiently.
Provides supervision and support for Engineering personnel on shift
Assists with coordination and completion of special projects as required
Assists with coordination of service with third party vendors as required
Maintains records of all repair and maintenance activity; prepares reports and logs as required by the Chief Engineer.
Ability to interact cordially with employees and building tenants to accomplish tasks is essential to this position

Advanced understanding of Central Plant, HVAC/R, Electrical Distribution and Fire/Life Safety Systems
Experience managing engineering personnel and workflow as a Lead or Assistant Chief Engineer
Experience in Mission Critical Environments such as Data Centers is a plus

Minimum Five years’ experience as a Journeyman Engineer working in commercial buildings
Minimum Three years’ experience as a Lead or Assistant Chief Engineer
Completion of Trade School, HVAC/R Certification, Apprenticeship Program or equivalent is required
High School Diploma or GED equivalent required
EPA 608 Universal Certification

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $34.00 - $37.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
and Fire/Life Safety Systems: 3 years (Required)
a Lead or Assistant Chief Engineer: 3 years (Required)
Advanced understanding of Central Plant: 5 years (Required)
Journeyman Engineer working in commercial buildings: 5 years (Required)
License:
EPA 608 Universal (Required)
Completion of Trade School, HVAC/R Certification, Apprentice (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Shifts:
Morning (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.0,"ABM
3.0","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1909,Company - Public,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
83,Data Engineer III,$57k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUTGROWN YOUR OWN BACKYARD? COME PLAY IN OURS.

At Columbia, were as passionate about the outdoors as you are. And while our gear is available worldwide, were proud to be based in the Pacific Northwest, where natural wonders are our playground.

Every product we make and every task we undertake is inspired by the famous words of our founder Gert Boyle: Its perfect. Now make it better. As pioneers of relentless improvement, we are constantly evolving.

We believe the outdoors is ours to protect and strive to keep our planet healthy.

We believe in empowering people to experience the outdoors to the fullest.

And we believe in you.

ABOUT THE POSITION

Although we're an apparel and footwear focused company, technology is central to everything we do. Columbia Sportswears Global Information Services (GIS) teams enable an IT infrastructure across four global brands, a global supply chain, and 500+ geographically dispersed stores. These teams support in-store, mobile, and data platforms to enhance customer interface and service in an ever-evolving industry.

The Data Engineer is a member of the Enterprise Information Management team and is responsible for the design, development, testing, maintenance, and support of Columbias enterprise data assets. The Data Engineer will provide technical design, development and analytical support for Columbia Enterprise initiatives.

HOW YOULL MAKE A DIFFERENCE
Lead activities that include: data modeling (relational and dimensional), data lake & data warehouse development, data integration / ETL process development, and support.
Continuously deliver and improve prioritized enterprise data assets that enable the growth of Columbias global analytics, reporting and visualization solutions.
Coordinate frequently with several enterprise support organizations and Columbia end users.
Manage scheduling, support, tools and maintenance of integration processes.
Identify project risks and impediments, notify management, and proactively work with other members of the team to complete assigned tasks as defined by project scope, timelines, and budgets.
Identify data quality issues and support Columbias data governance initiative by participating in necessary activities including data profiling.
Participate in the use of Agile practices to elicit and refine requirements through an iterative process of planning, defining acceptance criteria, prioritizing, developing and delivering enterprise data asset solutions.
YOU ARE
An expert in data design & development and have a deep understanding of complex organizational analytical and data needs that enable improvements in environment design, efficiency, controls and the overall user experience of enterprise data assets
A strong communicator that has an ability to work with all levels of the organization to advance Columbias vision for information management and analytics
Highly conversant in the culture and changing landscape of information technology
Curious and creative, always looking to deliver a superior product while working closely with a small scrum team
YOU HAVE
A Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or a related field or a combination of education and experience
3+ years of hands-on experience architecting, developing and/or managing the implementation of Business Intelligence solutions and 2+ years professional experience with one or more ETL tools such as Informatica, SQL Server Integration Services, Business Objects Data Services, or Spark
Experience in SQL and query optimization for data platforms such as Azure SQL DW, HDInsight, Teradata, SAP HANA, Oracle, or equivalent required. Experience with Microsoft Azure BI Stack: Azure Data factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL Data Warehouse is a bonus
Proficient in relational database concepts, including normalization, indexing, physical and logical modeling, creation of SQL queries and performance tuning.
Familiar with the Kimball and/or Inmon methods of data warehousing techniques, standards and best practices. Experience with management of a star schema implementation and related concepts such as slowly changing and late arriving dimensions
Familiar with Data Lake and Spark concepts and have some hands-on experience working with Spark DataFrames, pySpark preferred. Experience with large scale data processing, data structure optimization and scalability of algorithms a plus
#LI-JD1

Columbia Sportswear Company and our portfolio of brands, including Columbia, SOREL, Mountain Hardwear and prAna, know a thing or two about adventures. After all, we've been on one since 1938, working to perfect the art of enjoying the outdoors. Behind everything we make is an employee who's found that the greatest adventure starts with joining a company that strives to do the right thing.

This job description is not meant to be an all-inclusive list of duties and responsibilities, but constitutes a general definition of the position's scope and function in the company.

At Columbia Sportswear Company (CSC), we are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants and teammates without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy (including childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, military and veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by applicable law. CSC believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",3.7,"Columbia Sportswear
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1938,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
84,Advanced Product Quality Planning (APQP) Engineer,$39k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description


We are hiring an Advanced Product Quality Planning Engineer to join our Quality team!

DISCOVER

Are you a versatile Quality professional looking to play a key role in the New Product Introduction (NPI) process at an outstanding company? The APQP Engineer will implement product quality planning throughout the design of new or revised products and processes, emphasizing the prevention of problems. This role will work hands-on to manage Quality deliverables for all new products in our industry-leading Endless Pools®, Hot Spring® Spas, Caldera® Spas, Freeflow Spas®, and Fantasy Spas® product lines.

YOUR RIPPLE EFFECT
Do you have experience in APQP? As our resident APQP expert, you will use your knowledge of relevant processes and outputs to work closely with our NPI cross-functional group to ensure the development and execution of APQP deliverables. You will play a crucial role in all stages of the NPI process, facilitating Quality measures such as new product quality goals, reliability testing, design guidelines, Failure Mode and Effects Analysis (FMEAs), Initial Capability Analysis, Measurement System Analysis (MSA), control plans, equipment, product and process validations.
Are you a critical thinker? You’ll need to ask the right questions at the right times in order to support the introduction of new products into our manufacturing processes. Using robust engineering controls, you’ll facilitate critical discussions on quality characteristics of new products, as defined in our design guidelines, and will document these processes as needed.
Are you an outstanding project manager? Partnering with Product Management, you will help integrate APQP deliverables into our NPI project timelines. You will be working on several projects at once and will be responsible for ensuring the successful completion of Quality milestones according to multiple deadlines.
Are you a creative problem solver? You will utilize problem solving methods (8D) to resolve non-complaint issues found during the NPI process and will continuously improve the APQP process by enhancing processes and procedures.
Are you an effective leader? Assertive communication skills are a must in this role. We’ll look to you to lead effective conversations, using your team-building skills and leadership capabilities to train and coach as needed. You will use interview techniques to coach Internal Auditors, to allow for independent assessments and the communication of findings in a professional manner.
Are you a strong communicator? You will need to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, and technical procedures and must be able to write reports, business correspondence, and procedures and manuals. In this role you will need to effectively present important information and respond to questions from management and employees.
Do you enjoy working cross-functionally? You will work in a management support capacity across all departments at multiple plants and will partner with our Supplier Quality, Design Engineering and Supply Chain departments on vendor selection and communications during the launch/change process. You will review and approve Production Part Approval Process (PPAP) submissions from vendors and will work closely with other external contacts such as auditors and contractors. You must be able to work independently and on teams, both as a participant and as a leader.
Do you have excellent follow-through? You will facilitate post-launch lessons learned sessions to drive improvements using design and process guidelines.
WHAT YOU BRING
Bachelor's degree in Engineering from a four-year college or university is required. Minimum of 2-3 years’ experience in design quality is required. Equivalent combination of education and experience may be considered.
Proficiency in MS Office suite, MS project, Minitab, AutoCAD or Solid works. Must be able to prepare reports, testing protocols, statistical analysis, Gantt charts, schedules, procedures, and other data as necessary.
Design for Six Sigma certificate and/or ASQ Certification for Quality Engineer, Reliability Engineer, Black Belt or equivalent is a plus. Knowledge of manufacturing planning and risk management tools are required.
Bilingual (Spanish) a plus.
Excellent communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels within the organization and a strong ability to work in a team environment are required.
Valid passport, or ability to obtain one, is required. Must have willingness and ability to travel up to 20% of the time to our Tijuana, Mexico plants.
WHAT YOU’LL GET

At Watkins Wellness®, we believe that everyone should ‘Feel good, Live well.” so, we offer employees the opportunity to join a dynamic, growing industry leader with an outstanding and well-deserved reputation for leadership and commitment to our employees, customers and community. We also offer a competitive package including exceptional health and wellness benefits, paid time off, bonus, profit sharing, 401k, tuition reimbursement and much more.

We look for candidates that exhibit The Watkins Way (always Ethical, endeavors to be Transparent, embraces Inclusion, welcomes Diverse backgrounds and perspectives, Accommodating, believes in Work-Life Balance, puts Safety First, Accountable, values Relationships, Passionate, Team Player, and Goal Driven).

The employee must frequently lift and move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Shift
Full or Part Time
Full time

Watkins (the “Company”) is an equal opportunity employer and we want to have the best available persons in every job. The Company makes employment decisions only based on merit. It is the Company’s policy to prohibit discrimination in any employment opportunity (including but not limited to recruitment, employment, promotion, salary increases, benefits, termination and all other terms and conditions of employment) based on race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, genetic information, pregnancy, religious creed, national origin, ancestry, age, physical/mental disability, medical condition, marital/domestic partner status, military and veteran status, height, weight or any other such characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. The Company is committed to complying with all applicable laws providing equal employment opportunities. This commitment applies to all persons involved in the operations of the Company regardless of where the employee is located and prohibits unlawful discrimination by any employee of the Company.",4.3,"Watkins Wellness
4.3","Vista, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
85,Systems Engineer - Mid Level - TS/SCI w/Polygraph,$40k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Excivity is seeking a Mid Systems Engineer who will provide services to support implementation and rollout of ServiceNow in a new environment. The candidate will be able to structure and manage configuration items (CIs), attributes, and ServiceNow CMDBs. The Mid Systems Engineer will be able to interpret and implement customer’s business processes and best practices in the tool and will assist in establishing SOPs, governance, and Change Management processes. This position will be located onsite with our customer and requires infrequent travel throughout the Washington Metro Area.
Responsibilities:
Understand and implement complex business practices and workflows in ServiceNow
Working with a technical team, the candidate will follow an agile software development methodology for planning, implementing, and delivering ServiceNow capabilities
Administer and O&M SerivceNow relational databases
Administer and manage ServiceNow user roles/groups/permissions
Provide support for data migration efforts

Requirements:
Active TS/SCI Clearance with Poly Required
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Computer Engineering, or related field; if no degree, 8+ years of experience in software engineering/developing
Experience with ServiceNow data models, capabilities, and relationships
4+ years of experience with MySQL/relational databases
Must be able to manage configuration items (CIs) and the ServiceNow Configuration Management Database
Experience working with COTS solutions performing integration activities
Experience working as DBA performing data migrations
Desired Qualifications:
Experience with Javascript
Excivity, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Excivity creates and deploys mission-enabling technologies, including specialized security applications and situational awareness toolsets. We create software and hardware, perform assessments and security reviews of technology, advise clients on securely implementing technology, perform advanced Cyber Investigations, and provide unique Cyber Security Training for travelers into high technical threat environments. We make mission happen by innovating, breaking, building, and teaching.
Our clients are extraordinary. Public or Private Sector, they confront unique organizational and technical challenges. The breadth and depth of our experience in professional services and products is an unequaled asset. That experience enables their mission success.
Our team is talented, motivated, and poised to readily meet any challenge. With diverse education, experience, and backgrounds in the public and private sectors, our team is judiciously and rigorously selected. Our corporate culture of innovation, excellence, and mission, unifies our team to make your mission happen.",4.2,"The Aegis Technologies Group, Inc.
4.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
86,Sr Hardware System Integrator / Electrical Engineer,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..Raytheon Missile Defense (RMD) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

We are currently seeking a Sr Hardware System Integrator / Electrical Engineer to join the Radar Receiver Exciter Integrated Product Team in Tewksbury, MA. This team designs, develops, integrates, and tests the Radar Receiver Exciter hardware for the combat proven RMD integrated air and missile defense systems.

The Receiver, Exciter, and Signal Processing (RESP) Department is the focal point for receiver, exciter, beam steering, and signal processing technology in the RMD division. The department is responsible for the design, development, integration, support to production builds, and lifecycle support of RMD products.

We are looking for candidates to provide hardware integration and test support for existing radar systems.

The Senior Hardware System Integrator Electrical Engineer will be expected to perform the following:
Sub-System design verification testing
Utilization of RF based test equipment (Signal Generators, Spectrum Analyzers, Logic Analyzers, Oscilloscopes, etc.) to resolvehardware system issueson various production lines
Assist in the definition and development of verification and test plans
Test and troubleshooting of RF sub-systems
Interface with supply chain and suppliers to resolve production issues
Partnering in the development of test equipment and establishment of test requirements and procedures
Leadership of root cause and corrective action investigations and presentation of findings to the integrated product team
Required Skills:
Minimum 6 years of experience supporting production and/or Test of electrical sub-systems and Radar systems
Experience with testing and troubleshooting RF and Microwave component/subsystem such as up-converters, down converters, power amplifiers, waveform generators, RF modulators, and limiters
Proven experience troubleshooting and performing failure analysis of circuits with demonstrated knowledge of associated measurement equipment.
Ability to understand and interpret Acceptance Test Requirements
Strong skills and experience performing analysis of technical data
Experience as a radar systems engineer or radar system integrator
Strong communication skills including report writing and presentations
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position will need a U.S. Security Clearance within one year of start date.
Required Education
Bachelor's degree in an engineering or scientific discipline. Advance degree desirable.
Desired Skills:
Experience leading cross functional investigations
Experience developing test plans/methodologies
Leadership of small technical teams, including technical oversight and direction, cost estimation, tracking & reporting, coordination and preparation of detailed technical team reports
Experience in development, analysis or test on radar systems and signal processing
MATLAB knowledge and experience
Willingness to travel occasionally (including Hawaii)
163007

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
87,Service Now Systems Engineer,-1,"Graham Technologies (GTech) is looking for a Systems Engineer in Reston, VA to join our fast-growing team of over 70 members!

Your role:

Graham Technologies is passionate about innovation and we want your help! We believe in each team member having a voice and sharing it to enable both individual and team success. We are looking for a candidate to support process and workflow management across the customers office. The candidate will act as ServiceNow Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) to help the sponsor build within ServiceNow a system to automate data collection and report actionable and accurate corporate data for decision making and analyses purposes. You will analyze the recommended modified systems solutions for customers requirements and interfaces with outside systems (such as JIRA). The Service Now Engineer will be responsible for keeping the system running effectively and coordinate patches and upgrades.

We're excited about candidates who:
Has an active TS/SCI Full Scope Poly
Good interpersonal and communication skills in order to be able to work well with team members, vendors, and operators
Able to understand and explain complex technical topics with non-technical users
Demonstrated experience with building and deploying instances of ServiceNow, to include ServiceNow certifications.
Demonstrated experience developing software in a fast-paced operational environment.
Demonstrated experience with cloud-based technologies
We're also excited about candidates who might have experience with the following:
Experience with Linux, PKI certificates tools and libraries, and devops.
Prior Knowledge of an ITSM tool.
Compensation:

At GTech, we believe in treating every person the way we want to be treated fairly. Our compensation package ensures everyone at GTech is given equal pay for equal work regardless of race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, disability, religion, age, nationality, or even negotiation skills!

Most IT companies can probably offer many of the same services, but what sets us apart from the others, is truly our people! We care about our employees and show it often with sincere appreciation and acknowledgement of not only final work products, but the little steps taken along the way! In addition, our generous benefits package helps support our team members to live well and prosper. Here are just a few highlights:

Four Weeks Accrued PTO First Year
Ten Paid Federal Holidays
Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurances
401(k) Plan with Annual Employer Contributions
Flexible Schedules
Reimbursements for Continued Education and Training

Why Graham Technologies?

Our Core Values say it all!
Value our Customers
Care about our Employees
Passionate about Innovation
Believe in Strong Work Ethic
Rely on Teamwork
Integrity Matters
Founded in 2007, GTech is a consulting-services firm that is zealous about providing the best solutions to address our client needs and maximize the value of their investments. One of the ways we do this, is by providing exceptional employees for our clients - whose range of expertise expands the entire IT industry! Weve cultivated a family of individuals where integrity, commitment, and reliability, are etched into the heart of our delivery teams.

In addition, we are equally zealous about caring for our employees the lifeblood of our business! Weve purposefully created a culture that is friendly, family-oriented, and all-inclusive. Our team members are encouraged to have a life, both in and out of the office, through flexible schedules (where available), continuing education, and support to pursue their passions!",4.6,"Graham Technologies, LLC
4.6","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
88,"Architect/Lead Software Engineer, Applications",$86k-$172k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Amobee Applications Engineering Team play a significant role in that we are the face of our technology platform to our customers, users, and partners. Our team maintain a constant focus on innovations across our technology stack in order to design and implement new and powerful features that make our platform more scalable, high performance, resilient, user friendly, and ultimately ready to deliver a better ROI to our customers. Our team build and maintain all client facing interfaces (e.g. web app, APIs,..etc) to enable our customers to build audience, plan and execute against various media types, act on cross-channel reporting and analytics available on the platform.

We are mostly full stack engineers with exposure to everything – back-end, front-end, and everything in between. The collaborative nature of the team allows you to constantly learn new things. You’ll collaborate closely with other product and technology leaders to jointly chart the platform roadmap. You’ll work closely with other software engineers across the engineering organization to innovate on our platform architecture, and to continue building a world-class technology platform.

Responsibilities
Serve as technical/development lead on major company initiatives
Review architecture and technical design on key projects
Collaborate with Product to validate use cases and requirements
Lead integration testing across multiple engineering teams.
Provide technical mentorship to junior engineers
Influence and evangelize new software technologies to other team members
Work closely with other software architects to make engineering wide architecture recommendations and decisions
Experimenting with new ways of visualizing large amounts of data
Continuous usability improvements on complex workflows
Ensure our technology stack stays current
Passionate about building a World class Technology Platform

Qualifications
Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
4+ years of software development experience
High degree of comfort in Java or other object-oriented language
Experience with scalable, high performance, multi-tier, enterprise application development
Familiarity with JavaScript frameworks such as Angular or React.
Knowledge of application frameworks like Spring.
Experience with data storage technologies
Experience with queuing and messaging frameworks
Experience with service oriented architecture
Keen sense of information architecture and visual design
Motivated by writing fast, scalable code with testability in mind
Strong problem solving skills
Excited by working in a fast-paced environment
About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
89,Senior Geotechnical Engineer,-1,"Navarro & Wright Consulting Engineers, Inc., a rapidly growing consulting engineering firm based in central PA, is now accepting resumes for a Senior Geotechnical Engineer to be based in our New Cumberland, PA office.

Major duties and responsibilities:
Oversee field operations and act as the design lead for multiple, concurrent projects
Support project managers to complete various assignments including developing brown bag instructional sessions
Provide final QA/QC for geotechnical calculations, evaluations, and analyses
Perform site reconnaissance for geotechnical issues and geological information
Analyze and interpret geological information form sources such as survey data, well logs, boreholes, or aerial photos
Prepare Scope of Services and manpower estimates for geotechnical projects as requested by private clients, construction firms, government entities, other engineering firms, internal staff, and satellite offices.
Responsible for client relations on assigned projects and responsible for monitoring work in progress for compliance with schedule, budgets, and technical correctness. Upon completion, provide feedback on successes and instruction, training and assistance in areas opportune to unit personnel.
Provide quality management review of geotechnical studies or other deliverables produced by other staff prior to release to the client.
Compose and review Geotechnical Engineering Reports for roadways and structures, as well as Structure Foundation Reports for bridges, culverts, retaining walls, and ITS structures, and associated calculations, and Slope Stability studies\\reports
Compose laboratory testing plans and review lab results for soil and rock
Determine termination criteria and specifications for subsurface investigations
Review and correct typed logs, boring profiles, and drafted media
Review Drilling Contractor solicitations and statewide contracts
Assist in verifying drilling contractor quantities/invoices
Maintain extensive contact with clients, be responsible to resolve project issues, attend project meetings, and maintain strong client relationships
Use appropriate public relations when dealing with internal staff, clients, observers, and the general public
Stay within established schedules and budgets for every project
Understand and be able navigate and utilize the company and/or department filing system within first week of employment
Attend company and/or department meetings, as necessary
Professional Qualifications:
Minimum of a B.S. degree in Civil Engineering from ABET-accredited college or university required
Minimum of 15 years of experience in professional engineering services required
Solid ability to interact well with internal staff, project teams that include other consultants, contractors, and clients required
Excellent organizational and project management skills required
Proficiency with geotechnical software (including Lpile, GSTABL, Driven, and GRLWEAP) required
High dependability, consistence attendance, and adherence to company policies/procedures required
PennDOT and/or PA Turnpike experience preferred
PE Licensure in PA required or ability to obtain PA Licensure by reciprocity within 6 months
Must have Valid PA Driver’s License
Competitive compensation and comprehensive benefits package offered, including 401K

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Experience:
professional engineering services: 10 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
PE (Required)",3.6,"Navarro & Wright Consulting Engineers, Inc.
3.6","New Cumberland, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
90,Mid/Senior DevOps Engineer,$60k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you have a passion for automation and open source? Do you enjoy problem solving and making complex applications work perfectly? Do you enjoy working closely with Developers and writing scripts/code to automate all aspects of hybrid cloud operations? Then Amobee is the place for you.

We are hiring Sr. DevOps Engineers! As a member of the DevOps Services team, you will be embedded into one or more of our software engineering teams to provide operational service. You will be responsible for delivering service to your assigned team and agnostic solutions to the entire Amobee Engineering organization. You will operate infrastructure and ensure all services are monitored, healthy, automated, and scalable. Tasks will range from bringing new infrastructure online to building and improving application pipelines to troubleshooting issues from the system level up to the application itself. You will strive to bridge the gap between operations and development to push the entire organization forwards and to build shared visions across engineering teams.

Responsibilities
Serve on the DevOps Services Engineering team; responsible for the overall health, performance, and capacity of the Amobee production environment
Contribute to the implementation and design of systems and networks used to operate production infrastructure with a focus on automation
Design, implement and manage continuous pipeline services for the Engineering organization.
Take a consulting approach to bring operations expertise to the application design and development process
Develop tools to monitor infrastructure and custom applications
Troubleshoot issues across the entire stack
Document system design and application operation procedures
Build, monitor and tune production systems
Take part in a shared 24x7 on-call rotation with the support of a full-time NOC
Required Qualifications
5+ years experience working in large-scale production environments
Strong troubleshooting skills and experience with Linux
Advanced understanding of Linux, Networking, and Internet principles
Programming skills in one or more scripting languages
Experience in monitoring infrastructure and applications using tools like Nagios, Prometheus & InfluxDB
Experience with automation tools such as Chef, Terraform or Ansible
Experience with both cloud and physical infrastructure (AWS a plus)
Experience with container management solutions such as Kubernetes
Experience managing & tuning java services in a production environment.
Ability to work in a fast-paced, results-driven environment
Experience implementing technologies with a focus on operability, reliability, and scalability
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or a related field (or equivalent technical experience)
Desired Qualifications
Experience with message queues (Kafka a plus)
Experience with high volume transactional fleets processing billions of requests per day.
Experience with support services such as Consul, Zookeeper & ELK
Experience with noSQL solutions (Couchbase a plus)
Experience with big data systems (EMR, Spark & Hive a plus)
Experience running, performance testing & tuning Java applications (Spring Cloud a plus)
Experience with object oriented languages (Java a plus)
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
91,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.7,"Summa Health System
3.7","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
92,Database Engineer - Senior (TS/SCI),$91k-$198k (Glassdoor Est.),"Database Engineer (Senior)

Overall Assignment Description:

Database Engineers partner with Software Product Teams and end users to understand needs, make recommendations for database architectures. Once recommendations are approved, the Database Engineer implements leveraging modern, database technologies such as PostGRES and NOSQL database technologies. The Database Engineer is proficient in modern, cloud offerings and cloud database services, how to work with them, and how they fit in modern, cloud native applications that leverage the twelve factors found at https://12factor.net. This includes how to build and deploy modern cloud native data architectures, data processing and analytics pipelines and being able to make appropriate tradeoff decisions in data architectures between stable, structured, persistent data and dynamic, streaming, perishable data.

Duties include:
Conditioning software for inclusion in a database.
Leverages software-, platform- and infrastructure- as-a-service to deliver GEOINT solutions.
Ensures optimum efficiencies for the utilization of cloud native or cloud enabled databases.
Creates and maintains data architecture using automated software deployment pipelines with Continuous Integration/Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) tools.

Skills and ExperienceRequired:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.
Senior-level working experience in government or industry supporting or leading cloud-based systems engineering efforts.
Demonstrated experience using the following technologies:
PostGRES/PostGIS
NoSQL
Amazon Web-Serviceso Cloud Foundry

Desired:
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Management Information Systems, or related STEM degree program.",4.5,"Shine Systems
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
93,Senior Software Engineer,$54k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"At PRA Group, Software Engineers will develop project design and coding to create customized solutions applying software engineering principles to support business needs. We are an industry leader, and these positions are for driven professionals who are willing to work in an agile software development environment.

Our positions will support expanding the scope and focus towards the development of new technology and proprietary products, as well as upgrades of existing applications currently developed in Visual Studio. Software Engineers with PRA Group will have the opportunity to foster relationships with high-performing teams to mentor and lead junior developers in advancing their skills and development along with working hand-in-hand with product owners, scrum masters, and other developers.
We strive for innovative success, and our engineers contribute to the following (but not limited to): *
Design, code, test and implement applications using ASP.Net Core, C# that interact with managed MS SQL Server databases
Configuring and deploying applications using Microsoft stack
Collaborate on architecture design sessions and code reviews
Participate in full development life-cycle from requirements gathering, estimating, design, development, and implementation
Perform Unit testing, quality control, trouble shooting, code review and standard data validation practices prior to production release
Support the documentation and cataloging of developed software applications
We are searching for Mid-level to Senior experienced Developers who are passionate, ambitious with solid working experience with any of the following to enhance software solutions:
Basic Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in IT or related field preferred or the equivalent amount of related experience required
Strong object-oriented programming skills and familiarity with software design patterns
Demonstrated (minimum 3 year) experience developing software using ASP.NET Core, C#, Rest API Development, CI/CD tools, SQL/TSQL, Microsoft SQL Server
Demonstrated experience in developing and executing test scenarios, scripts for unit, integration, regression, and functional testing
Experience in Agile and other standard SDLC processes
Self-starter, ambitious, and takes individual pride/ownership of work and projects
Strong and effective written and verbal communication skills
Preferred Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science or related field preferred or the equivalent amount of related experience required
Demonstrated (minimum 5 year) experience developing software using ASP.NET Core, C#, Rest API Development, CI/CD tools, SQL/TSQL, Microsoft SQL Server
1+ years of experience in Python & AWS
Work Environment:

The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate as the employee works in a collaborative office environment, in an individual work station, using telephone and computer. Employee may be required to occasionally work evenings and weekends. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Disclaimer:

The above information on this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.

PRA Group (Nasdaq: PRAA), a global leader in acquiring and collecting nonperforming loans, returns capital to banks and other creditors to help expand financial services for consumers in the Americas and Europe. PRA Group companies collaborate with customers to help them resolve their debt and provide a broad range of additional revenue and recovery services to business and government clients.
PRA CARES*
Committed Accountable Respectful Ethical and Successful*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: Up to $1.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
CI/CD tools: 3 years (Preferred)
software development: 3 years (Preferred)
SQL/TSQL: 3 years (Preferred)
ASP.Net Core: 3 years (Preferred)
C#: 3 years (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://pra.wd1.myworkdayjobs.com/PRA_Careers/job/Norfolk-VA/Associate-Software-Engineer_19175
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.8,"PRA Group
2.8","Norfolk, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
94,Senior Data and Software Engineer,$108k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Senior Data and Software Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering

Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a self-motivated Senior Data and Software Engineer to lead the design and development of our big data infrastructure, that is secure, scalable, highly performant, and able to handle diverse data sets, leveraging latest technologies such as Hadoop and Spark, both on-premise and in the cloud. This position requires lot of experience in designing and building data pipelines, data services, data warehouses, business intelligence and machine learning platforms, especially around unified consumer behavioral and profile data.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools/technologies such as SQL/NoSQL, Python, and Tableau to process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Build, automate and manage data ingestion pipelines for master data management, deep-learning, and predictive analytics
Build and maintain big data environments that are highly secure, scalable, flexible, and performant using appropriate SQL, NoSQL and NewSQL technologies.
Lead data governance and data profiling efforts to ensure data quality and proper meta data documentation for data lineage.
Enhance and modernize platform for precision marketing decision engine based on predictive analytics/machine learning.
Provide technical input into build/buy/partner decisions for all components of the data infrastructure.
Collaborate with diverse technical and non-technical teams located across multiple time-zones on client deliverables and technical support
Participate-in and contribute to design and code reviews
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
5+ years of experience in data integration / data engineering
5+ years of experience in data modeling and architecture
3+ years of experience with building data pipelines and analytics data marts on MPP databases such as RedShift, BigQuery
3+ years of experience working on cloud platforms such as AWS or GCP
3+ years of experience programming in Apache Spark, Hadoop, and python
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Knowledge of data science / machine learning is a plus
Very strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,HF Senior Engineer/Scientist,$91k-$198k (Glassdoor Est.),"WR has a potential need of a Sr HF Engineer/Scientist to assist with prototype development, subsystem modeling and simulation, system level analysis and oversight of customer projects.

Position responsibilities will include, but are not limited to the following:
Provides technical expertise in a discipline in support of high frequency (HF) radar research and development, with specific subject matter expertise in one of the following disciplines, radio-frequency (RF) and electronic engineering, tracking and data fusion, or radio wave propagation.
Working in a lab environment to implement RF sub-system solutions, to verify simulated performance or in support of prototype development and field test work.
Provides oversight, guidance and technical advice on customer projects involving RF systems, which might include hardware, data processing, tracking and track fusion or HF propagation aspects.
A combination of unique design work, test and evaluation, and simulation to verify 3rd party contractor designs and approaches.
Supports broader department level work that may involve digital processing related work and overall system performance.
Works with other engineers as a team member in solving problems. Interfacing with program office and government personnel required.
Interest in working with experts in the fields of HF radar, signal processing, electromagnetics.
Candidates must possess the following knowledge, skills, and experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in electrical engineering, computer engineering, computer science, physics or a related technical discipline from a recognized institution.
Advanced Degree preferred.
Experience performing analysis in support of RF or electronic system design, or an aspect of data processing of such a system.
Proficiency with a variety of popular engineering development tools such as Matlab, C, C++, Fortran; JAVA or Python is desirable.
Experience working in a laboratory environment, working with RF hardware and familiar with RF testing equipment such as network analyzers, spectrum analyzers, signal generators and power meters is desired.
Active Secret Security Clearance required.

*This position is contingent upon funding*

WR is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer and is committed to diversity in our workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, citizenship status, national origin, ancestry, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, veterans’ status, or any additional factors that are protected by law. Please see https://wrsystems.com/our-responsibility/ for more information.

Required Skills

Required Experience

Job Location
Fairfax, US-VA",3.8,"WR Systems
3.8","Fairfax, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
96,Staff Data Engineer,-1,"About Figure

At Figure, we're on a mission to transform financial services through blockchain, bringing speed, efficiency and savings to both consumers and institutions.

Accomplishing this kind of transformation requires building really big things. And we understand that building big requires a creative, team oriented and supportive environment where everyone can do their absolute best work. The Figure team is comprised of incredibly driven, innovative, collaborative and curious people who love architecting and building from scratch. Everyone at the company is encouraged to be an individual contributor but also a team collaborator.

We value team members who bring an entrepreneurial mindset to every task and will embrace our culture of innovation. Every day at Figure is a journey in continuous learning yet a daily focus on getting work done that makes a difference.

This is an opportunity to work with a team of proven leaders who have already created billions of dollars in value in the Fintech space. Join us!

** More about our recent Series C funding!

Here's our Blockchain Business, Provenance

About the Role

Figure is excited to be growing our businesses and creating new teams. We are looking for curious, innovative and collaborative team members. Engineering is at the heart of the action, building out our blockchain protocol and direct to consumer products that will transform the financial services industry. Everything is from scratch development and every engineer has a big impact on the team and the growth of the company.

As part of our Data Engineering team, you'll work closely with various business functions to understand Figure's analytic, data science, and reporting needs and to develop data products that address those needs. You will be contributing to data engineering's vision and development from day one.

This team has an incredible engineering challenge: integrate very large datasets that outline intricate details about consumers' credit profiles and real estate holdings, expose those datasets to data scientists in a way that enables their ML and modeling efforts, and shape those models into scalable, production-quality processes. In addition, the team provides the foundations for internal analytics and for internal and external reporting by transforming data from Figure applications and external vendors into clear data models.

What You'll Do
Leverage Spark, Airflow, Google Kubernetes Engine, BigQuery and other tools to build robust and efficient data pipelines.
Expand and optimize our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross-functional teams.
Collaborate with project leads and other software engineers across multiple teams
Work on data software solutions that will transform the consumer lending and blockchain space
Be a leader, use your voice, apply your tech skills to solve real world problems
What We Look For
BS degree in Computer Science or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
6+ years of proven working experience as a data engineer
3+ years' experience with Spark, either in Python or in Scala. Bonus points for Spark on EMR, Dataproc, or Kubernetes.
Working knowledge of Google Cloud tools (compute, cloud storage, GKE, GCR, AutoML, etc.)
Expertise building and optimizing data pipelines using Kafka (preferred), Kinesis, or other event bus.
Deep experience with data frameworks and tools like Spark, SparkML, Spark Streaming, Apache Beam, and Airflow.
Comfort with and experience working within CI/CD processes and tools and software development practices.
Experience with production machine learning workflows and processes.
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of SQL and NoSQL databases, including BigQuery (preferable), MySQL/MariaDB, Postgres or Cassandra.
Expertise in data modeling for data science, reporting, and analytics, including dimensional and transactional models.
Nice to have: experience building real-time transformations and learning models on streams.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced growing company.
Benefits To You
Competitive salary
Firm-wide performance based bonus
Competitive stock options package
A flexible paid time off and vacation policy
Comprehensive health, vision, dental insurance
Company FSA, 401k, commuter benefits
And much more to come!
Figure will NOT sponsor work visas for this position. In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.",4.3,"Figure
4.3",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Data Engineering Specialist - Snowflake,-1,"Daman, Inc is currently seeking a Data Engineering Specialist - Snowflake to join our team!*
About: *
As part of Damans Data Engineering team, you will be architecting and delivering highly scalable, high-performance data integration, and transformation platforms. The solutions you will work on will include cloud, hybrid, and legacy environments that will require a broad and deep stack of data engineering skills. You will be using core cloud data warehouse tools, Python, spark, events streaming platforms, and other data management related technologies. You will also engage in requirements and solution concept development, requiring strong analytical and communication skills.
Salary: * $100,000-150,000/ Year depending on experience
Benefits: *
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Responsibilities: *
Optimally leverage the data integration tool components for developing efficient solutions for data management, data wrangling, data packaging, and integration. Develop overall design and determine the division of labor across various architectural components
Deploy and customize Daman Standard Architecture components
Mentor client personnel. Train clients on the Daman Integration Methodology and related supplemental solutions
Provide feedback and enhance Daman intellectual property related to data management technology deployments
Assist in the development of task plans including schedule and effort estimation
Qualifications: *
Bachelors Degree or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, Computer Applications, Information Systems or Engineering is required
3+ years of Data Management Experience
3+ years of batch ETL tool experience (DataStage / Informatica / Talend)
3+ years experience developing, deploying, and supporting scalable and high-performance data pipelines
2+ years experience with Hadoop Ecosystem (HDFS/S3, Hive, Spark)
2+ years experience in software engineering, leveraging Java, Python, Scala, etc.
2+ years advanced distributed schema and SQL development skills including partitioning for the performance of ingestion and consumption patterns
2+ years experience with distributed NoSQL databases (Apache Cassandra, Graph databases, Document Store databases)
Experience in the financial services, banking, and/ or Insurance industries is a nice to have
_Indeed Hire and Daman, Inc are working together to find the best candidate for this job. _*
_By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Management: 3 years (Required)
batch ETL tool : 3 years (Required)
Hadoop Ecosystem: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Job distance:
Plano, TX: Between 31 and 40 miles (Preferred)",3.9,"Daman, Inc
3.9","Plano, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
98,Senior Data Engineer - Solovis,$80k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Solovis

Solovis is a revolutionary new SaaS platform offering a multi-asset class portfolio management and reporting solution for foundations, endowments, pensions, OCIOs, and family offices. Our firm is on a mission to set a new industry standard for performance, exposure, and portfolio analysis. The key to that success is to continue disrupting the industry with transformational technology designed specifically for limited partners. At Solovis, we recognize our employees by personally investing in them and providing a rewarding corporate culture centered around growth, training, and an opportunity to shape the future of our product.

Senior Data Engineer

We are looking for a savvy Sr. Data Engineer who will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for use across existing products. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing and designing data systems. The Data Engineer will work alongside our software engineers, architects, and data analysts on data and integration initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting multiple systems, products and data flows. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support uses cases in the FinTech arena.

What you’ll do
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture
Sets technical direction by designing solutions to complex problems
Improves the performance, observability, and reliability of our data pipelines.
Work with large, complex financial data sets that require sophisticated processing and transformation.
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build resilient and maintainable infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources.
Work as part of an Agile development team with stakeholders to develop new features to support their data infrastructure needs.
Manage data cross multiple platforms, including Azure SQL and Snowflake.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Mentor less experienced team members by providing counsel and constructive oversight
Requirements

What you bring
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases. Must have the ability to write complex analytical queries.
Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured and semi-structured datasets.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disparate datasets.
Experience supporting and working with several products in a dynamic environment.
We are looking for a candidate with 5+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a degree in Computer Science, and/or another quantitative field. They should also have experience using the following software/tools:
Experience creating data pipelines and utilizing scheduling and workflow management tools is required. Experience with Airflow and/or dbt is strongly preferred.
Cloud experience strongly preferred with a strong preference towards Azure. Snowflake, RedShift, or Google BigQuery is a major plus.
Experience with object-oriented/object and functional scripting languages is required: C# and/or Python. Candidate must be proficient in either C# or Python.
Ability to lead, understand, and contribute to technical discussions
Effective communicator with excellent verbal and written communication skills. Must be comfortable communicating with development teams, Product Owners, Product Management, and company leadership
High level of accountability for program execution, deliverables, and reporting to technical management
High motivation and drive to help product teams excel and deliver based on roadmap and associated timelines
Excellent interpersonal skills – ability to work well in a team with diverse personality types
This is a hands-on role in which 85% of your time will be spent architecting and developing.
Benefits

What we bring

Purpose – we are about providing our customers investment knowledge when they need it so that they can positively impact the world around them
Top notch team members and collaborative environment.
Endless opportunity with the ability to progress into various disciplines and expertise or into a leadership role as company growth continues
Solovis is an Equal Opportunity Employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind: Solovis is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Solovis are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, marital, status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate.",4.7,"eVestment
4.7","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
99,Information Systems Security Engineer (ISSE) - Cyber Security Systems Engineer,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System Design & Architecture teamis the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The more than 2,100 employees provide requirements definition and design at the system, subsystem and component level every day in a collaborative environment which is characterized by respect for the individual, problem solving in a team setting, consensus oriented solutions, and results based recognition. Supporting this mission are teams providing domain expertise and creative solutions in surveillance, naval and missile defense based radar system design, sonar and undersea sensor system design, integrated air and missile defense systems engineering, command and control/battle management system design, combat system and platform architecture design and integration, software intensive system engineering, cyber solutions and algorithm development for signal processing, tracking and discrimination systems. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of achieving excellence through thought and team work while leveraging individual diversity conducive to a flexible work schedule and environment.

Key Responsibilities:
Support the development of cybersecurity requirements, design and architecture artifacts, plans, and policies.
Defining security development and test efforts implementation of security controls of networking devices, databases, operating systems, and hardware and software components
Understanding and integrating cybersecurity development activities.
Support the development of RMF documents and controls validation testing for Authority to Operate (ATO) accreditations.
Performing analysis on cybersecurity collected data and test results.
Conducting cybersecurity audits to ensure appropriate implementation and compliance of the security posture.
Conducting technical and nontechnical trade studies.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring the cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Understanding and compliance with DoD technology release and export licensing policies.
Required Experience/Skills:
Minimum of 2+ years of Technical (hands-on) experience related to Information Assurance/Cyber Engineering requirements, determination, development, and implementation.
Experience in the field of Systems Engineering, including any of the following: System Requirements definition and analysis, System Test and Analysis, and Systems Engineering Studies.
Experience in security systems engineering involving various computer hardware and software S/W operating system and application solutions in both a stand-alone and in LAN/WAN configurations.
Experience with security features and/or vulnerability analysis of various operating systems as defined by Intelligence agencies, NIST, DISA (STIGs) and USCYBERCOM.
Experience with IA vulnerability testing and related network and system test tools; e.g., Retina, NMap, Nessus, Security Content Automation Protocol (SCAP).
Experience with information security toolset including: anti-virus, Vulnerability Assessment, HIDS/ NIDS, host-based or endpoint security solutions, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), and Security Incident and Event Management (SIEM) and centralized auditing tools.
DoDI 8570.01-M IAT Level-II Compliant Certification (e.g. Security+ or CISSP or equivalent).
Experience leading and growing a team of engineers.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Desired Experience/Skills:
Experience with IT and/or network and system security administration, including operating system security configuration and account management best practices for UNIX, MS Windows, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and CISCO systems.
Understanding of Systems Engineering requirements, specifications, and Experience implementing DoD and Federal IA Certification and Accreditation Processes, IA controls and developing and maintaining associated certification and accreditation documentation.
Ability to organize, multi-task and prioritize tasks in a fast paced, deadline driven environment.
Familiar with NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF) as described in NIST Special Publication 800-37
Familiar with Program Protection Plan (PPP) required by DoDI 5000.02 and DoDI 5200.39
Security related Network (e.g., Cisco) and Operating Systems (e.g., Linux, Windows, Solaris) certification or training
Knowledge of Agile / DevOps techniques.
Experience with multi-level security.
Knowledge of DoD Exportability/Releasability Requirements.
Experience working U.S. Government contract proposals as an Information Assurance Engineer subject matter expert.
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics); advanced degree(s) Business or related discipline
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain required Export Authorization 168516

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
100,CO-OP Engineer,$45k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

We currently have an opportunity for a Summer 2021 Co-op in the Medical Devices R&D Division to join a Systems Engineering team, providing solutions to technical problems associated with new or launched apheresis medical devices under the guidance and supervision of senior team members.

This position is located at our Lake Zurich, IL Corporate headquarters and the student must be available to work 3 terms (semesters/quarters/summers), as a co-op while still in school.

Responsibilities

Developing system- and subsystem-level requirements for medical devices that include mechanical/electrical hardware, software, disposables, and labeling.
Developing test methods to explore design options and challenge requirements.
Owning test execution, including making observations, analyzing data, and interpreting and documenting results.
Presenting data summaries and design options to other engineers and non-technical members of the development team.
Generating clear and detailed technical documentation.

Requirements:
Minimum two years of undergraduate classwork in an engineering field (biomedical or mechanical preferred). GPA of 3.0 or higher.
Available to work 3 terms which may include summers, as a Co-op.
Proficient in Word and Excel.
Strong technical, mathematical and laboratory skills, including trainability in Good Laboratory Practice (GLP) and handling of bio hazardous materials.
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including trainability in Good Documentation Practice (GDP) and requirements definition.
Working knowledge of data analysis and statistics preferred.
Excellent organizational and time management skills, as well as the ability to think and work independently.
Must be authorized to work in the United States; the Company will not sponsor work visas or other employment authorization.

Additional Information

We offer an excellent salary and benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, as well as life insurance, disability, 401K with company match, and wellness program.

Fresenius Kabi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disabilities, or protected veteran status.",3.5,"Fresenius Kabi
3.5","Lake Zurich, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
101,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

Let's talk about Responsibilities:
**Location - Peachtree Corners, GA***
Work as part of a team focused on researching, analyzing, and implementing the most highly performance applications possible. Collaborate with other engineers and product owners to identify best in class software solutions to complex problems in the HME industry
Maintain and refactor existing based on research and performance profiling
Lead technical design discussions that produces high-performance, highly scalable and resilient software components
DB design/changes
Provide unit tests for all code; assist quality assurance resources with developing test plans
Assist with the development of performance tests and contribute to performance testing framework development
Conduct code reviews with other developers, including security checks
Promote SOLID design principles for software development in a cloud-based environment
Mentoring junior members of the team
Participate in technical interviews
You are passionate about software and technology and you are relentless in pursuing software performance and optimization objectives
Ability to analyze data and make recommendations based on data insights
You share our customer centric culture
You like to be challenged and you enjoy solving highly complex problems
You are a great team player who possess strong interpersonal and communication skills

Let's talk about Skills and Experience:

5+ years of experience in software engineering, preferably for a software company using Microsoft technologies in a web-based application.
You are experienced with a range of tools and techniques for performance profiling, debugging, and log analysis
Any experience with performance testing tools and approaches; particularly MSTEST, JMeter is a plus
Knowledge of .Net (C# and/or VB.net), ASP.NET and web technologies such as SignalR, Web API, WCF, View.js, Angular, TypeScript, JavaScript, CSS, HTML and Ajax.
Experience with MS SQL Server (TSQL/SQL) in a high-volume transaction environment; ability to understand SQL query plans and develop solutions
In-depth knowledge of Microsoft-focused software systems and their architectures
OO knowledge and practical experience of design patterns
Practical experience with source code configuration, versioning, and promotion
Excellent problem solving, issue identification and technical documentation skills
Ability to manage multiple concurrent priorities and meeting deadlines
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Experience using VS 2017/19, SQL Server 2014/2017, .Net 4.7/Core & C# 6, 7 techniques
Agile software methodology experience
Experience working in a SaaS model
Experience working in environments with a DevOps Culture and exposure to Continuous Delivery is a great plus

#LI-NF1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
102,Principal RF/Hardware Systems Engineer,-1,"RISCSI provides Operations and Maintenance support for the Intelligence Community

Job Description:
Raytheon Technologies currently has an opportunity for a qualified and experienced RF Systems/Hardware Engineer to provide engineering analysis, baseline management, operations and maintenance, system enhancement, and integration support. This position will be responsible for ensuring successful operation, maintenance, and sustainment of the hardware associated with a complex high priority operational communications system. Responsibilities also include establishing requirements for new software and system hardware enhancements, supporting efforts for new capabilities, and development and refinement of operational/engineering processes and procedures.

The RF Systems/Hardware Engineer will be expected to have the technical skills to troubleshoot, document, and resolving system outages and other issues that may be encountered during operation of the system. This includes the collection of diagnostic data, accurately documenting problems in logging and discrepancy reporting tools, restoring system operation, development of workarounds, and other activities necessary for recovery of the system. The RF Systems/Hardware Engineer will provide support to include store, retrieve, and manipulate data for analysis and troubleshooting of system capabilities and requirements; utilize analytic devices such as oscilloscopes and logic analyzers for troubleshooting; monitor functioning of equipment and make necessary modifications to ensure the system operates in conformance with specifications; support the generation of concept of operations and provide recommendations for system architecture.

Required Skills:
Prior experience developing and supporting RF ground systems engineering activities for a satellite communications system
Proficient use of Spectrum Analyzers, Network Analyzers, Signal Generators, Oscilloscopes
Experience generating, analyzing, tracking, and managing requirements
Experience with RF systems engineering developing and maintaining schematics, analysis, block diagrams, system Bill of Materials (BOMs), and design review packages
Must be able to apply previous knowledge and experience to provide recommendations for development of new operational concepts, architecture, and to increase efficiencies within the existing system
Must be able to provide occasional after hour call-in support
Must be able to support occasional travel (both CONUS and OCONUS). Must be able to support emergency repair trips with little or no advanced notice.
Highly articulate with strong written and verbal communications skills.
Technical ability to identify and document system related RF capability enhancements through generation and submittal of White Papers and other submittals.
Lead design performance & cost trade-offs for proposed engineering changes.
Taking a leadership role for design teams and provide technical oversight to the team members.
Must be able to work at heights and successfully complete Safety At Heights training/certification.
Desired Skills:
Experience working with vendors for the timely repair and tracking of critical operational hardware
Experience upgrading hardware supported by Windows and Linux based systems
Previous experience working with systems supported by Linux operating systems
Required Education (including Major):

Must have a BS Degree in Electrical, Mechanical, or Aerospace Engineering, physics, or related technical discipline and a minimum and 8 years relevant experience

#Space2020
166791

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","Aurora, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
103,Co-Op Software Engineer - Mapping,$34k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Role

We are seeking a Mapping Software Engineer Co-Op to help with the map creation and localization process used to enhance robotic driving.

As part of the mapping and visualization team, you will be able to create maps that give automated vehicles awareness of their environment. You will also be presented with opportunities to develop your own software to improve our ability to efficiently create maps of new areas and to visualize map data alongside data from many other software components.

Must be willing to be based locally in Blacksburg, VA for duration of Co-Op.

Summary

The Mapping Co-op is responsible for creating, updating, and maintaining high-definition (HD) maps as needed. The co-op will support the team by managing event failure analyses and mapping requests from other teams. Additional responsibilities include developing algorithms, processes, and/or scripts to support the creation, maintenance, and analysis of HD Map data. The scope of this position includes improving existing tools or developing new tools with the objective of improving the efficiency and accuracy of maps used for self-driving operation.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Create and maintain map data used for self-driving operation
Perform event analysis using vehicle test data
Manage mapping requests from other teams
Improve processes for map creation, maintenance, and analysis
Experience, Skills, and Knowledge
Comfortable with 3D geometry and coordinate transforms
Experience with Python
Ability to troubleshoot software
Experience with Linux
ArcGIS, SQL, QGIS, JOSM is a plus
Experience with C++ and ROS is a plus
Desire to learn and eagerness to help with a variety of tasks
Education, Licensing, and Certifications - Required

Candidate must be a full-time student currently pursuing an undergraduate or graduate degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related field and willing to locate to the Blacksburg area.",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
104,Junior Avionics Engineer - Human Landing System (HLS),$35k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics has been selected by NASA to participate in the development and demonstration of a Human Landing System (HLS). Dynetics is seeking project engineers, systems engineers, mechanical design engineers, electrical engineers, structural and thermal analysts, manufacturing engineers, test engineers, technicians, and operators to join a diverse team in support of the development of the HLS that will carry the first woman and next man to the Moon by 2024.

Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking talented Avionics Engineers to join a diverse, highly-skilled team to create unique solutions for complex problems involving space systems. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost effective intelligence, engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The Avionics Engineers will support the Dynetics Space Division in the development of a human lander system and support equipment, primarily responsible for the analysis of functional and physical interfaces of system components and the development of space qualified system designs. The position requires use of electrical computer aided design software, professional trade knowledge in the science of electrical design, and other analysis tools to produce electrical designs and production drawings. This includes collecting data to determine supplier capabilities and in supporting the development of statements of work. Candidate will work in a team environment to support conceptual design through product implementation, and should be able to assist and/or lead engineering design disposition on drawing discrepancies.

IND2
Basic Qualifications


Possess a Bachelor's of Science in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, or equivalent degree from an ABET-accredited university.

Candidate must have at least three (3) years of direct experience in role as detailed above with an engineering company or system integrator where design, testing, and/or modification of aerospace systems was involved.

Position requires candidates to be capable of performing in a collaborative engineering environment working closely with multi-disciplinary teams.

Candidate must have demonstrated experience effectively communicating within a team environment.

Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications


Preference shown to candidates who possess a Master’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or equivalent degree from an ABET-accredited university.

Preference shown to candidates who have experience and/or working knowledge of:
Experience working NASA, Defense programs or other aerospace development projects.
Engineering Experience in design, testing, and/or modification of aerospace systems.
Experience working as part of multi-company and multi-organizational development teams.
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen.

Candidate must possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.50.97-149

Closing Date:
08/31/2020

#CJ

#LI",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
105,Cloud Engineer - TS/SCI,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Linux Cloud Engineer with TS/SCI for Roles in St Louis, MO

My name is Stephen Hrutka and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the DOD and IC.

We just signed a new client looking to hire Linux Cloud Engineers with TS/SCI to support a DoD Client in St Louis, MO.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Executive Summary: HRUCKUS is seeking Linux Cloud Engineers to join the Open Data Store (ODS) team to provide quality cost-effective solutions to the client. As part of the ODS Team, various expertise is needed to support a sophisticated enterprise environment both on premise as well as in the cloud.

Responsibilities:
Architect, build and maintain on premise and/or cloud infrastructure to support team and customer initiatives
Maintain and improve existing infrastructure (e.g., build out autoscaling, support new services, optimize for cost efficiencies/authentication/search, etc.)
Administer production, staging and development environments
Manage and aggregate server logs and monitor for security and system related incidents
Monitor and analyze system performance, such as server load and resource usage
Maintain and improve existing build and deployment processes using CI/CD tools
Apply configuration management disciplines to maintain software revisions, security patches, hardening, and documentation
Enforce best practices for security and reliability, and drive security initiatives, like access control and vulnerability testing
Work with A&A Teams to maintain security requirements for operation of systems
Perform routine equipment checks and preventative maintenance
Maintain up to date documentation of designs/configurations
Work with other service providers to support areas of common interest
Requirements/Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance Required.
5+ years of relevant experience
Bachelor's Degree in related field, or the equivalent combination of experience/training
Experience working within Linux distributions such as RedHat, Ubuntu, CentOS
Strong Understanding of DevOps and software/application development processes
Experience with GitLab, Jenkins, Nexus, and other DevOps/Continuous Integration tools
Experience with cloud orchestration tools (e.g., SALT, Chef, etc.)
Experience with public clouds such as AWS, Google, Azure
Experience with Python framework and Shell scripting
Knowledge of network technologies, common infrastructure components, load balancers, firewalls, virtual and physical infrastructure design
Strong problem solving and troubleshooting skills
Strong communication and interpersonal skills
Must possess excellent time management skills and the drive to work unsupervised
Desired Qualifications:
Experience building Amazon EC2 instances and S3 buckets for development, test, and production environments
Experience working with API Management tools (e.g., APIGEE, Kong, etc)
Experience working closely with software development teams
Understanding of access management and security groups (e.g., IAM, S3 bucket, Cloud Trail, SSH, VPN, etc.)
Ability to write and use unit and functional testing",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
106,"Elasticsearch Engineer (ELK - Elastic, Logstash, Kibana)",$70k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"ShorePoint is a cybersecurity services firm with a focus on high-profile, high-threat private and public-sector customers who demand experience and proven security models to protect their data. We are seeking a Elasticsearch Engineer who have experience desigining, building, securing and maintaining Elasticsearch solutions deployed in the federal market. This is a unique opportunity to shape the growth, development and culture of an exciting and emerging company in the cybersecurity market. The position is supporting a high profile, high visibility, cybersecurity modernization and risk management program.

Roles and Responsibilities
The Elasticsearch Engineer is responsible for working with the Service Design Team to design, document, build, secure, and maintain Elastic Stack Enterprise solutions (Elasticsearch, Logstash, Kibana, and Beats, with X-Pack subscription) deployed in the Cloud or on-premise proofed in a Lab environment to support federal agency production deployments.
The Elasticsearch Engineer will work closely with architects, engineers, and integrators to assess customer requirements and to design and support an Elasticsearch Stack solution to ensure compliance with dashboard data requirements.
Follow life cycle processes to move solutions from Dev to Test to Production.
Participate in group sessions as well as attend and share in agile sprint daily meetings in order to track progress to ensure development of solutions is in support of the CDM project and customer requirements.
Serve as a trusted advisor, providing subject matter expertise, guidance, and best practice recommendations.
Configuring and maintaining Linux based Operating Systems in support of the Elasticsearch products (yum updates and product version upgrades)
Installing and configuring an Elastic Cloud Enterprise solution in a lab and ensuring communication and integration among the Elasticsearch products and data sources
Documenting the installation and configuration for deployment into production
Securing the solution by being familiarity with TLS, certificates, SSO/PIV authentication, and encryption technologies
Working with the data lifecycle management
Testing data flows, troubleshooting issues, and monitoring the health of the solution and servers to maximize performance and minimize downtime
Working with a team and providing analysis of alternatives and progress status in daily sprint meetings
Meet professional obligations through efficient work habits such as, meeting deadlines, honoring schedules, coordinating resources and meetings in an effective and timely manner
Develop and manage effective working relationships with other departments, groups and personnel with whom work must be coordinated or interface
Recommend enhancements and modifications to optimize business intelligence processes
Required Skills
2+ years of Elastic Stack (Elasticsearch, Logstash, Beats, Kibana, and X-pack) experience in production
Linux, CentOS and/or Red Hat Enterprise Linux (RHEL) experience
Experience with Elastic Cloud Enterprise (ECE) a plus
Experience with data ingest, Extract, Transform, and Load (ETL) techniques preferable Logstash and Beats
Experience with multi-node clustering, architecture, development, implementation, and health monitoring of the system. Knowledge of hot/warm/cold data/index lifecycle management (ILM) and Curator implementations
Knowledge of Elasticsearch Management
Knowledge of reindexing and data mappings
Knowledge of JSON and KQL searching syntax
Knowledge of Kibana dashboard options
Experience with automated configuration management tool and playbooks (Ansible, Chef, Puppet, SaltStack) and (Docker) containers, and version control systems (GitHub, GitLab)
Experience with cloud infrastructure preferably Amazon Web Services (AWS) and Azure
Experience with NoSQL and related solutions: MongoDB, Apache Lucene, Apache Solr, etc.
Experience working in DevOps structured and Agile organizations
Excellent communication, and relationship skills to articulate advanced technical topics and build consensus among clients and technical stakeholders
Strong interpersonal and collaborations skills working in a team-oriented environment
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Ability to adhere to defined processes & procedures, and suggest improvements
Ability to effectively prioritize and handle multiple tasks simultaneously
Strong technical documentation skills
Experience with DHS Continuous Diagnostics and Mitigation (CDM) a plus
Desired Skills
Elastic Certified Engineer (ECE)
Experience with SIEM technologies: ArcSight, Splunk
Experience with SAML authentication, familiarity with domain structures, user authentication, and PKI
Experience with Messaging Queues (e.g. Kafka, RabbitMQ)
Experience with Microsoft SQL
Experience with programming and working with regular expressions (XML, Java, PCRE, JSON, Python, Ruby, PowerShell, painless, grok)
Relevant security certifications a plus: CISSP, CISM, CISA, Security+, CEH
Understanding of interrelationships between critical infrastructure protection and cybersecurity
Knowledge and experience with Assessment & Authorization (A&A) processes in Federal environments, preferably with experience utilizing the NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF)
Education Requirement
BS in Computer Science or related field experience required
Years of Experience Requirement
2+ years of Elastic stack (Elasticsearch, Logstash, Beats, Kibana, and X-pack) experience in production
Location
Reston, VA
Security Clearance
Ability to obtain DHS Suitability/Entry on Duty (EOD). Active clearances preferred",4.5,"ShorePoint
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
107,Data Engineer,$49k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"With our strong investment in research and development and our culture of continuous improvement, Hexcel is the industry leader in the manufacturing of composite materials and industrial fabrics. We invite you to join the Hexcel team at various manufacturing sites, sales offices and R&T centers around the globe. Become a part of the “strength within.”

Hexcel is currently seeking a Data Engineer for our Salt Lake City, UT, USA location.

The selected individual will be responsible for but not limited to the following obligations:

Working with product owners to identify data needs
Working with data owners to identify existing data sources and securing access
Engineering data pipelines to pull data from both on premises and cloud data sources
Create & maintain optimized data pipeline architecture
Extracting data and consolidating with data lakes, data warehouse and data marts
Engineering models to connect different data sources together
Constructing a library of data components that can easily be reused to answer different business questions
Maintaining and updating existing data models
Assist in the development of the Hexcel data infrastructure
Troubleshooting and fixing production issues
You will be a proactive self-improver, continually striving to increase your skill set

Qualifications:

Five plus years of relevant ETL, data engineering or similar experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent
Experience with cloud data platforms required
Experience with Azure SQL Server, Azure Synapse, Azure Analysis Services and Azure Data Factory highly desirable, but not essential
Ability to work with remote teams
Strong desire to learn new technologies and methodologies
Strong understanding of Power BI platform and Power BI paginated
Ability to design complex data sets to meet the needs of business requirements
Ability to work with users and/or product owners to assist with data related technical issues
Understanding of modern data platform technologies and methodologies desirable
Ability to troubleshoot and optimize data pipelines
Strong knowledge of SQL required; Understanding of DAX and/or MDX a plus
Experience with Databricks desirable, but not essential
Experience with agile/lean methodologies would be a bonus
Don’t need to be an expert in all technologies, but several would be desired with a curiosity for others – Python, R, Scala, .NET, C#

Eligible candidate must be: U.S. citizen, U.S. national, a person lawfully admitted for permanent residence, a temporary resident under sections 210(a) or 245(A) of the Act, a person admitted in refugee status, a person granted asylum. Hexcel (NYSE: HXL) is a global leader in advanced composites technology, a leading producer of carbon fiber, and the world leader in honeycomb manufacturing for the commercial aerospace industry.

Hexcel is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, physical or mental disability, status as protected veteran, or any other protected class.",3.6,"Hexcel Corporation
3.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1948,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
108,Sr Systems Engineer- Operations Analysis,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..

Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System of Systems Modeling and Architecture Directorate performs customer focused operational analysis and simulation activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). Supporting this mission are teams driving flexible integration solutions crossing all product areas (sensors, effectors, command and control, logistics and operations), developing tools and methods to evaluate system level analysis and visualization based on customer requirements. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of excellence through innovation and teamwork while championing individual diversity in a flexible work environment to meet the needs of todays workforce.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments that will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

We are looking for motivated engineers to join our team in the development of novel system of system architectures to deliver best of breed solutions to our customers. Our engineers bring broad DoD mission skills in radar, sensor, C2, and effector data analysis and analytics. The systems engineer should have expertise in Python, Matlab, or Java for technical modeling, simulation or analysis of real-world and modeled data to create deep understanding of needs/constraints and breakdown traditional stovepiped systems to assemble dynamic system-of-system solutions. The systems engineer will analyze end-to-end system needs, in particular to understand system interfaces and data connectivity requirements across the kill-chain. Tasks will include analyzing data, understanding performance requirements, developing metrics, developing or implementing algorithms to cleanse, process, and combine products from multiple systems to provide next-generation performance across the entire system of systems.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 4 years of experience in the field of engineering or related technical discipline
Computer programming experience including strong Python experience with exposure to Matlab or Java
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
Desired Skills:
Masters or PhD in Engineering, Science, Physics, Mathematics, Operations Research or other relevant technical discipline
Strong team-member and collaborator with effective written and oral communication skills
Experience participating and supporting analyses and studies to include understanding how to define and execute a study
Experience evaluating new concepts of operation and developing new technology use cases
Strong technical and analytical skills to develop credible results for presenting to the customer
Knowledge of principles such as CONOPS, system tradeoff analysis, threat definitions, and system of system assessments
Engineering domain experience in EO/IR/RF sensor, kinetic weapon, and/or electronic warfare systems
System Knowledge in warfighting Domains, including at least one of the following: Air Defense, Ballistic Missile Defense, Ship Self-Defense, Air/Land/Sea/Joint C4I, Operations in a Cyber Contested Environment, Network Centric Operations, Air Traffic Management, Critical Infrastructure Protection
Existing TS/SCI security clearance
Required Education: Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics, Operations Research or related discipline.

Keywords: software, systems, engineer, architecture, algorithm, DoD, C/C++, Java, JavaScript, Python, real-time computing, RF sensor, electronic warfare, operations research

At RTX, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision that is shared by RTX employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

RTX has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether you are just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, RTX offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits RTX offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor 167562

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
109,Information Systems Security Engineer (ISSE) - Cyber Security,-1,"Job Summary:
We are currently seeking a CSI Information Systems Security Engineer (ISSE) to function as a key contributor for the Systems Design Directorate team in the Massachusetts area (i.e. Woburn, Tewksbury, etc).

The Systems Design & Architecture team is the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters. RMD created Cyber Solutions and Integration (CSI) to expand growth opportunities with a focus on system Anti-Tamper (AT) and Cyber Security architecture, requirements, design and implementation, as well as Cyber resiliency, threat awareness, and integration of Enterprise Cyber capabilities into RMD franchise solutions.

Key Responsibilities:
Establish and manage a program vision.
Lead engineering execution across all IPTs, CPTs, and disciplines within the Program.
Primary Cyber Solutions POC with the customer senior counterparts.
Responsibility to manage all program engineering related activities related to the development of the exportable version of the system. Authority over and direct management of the program leads to ensure that products are delivered on time, on budget and meet system requirements.
Support the development of cybersecurity requirements, design and architecture artifacts, plans, and policies.
Defining security development and test efforts implementation of security controls of networking devices, databases, operating systems, and hardware and software components
Understanding and integrating cybersecurity development activities.
Support the development of RMF documents and controls validation testing for Authority to Operate (ATO) accreditations.
Performing analysis on cybersecurity collected data and test results.
Conducting cybersecurity audits to ensure appropriate implementation and compliance of the security posture.
Conducting technical and nontechnical trade studies.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring the cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Understanding and compliance with DoD technology release and export licensing policies.
Required Experience/Skills:
Minimum of 8+ years of Technical (hands-on) experience related to Information Assurance/Cyber Engineering requirements, determination, development, and implementation.
Experience in the field of Systems Engineering, including any of the following: System Requirements definition and analysis, System Test and Analysis, and Systems Engineering Studies.
Experience in security systems engineering involving various computer hardware and software S/W operating system and application solutions in both a stand-alone and in LAN/WAN configurations.
Experience with security features and/or vulnerability analysis of various operating systems as defined by Intelligence Agencies, NIST, DISA (STIGs) and USCYBERCOM.
Experience with IA vulnerability testing and related network and system test tools; e.g., Retina, NMap, Nessus, Security Content Automation Protocol (SCAP).
Experience with information security toolset including: anti-virus, Vulnerability Assessment, HIDS/ NIDS, host-based or endpoint security solutions, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), and Security Incident and Event Management (SIEM) and centralized auditing tools.
DoDI 8570.01-M IAT Level-II Compliant Certification (e.g. Security+ or CISSP or equivalent).
Experience leading and growing a team of engineers.
Collaborating with program and engineering disciplines and ensuring cybersecurity solution alternatives.
Desired Experience/Skills:
Experience with IT and/or network and system security administration, including operating system security configuration and account management best practices for UNIX, MS Windows, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and CISCO systems.
Understanding of Systems Engineering requirements, specifications, and Experience implementing DoD and Federal IA Certification and Accreditation Processes, IA controls and developing and maintaining associated certification and accreditation documentation.
Ability to organize, multi-task and prioritize tasks in a fast paced, deadline driven environment.
Familiar with NIST Risk Management Framework (RMF) as described in NIST Special Publication 800-37
Familiar with Program Protection Plan (PPP) required by DoDI 5000.02 and DoDI 5200.39
Security related Network (e.g., Cisco) and Operating Systems (e.g., Linux, Windows, Solaris) certification or training
Knowledge of Agile / DevOps techniques.
Experience with multi-level security.
Knowledge of DoD Exportability/Releasability Requirements.
Experience working U.S. Government contract proposals as an Information Assurance Engineer subject matter expert.
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics); advanced degree(s) Business or related discipline
This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
165781

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Andover, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
110,Senior Security Operations Engineer,$69k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is looking for a Senior Security Operations Engineer to add to our rapidly growing security team. If you love innovation, here's your chance to make a career of it by advancing the digital identity ecosystem. We are seeking a talented Security Engineer who enjoys the challenges of planning, implementing, and upgrading security measures and controls, to include: Security Information and Event Management (SEIM) tools, Intrusion Detection and Prevention Systems (IDS/IPS), and other associated tools. The team owns the end-to-end security of all systems and data for ID.me, and our Security Engineer should be passionate about security and working in a fast-paced, ambiguous environment.

Responsibilities
Defend systems against unauthorized access, modification, and/or destruction
Provide subject matter expertise on security architecture and operations
Design, deploy and monitor security tools such as a SIEM, IDS/IPS, EDR, firewalls, etc
Troubleshoot systems to determine the root cause of issues impacting security infrastructure
Act as an escalation point for security analyst and resource during incident response
Lead security integration and automation to improve detection, monitoring, and response
Collaborate with cross-functional groups such as DevOps, Software Engineering, etc
Qualifications
10+ years of experience in information security
7+ years experience engineering, implementing, and monitoring security measures for the protection of systems, networks, and information
3+ years of experience supporting a Security Operations Center (SOC) or similar
Bonus: Hands on experience with SIEM technologies (Splunk, Elastic, etc)
Bonus: Experience with Security Orchestration, Automation, and Response (SOAR)
Bonus: Experience with Information Security Compliance, (SOC, FedRAMP, ISO, etc)
Bonus Experience in scripting (Bash, Python, and/or Ruby)
Bonus: Experience with cloud technologies such as AWS, GCP, and/or Azure
Industry security certifications, such as GCIH/ECIH, Security+, or related
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"ID.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,Senior Laser Engineer,$87k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary: Become a member of the Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Advanced Technologies directorate (DV) that develops, analyzes, and assesses new sensor technology, discriminating sensors, next generation weapons, laser systems, and other advanced concepts. The Senior Engineer candidate provides systems engineering, technical, and programmatic support for MDA/DV programs.
Duties & Responsibilities:
Provide technical support for advanced sensor system engineering, integration, and testing for MDA Advanced Technologies directorate (DV).
Provide onsite support to MDA/DV in Albuquerque, NM. Duties include support acquisition, architecture development, performance & interoperability analysis, system engineering, test and experimentation, data analysis, tactics, techniques and procedures, CONOPS development, strategic communications and program operations support across specific programs at the appropriate classification levels.
Prepare test plans, milestones (i.e., test schedules, technology decision points), checklists, and procedures. Document detailed requirements for test assets and identify test instrumentation. Evaluate status of products and tasks and identify risks, watch items and issues. Assist in coordinating issue resolution efforts with the element prime contractors. Report, brief and document the results for leadership.
Engage in reviews of test program compliance with overall system and element capability specifications and requirements in test plans. Make recommendations for areas where planned testing is inadequate or insufficient. Support analysis for initial component test design and operational test requirements.
Assist with developing test procedures, data collection procedures, and post mission reporting (e.g., hardware environmental, hardware in the loop and regression tests [e.g., Electro-Magnetic Interference, and Climatic] in support of suitability, survivability, safety and effectiveness assessment).
Participate in the test planning process and assist with capturing and transferring data for system flight and element objectives outlined in the Test Objectives Memorandums and other official MDA directives.
Coordinate future DV requirements, technical analyses, and assessments of alternate ranges and test facilities for the conduct of lab, ground, and flight testing to include evaluating feasibility of planned scenarios as it pertains to system and element test execution.
Assist with system and component (Element) flight test strategic and execution planning and design analysis support. Develop, prepare, and present test and evaluation concepts, analyses, strategies, plans, and briefings; assist with target system solutions to meet test requirements; and analyze system and element flight test matrices.
Assess DV advanced technology performance and execution for Warfighter integration. This includes program planning, program risk assessment (cost, schedule, and performance), analysis of program performance and review and assessment of documentation or deliverables from prime contractors. Coordinate technology products with MDA Senior Leadership, COCOMs and Services to address Warfighter needs to inform technology decisions.
Monitor technical developments inside and outside DOD affecting MDA’s mission, providing inputs on advanced technology investment strategies within DV.
Analyze advanced technology systems to determine the feasibility of integrating with the Warfighter.
Create technical briefings and/or documentation to present to senior leadership.
Participate in requirements and technical meetings with Government Customers, Prime Contractors, and FFRDCs / UARCs.
The candidate must possess strong oral and written communication skills and be comfortable in communicating with the customer and senior leadership.
The individual must be self-motivated and have the ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, dynamic team environment and be able to make proper and timely decisions and recommendations.
Skills:
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, or related discipline.
Must have 10-15 years relevant experience with a strong technical background.
Experience with EO/IR sensors and laser systems, integration, and testing procedures.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite (Power Point, Word, and Excel).
Critical thinking and problem solving skills.
Strong oral and written communication skills.
Ability to work with a team in a dynamic environment.
This position requires that the candidate possess an active TS/SCI security clearance in order to access classified and program information. Position is located in Albuquerque, NM; some travel may be required.
Experience with Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) characteristics, design, performance and testing.
Strong attention to detail and ability to efficiently perform multiple tasks
Ability to communicate detailed technical information to technical and non-technical personnel and senior leadership.
Physical Requirements: _Millennium offers a comprehensive benefits package. Millennium is An Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer. Millennium does not discriminate on any basis prohibited by applicable law including race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, citizenship status, or Vietnam era or special disabled veteran's status in recruitment, employment, promotion, compensation, benefits, or training. It is also Millennium's policy to maintain a work environment free from discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation._
_Millennium participates in the E-Verify program._*
Location: 2000 Randolph Road,SE, Albuquerque, NM 87106

Job Type: Full-time",4.0,"Millennium Engineering & Integration Company
4.0","Albuquerque, NM",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
112,"Sr. Engineer, Cloud Security Operations",$98k-$194k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

Automation Anywhere is a global leader in Robotic Process Automation (RPA), empowering customers to automate end-to-end business processes with software bots – digital workers that perform repetitive and manual tasks, resulting in dramatic productivity gains, optimized customer experience and more engaged employees. The company offers the world’s only web-based and cloud-native intelligent automation platform combining RPA, artificial intelligence, machine learning, and analytics right out of the box, to help organizations rapidly start and scale their process automation journey. Its Bot Store is the world's first and largest marketplace with more than 850 pre-built, intelligent automation solutions. With offices in more than 40 countries and a global network of 1,900 partners, Automation Anywhere has deployed over 2.1 million bots to support some of the world’s largest enterprises across all industries. For additional information, visit www.automationanywhere.com.

Overview

We are currently seeking a Sr. Security Operations Engineer for our Cloud Ops Engineering team. As part of this dynamic group, you will help design, build, deploy, operate and monitor the company cloud security and compliance capabilities. You will report to the Director, Cloud Security and will be a key member of our team to help shape the future of our business.

Primary Duties
Provide recommendations and ongoing feedback for tools and other new technologies to support business objectives
Collaborate with cloud support, engineering, corporate IT and security to enhance, improve, or modify enterprise and cloud based security detection and response
Update, modify, and enhance existing processes and tools in use within Cloud Security
Analyze and correlate log data for security events
Develop and share documentation on business-critical processes and procedures
Regularly view and verify existing metrics to ensure accuracy and quality
Escalation point for junior engineers to provide insight into security findings
Support ongoing compliance and audit activities
Minimum Qualifications
2-4 years' experience working in a SOC or NOC environment
Experience with scripting/coding (REGEX search strings, bash scripting, Python parsing)
Experience with vulnerability, change, and asset management
Excellent task prioritization and time management skills
Experience with SOC2, FedRAMP, or other industry certification standards
Experience with Linux/UNIX systems and the best practices for deploying applications to those stacks
Experience with networking and core Internet protocols (e.g. TCP/IP, DNS, SMTP, HTTP, and distributed networks)
Experience with Incident Response and break-fix scenarios
Experience or interest in digital forensics or threat hunting
Knowledge of SIEM solutions (monitoring, alerting, and configuring)
Solid skills of cloud solutions and security best practices for operating in the cloud
Strong knowledge of industry standards, vulnerability classifications, and attack vectors
Knowledge of MITRE ATT&CK Framework and Cyber Kill Chain; how they pertain to cloud and web applications
Experience working effectively with global teams in multiple time zones
Preferred Qualifications
Superb communication and presentation skills
Agility and willingness to deal with a high level of ambiguity, change, and pressures of high-profile incidents
Flexibility—willingness to pitch in where needed across program and team
Strong leadership, influence, and teamwork skills; sound problem resolution, judgment, negotiating, and decision-making skills
Why Automation Anywhere?

At our company each person brings their unique talents to work as a team and make a difference. As the leader in Robotic Process Automation (RPA), we provide a very compelling product where our teams are breaking new ground every day and given an environment to grow their skills and have fun along the way. Our technology is the game changer, and our people give us the edge to better our world and go be great!

Automation Anywhere is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis.

#LI-JS1",2.9,"Automation Anywhere
2.9","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
113,Advanced Radar and Signals Engineer,$53k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented Advanced Radar and Signals Engineer to join a diverse team to create unique solutions for complex sensor and radar orientated problems.

The Engineer in this role will support advanced technology radar and EW programs including research and development of advanced digital signal processing (DSP) algorithms; high-fidelity radar and RF modeling, simulation, and analysis; data acquisition and distribution; hardware and software prototyping; integration of COTS components into solutions for radar technology development; integration and field testing of RF sensors and systems; and CONUS/OCONUS deployment of advanced sensor systems.

IND3
Basic Qualifications


-Candidate must possess a Bachelor's degree or higher in Electrical Engineering or Computer Engineering from an ABET-sccredited school. Math or Physics from an ABET-accredited school with a strong demonstration of the skills listed below will also be considered.

-Candidate must have excellent math skills and/or possess and show good fundamentals in one or more of the following:
Electromagnetics
Signals and systems
Digital signal processing
Technical software development
Firmware development
-Candidate must be able to apply these skills to the areas of radar modeling & simulation, antenna array theory, digital signal processing, tracking, algorithm development, radar system component design, technical software development, firmware development, RF cascade design, use of laboratory equipment, and field testing of sensor systems.

-Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications

Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.07.06-29

Closing Date:
11/27/2020

#CJ",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
114,AppD Senior Software Engineer,$95k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"About AppDynamics

AppDynamics's Application Performance Monitoring Platform empowers today’s software-defined businesses with the ability to actively monitor, manage, and optimize the most complex software environments. Starting with user interactions, we dynamically collect millions of performance data points across applications and infrastructure. We then apply intelligence to instantly identify performance anomalies, enable automatic fixes and continuously measure business impact. And all this takes place in real time, in production, with cloud or on-premise deployment flexibility. So even in the most dynamic production environments, you can know more and know it faster. It’s more than monitoring—it’s true Application Intelligence.

We are looking for software developers that are interested in improving our platform as we scale. We need our code to be reliable, performant, and cutting edge rock solid. We add features, diagnose and fix problems, and solve software problems using software.

We stand at the heart of the creative process, looking for solutions both in and out of our software while we evolve its capabilities. We traverse all levels of the stack, and use all manner of tools to debug every level from the server to the user interface, identify performance bottlenecks, follow the data, and make it right.

About you:

You are smart and get things done. You are fearless. You debug. You code. You know that it is not done until it is documented and checked in with automated tests. You count tools such as chrome developer tools, wireshark, tcpdump, sql, bash, git, IntelliJ and postman/paw among your friends. It’s just data, and you track down the problems. Philosophers think, mathematicians theorize, but we’re engineers, and we divide and conquer. We are not solving academic questions – we have practical questions that require practical answers. We speak the same language, and that means you have a solid command of written and verbal English. It also means that we can talk about CS fundamentals, like algorithms, complexity, and data structures. Bonus points if you are also fluent in a language other than English. You can talk to customers, and you know that the first rule is to sit on your hands and listen. You have experience. You have been there. You think Security is important. It is also important to our customers. You are independent, but you are also able to collaborate.

You love to learn, and you expect to do it on a daily basis. We don’t expect you to know everything, because that person does not exist.

You have deep experience in Java, C++ or C#, and understanding of managed frameworks such as the Java JVM or the .NET CLR. You know SQL basics. You have deep debugging experience. You have spent part of your career in one or more of Performance, Scale, Network, SRE, or Distributed Systems.

You have a Computer science education or equivalent.

Nice-to-haves:

Experience working with any of the APM solutions available on the market (Appdynamics, Wily, New Relic, Dynatrace, Open Telemetry)

Experience in a peak performance organization, preferably a tech startup

Experience with the Appdynamics products as a user

Product company experience

Experience working with a distributed team

Enterprise software company experience

Developer platform/tool industry experience

Experience working with a global or otherwise multicultural team

Passionate about/experienced with open source and developer tools

What you will gain:

You will learn and grow as a software engineer within our mentoring-rich environment.

You will have the opportunity to contribute your own ideas and shape the direction of our tools and products.

You will have the ability to have an immediate real world customer impact.

Benefits

We know that the award-winning culture at AppDynamics is something to brag about, but here are more reasons that make you excited to get out of bed to come in the morning, like:

• Medical, dental, vision coverage

•401k match (4.5%)

•Wellness perks (gym, hobbies, education, store discounts, personal finance)

•4 weeks paid time off (PTO), 5 days volunteer time off (VTO), 14 holidays (including 1 birthday PTO and 1 floating holiday)

•Mandatory company shut down between Christmas and New Year’s.

•Weekly catered breakfast and lunch, and all the snacks, fruits and drinks your heart desires, monthly happy hour events, and weekly massages.

•Free shuttle service and pre-tax commuter benefits.

Note to Recruiters and Placement Agencies: AppDynamics does not accept unsolicited agency resumes. Please do not forward unsolicited agency resumes to our website or to any AppDynamics employee. AppDynamics will not pay fees to any third-party agency or firm and will not be responsible for any agency fees associated with unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered property of AppDynamics.

AppDynamics is an equal opportunity employer and considers all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, age, protected veteran status, or any other unlawful factor. AppDynamics complies with all applicable laws, including those regarding consideration of qualified applicants with criminal histories (such as the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance). If your disability makes it difficult for you to use this site, please contact recruiting@appdynamics.com. AppDynamics participates in E-Verify.",4.4,"AppDynamics
4.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
115,PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER - CONSTRUCTION DEFECTS CIVIL P.E. OR STRUCTURAL P.E.,-1,"Providing engineering/technical, managerial and business development support to the Vice President of Construction Defect Services, you will put your winning combination of analytical and procedural skills together into a highly valued role for the organization’s continued growth and success. With significant forensic engineering investigations experience behind you, it is now time to take the next step up: taking the lead on your own projects, developing your own client relationships, mentoring younger talent, all while, of course, answering to daily project and client needs, testifying when needed, supporting the vice president’s workload and serving as an in-house engineering resource company-wide. read more

RESPONSIBILITIES

• Investigate an array of engineering and construction projects (civil/structural) to determine the cause & origin of failures, damages, incomplete work and/or defects — must be “hands-on” and willing to climb roofs, crawl in tight spaces, etc.

• Document existing site conditions using scaled sketches and/or diagrams, measurements, collection of written and photographic evidence, etc.

• Research a variety of technical issues using codes, standards, technical papers, text books, Internet, etc.

• Analyze available data, develop conclusions and prepare accurate, clear and concise investigative reports

• Develop technical project proposals, presentations and detailed budgets

• Provide expert testimony and/or depositions as needed

• Prepare exhibits and provide other litigation support as needed

• Participate in on-going training and development to assure knowledge and skills remain current and comprehensive

• Participate in business development activities and functions

• Become a respected facilitator on the team

• Provide effective management of all assigned tasks, meeting budget and delivery time frames and ensuring complete client confidence and satisfaction

QUALIFICATIONS

• Bachelors of Science degree in Civil Engineering or Structural Engineering from an accredited university

• Active P.E. license in California

• Multiple P.E. licenses in surrounding/other states highly preferred

• At least 5-10 years’ forensic engineering investigations experience

• Prior expert testimony or deposition experience preferred (but not required)

• Walking and climbing, as needed, to inspect multi-story residential, commercial and industrial sites

• Strong project management, data interpretation and technical writing skills

• Flexible working style to accommodate rapidly changing project and business needs

• Excellent interpersonal skills with the proven ability to interact effectively, persuasively and tactfully with clients and all Guardian employees at every level

• A willingness to travel, to both support projects and grow the business, is a vital part of this position’s responsibilities

• A valid Driver’s License with an acceptable driving record in accordance with Guardian’s standard

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Relocation Assistance
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
CAD software: 1 year (Preferred)
License:
A valid SE license (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Guardiangroup.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Guardian Group, Inc.","Torrance, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
116,UAS Data Systems Engineer / Project Manager,-1,"Location: * Washington, DC; other locations also possible
Position Overview*
Shape the future of Unmanned flight! This is an exciting and challenging position with the opportunity to lead improvements to Unmanned Aircraft Systems (UAS) and their integration into the National Airspace System (NAS).

The successful candidate will have a strong technical foundation with knowledge of UAS operations and the NAS to facilitate efforts to standardize data exchanged by UAS systems and stakeholders, along with data formats, data models, and associated standards, policies, and guidance. Candidate will also provide technical system engineering and program management support such as strategic planning, financial planning, schedule, and integration with other programs.

The candidate must coordinate with FAA leadership, stakeholders, program management offices, technical Subject Matter Experts (SMEs), and partners to ensure that project activities and deliverables are properly scoped, defined, and delivered on schedule, and that technical and programmatic issues are mitigated or addressed.
Essential Functions*
Critically assess UAS / Air Traffic Management (ATM) concepts and technologies against FAA goals, budget, and schedule to determine the best options and approach.
Apply understanding of UAS/ATM concepts to assess data exchanged and coordinate with stakeholders to understand challenges and build consensus on data modeling and standardization.
Lead meetings with stakeholders, SMEs, vendors to manage scope, expectations, messaging, and successful performance of project.
Conduct briefings and communicate with a variety of audiences, from technical teammates to high level FAA leadership.
Manage overall project deliverables, schedule, and financials.
Develop program management plans, budgets, cost estimates, and track financials.
Assess project risks and implement mitigation strategies.
Required Qualifications*
BS or higher in Engineering or other technical field.
10+ years engineering, PM experience (advanced degrees may be substituted).
Knowledge of UAS operations and NAS systems, and ability to quickly grasp new concepts and technologies.
Understanding of aviation data exchange concepts, flows, methods, and formats (e.g. Flight Object, geospatial data, GeoJSON, etc.)
Strong analytical skills and ability to critically assess technical and programmatic issues. Ability to understand big picture while also have attention to detail.
Self-starter demonstrating solid judgment; understands when to seek guidance but has strong ability to think and act independently under limited oversight and direction.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to interface with customers and technical professionals at all levels.
Strong ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects in a fast-paced environment; able to manage project tasks, scope change, and schedules to keep projects on-track.
Desired Skills*
Understanding of NAS Enterprise Architecture and other FAA mission/vision artifacts, FAA AMS and JRC process.
Experience PLAs, RPDs, CIP, etc.
Keywords: * UAS, Aviation, Geospatial, GeoJSON, Project Management, Systems Engineering, Air Traffic Management Systems, FAA, NextGen, NAS, ATM, TBO
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $96,000.00 - $160,174.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) HQ: 2 years (Preferred)
Project Management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20024 (Required)
Company's website:
http://conceptsbeyond.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Concepts Beyond,"Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
117,Staff BI and Data Engineer,$105k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description: Staff BI and Data Engineer
Location: San Jose, CA (or) New York, NY
Department: Data Engineering
Hours/Shift: Full Time
Reports To: VP, Data Engineering
Job Description:
Affinity Solutions is looking for a hands-on and self-driven Staff BI and Data Engineer, preferably with experience in the bank card loyalty/fin-tech/advertising/marketing space, to enhance and automate its data and analytics infrastructure to support its growing customer base and expanding partner ecosystem. The position is based in San Jose, CA., and reports into the Data Engineering division. The demand for advanced analytical solutions continues to grow exponentially, and this is your opportunity to grow with us in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.
The ideal candidate is a passionate and highly skilled individual, who can utilize programming and analytics tools such as SQL, Python, and Tableau to query and process large data sets to produce high quality customer facing data deliverables and insights. If you have experience designing and building business intelligence/analytics applications, especially around credit/debit card transactions, unified consumer behavioral and profile data, and excited about leveraging your experience to catapult a venture-backed company into hyper-growth, this job is for you.
Responsibilities:
Develop high quality analytical data assets with an eye towards process efficiency and automation through scripting. Experience in building data marts is a plus.
Build automated QA process to validate the quality of the data and report on data quality
Communicate and present data to both internal and external customers by developing reports/dashboards/charts using BI tools such as Tableau
Work closely with a dynamic and growing team of account managers, data engineers and data scientists to perform quantitative analysis of customer data, including gathering data requirements and validate data, applying judgement and statistical analysis to assist with planning and decision making.
Other responsibilities include but not limited to - data validation, troubleshooting issues, and process documentation.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field such as Mathematics and Statistics, preferably with focus on Data Analytics.
At least 3 years of hands-on experience in designing and building data pipelines, analytical data applications and BI Reporting.
Proficient in SQL and Tableau, familiar with at least one coding language in Python/Shell scripting.
Experience in using Cloud based managed services and Big Data Environments for data warehousing/analytics is a big plus – e.g. Amazon RedShift, Google BigQuery, Spark, MapR etc.,
Very strong written and verbal communication skills; Ability to tell a story with the data
Analytical thinker, with an ability to evaluate multiple products/technologies to address various aspects of a big data platform.
Experience working on UNIX / Linux development and production environments
Experience working in Agile software development environments
Strong organization skills with attention to detail is a must.
Ability to manage multiple conflicting priorities, take proactive ownership of problems and outcomes, think outside the box
Knowledge of Retail and Financial verticals is useful but not required.",3.2,"Affinity Solutions
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
118,Developer - Data Infrastructure Engineering,$93k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Akuna:

Akuna Capital is an innovative trading firm with a strong focus on collaboration, cutting-edge technology, data driven solutions and automation. We specialize in providing liquidity as an options market-maker – meaning we are committed to providing competitive quotes that we are willing to both buy and sell. To do this successfully we design and implement our own low latency technologies, trading strategies and mathematical models.

Our Founding Partners, including Akuna's CEO Andrew Killion, first conceptualized Akuna in their hometown of Sydney. They opened the firm's first office in 2011 in the heart of the derivatives industry and the options capital of the world – Chicago. Today, Akuna is proud to operate from additional offices in Sydney, Shanghai, and Boston.

What you'll do as a Developer on the Data Infra team at Akuna:

We are a data-driven organization and are seeking Developers to take our data platform to the next level. We collect large volumes of data from both internal and external sources and are looking to add talented individuals to the team to identify opportunities to improve and expand our data capabilities. Working on our data infrastructure is a high impact position and you will have opportunity to work closely with our world-class team of developers, quant researchers, traders and management. In this role, you will:
Lead the effort to democratize data access at Akuna
Drive the ongoing growth, design and expansion of our data platform from across a wide variety of data sources, and supporting an array of streaming, operational and research workflows
Assist in standardizing our data management best practices
Work closely with stakeholders throughout the firm to identify how data is consumed
Build and deploy pipelines to collect and transform our rapidly growing Big Data set
Propose and effect changes to our data generation processes
Produce clean, well-tested, and documented code with a clear design to support mission critical applications
Challenge the status quo and help push our organization forward, as we grow beyond the limits of our current tech stack


Qualities that make great candidates:
BS/MS/PhD in Computer Science, Engineering, Physics, Math, or equivalent technical field
5+ years of professional experience developing software applications
Java, Scala or Kotlin experience required – Python experience an added plus
Highly motivated and willing to take ownership of high-impact projects upon arrival
Prior hands-on experience with data platforms and technologies such as Kafka, Presto, Delta Lake, Spark, etc. is ideal
Experience building large-scale ETL pipelines
Must possess excellent communication, analytical, and problem-solving skills
Demonstrated experience working with diverse data sets and frameworks across multiple domains – financial data experience not required, but a plus
Experience with containerization and container orchestration technologies, like Docker, Kubernetes, and Argo
Past hands-on experience with AWS or other public cloud providers (GCP, Azure) is strongly preferred
Demonstrated experience using software engineering best practices like Continuous Integration / Deployment to deliver complex software projects",3.3,"Akuna Capital
3.3","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
119,Software Engineer - Saalfeld Lab,$101k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Primary Work Address: 19700 Helix Drive, Ashburn, VA, 20147
Current HHMI Employees, click here to apply via your Workday account.
Janelia Research Campus is a pioneering research center in Ashburn, Virginia, where scientists pursue fundamental questions in neuroscience and imaging. The Howard Hughes Medical Institute (HHMI) launched Janelia in 2006, establishing an intellectually distinctive environment for scientists to do creative, collaborative, hands-on work. Our integrated teams of biologists, computational scientists, and tool-builders pursue a small number of scientific questions with potential for transformative impact. We share our methods, results, and tools with the scientific community. It is a uniquely innovative and collaborative atmosphere that reflects HHMI’s reputation for excellence.

Summary:

We are looking for a software engineer to work with the lab on novel machine learning based analysis methods and tools for large biological images and videos at the interface of cell biology and neuroscience. We are open source and open science enthusiasts, you will help us to develop new and maintain existing open source libraries and tools developed in the lab (Paintera, N5, BigWarp, ...), and contribute to popular open source packages in the field. You will collaborate with excellent scientists and software engineers and have access to the latest and most exciting data and computational resources.

Education:
M.S. or B.A in Computer Science or related field
Experience:
Experience with writing efficient code with Java or other JVM based languages
Familiarity with Python, other programming languages
Ideally, you have a record of contributing to open source projects, so we can discuss code
If you do not meet all of the above criteria but you believe that you can compensate this with enthusiasm, creativity, and practical experience, reach out to us and let's talk.

For more information on the Saalfeld lab, visit here or email Stephan at saalfelds@janelia.hhmi.org

Physical Requirements

Remaining in a normal seated or standing position for extended periods of time; reaching and grasping by extending hand(s) or arm(s); dexterity to manipulate objects with fingers, for example using a keyboard; communication skills using the spoken word; ability to see and hear within normal parameters; ability to move about workspace. The position requires mobility, including the ability to move materials weighing up to several pounds (such as a laptop computer or tablet).

Persons with disabilities may be able to perform the essential duties of this position with reasonable accommodation. Requests for reasonable accommodation will be evaluated on an individual basis.

Please Note:

This job description sets forth the job’s principal duties, responsibilities, and requirements; it should not be construed as an exhaustive statement, however. Unless they begin with the word “may,” the Essential Duties and Responsibilities described above are “essential functions” of the job, as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act.

HHMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer",4.6,"Howard Hughes Medical Institute
4.6","Ashburn, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1953,Nonprofit Organization,Grantmaking Foundations,Non-Profit,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
120,"Software Engineer, C++ / Linux - Active TS/SCI with Poly-Required (Up to 25% Profit Sharing Benefit!)",$56k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
About This Amazing Opportunity:

CACI is seeking a TS/SCI Poly cleared Software Engineer to support our mission-critical intel customer. Under general supervision, you will develop, maintain, and enhance complex and diverse software systems (e.g., processing-intensive analytics, novel algorithm development, manipulation of extremely large data sets, real-time systems, and business management information systems) based on documented requirements.

What You Will Get to Do:
Review and test software components for adherence to the design requirements and document test results. Resolves software problem reports
Utilizes software development and software design methodologies appropriate to the development environment
Provide specific input to the software components of system design to include hardware/software trade-offs, software reuse, use of Commercial Off-the-shelf (COTS)/Government Off-the-shelf (GOTS) in place of new development, and requirements analysis and synthesis from system level to individual software components
Analyze user requirements to derive software design and performance requirements
Design and codes new software or modifies existing software to add new features
Debug existing software and corrects defects
Integrate existing software into new or modified systems or operating environments
Develop simple data queries for existing or proposed databases or data repositories
Provide recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
Develop or implements algorithms to meet or exceed system performance and functional standards
Assist with developing and executing test procedures for software components
Write or review software and system documentation
Develop software solutions by analyzing system performance standards, conferring with users or system engineers; analyzing systems flow, data usage, and work processes; and investigating problem areas
Serve as a team lead at the level appropriate to the software development process being used on any particular project
Modify existing software to correct errors, to adapt to new hardware, or to improve its performance
Design, develop and modify software systems, using scientific analysis and mathematical models to predict and measure outcome and consequences of design
Design or implement complex databases or data repository interfaces/queries
Oversee one or more software development teams and ensures the work is completed in accordance with the constraints of the software development process being used on any particular project
Design or implement complex algorithms requiring adherence to strict timing, system resource, or interface constraints; Perform quality control on team products
Confer with system engineers and hardware engineers to derive software requirements and to obtain information on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces
Coordinate software system installation and monitor equipment functioning to ensure operational specification are met
Implement recommendations for improving documentation and software development process standards
You Must Possess The Following Skills and Education:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related discipline and 2-4 years of related experience or a combination of education and related experience.
Four (4) years of additional software engineering experience may be substituted for a bachelors degree
Three (3) years of demonstrated experience is required with SIGINT RF
Three (3) years of demonstrated experience is required with C++ experience working in a Linux environment
Knowledge of and practical application of the software development lifecycle
Demonstrated experience building SIGINT systems
Experience as an SWE in programs and contracts of similar scope, type, and complexity for the development of SIGINT systems
Active U.S. Government Clearance Required: TS/SCI w/poly

It Would Be Great if You Also Had the Following:
Working knowledge of Software Defined Radio (SDR), REDHAWK SDR Framework and/or Digital Signal Processing (DSP),
Signals analysis
Software development tools such as the Atlassian tool suite (ex., JIRA, CONFLUENCE)
Masters Degree preferred
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
NSIS.ENG
el4
Job Location
US-Fort Meade-MD-BALTIMORE

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Fort Meade, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
121,UMCS Communications/Data-Link SME,-1,"**Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance***
Primary Responsibilities:

This position provides technical support to the Unmanned Mission Control Station (UMCS) AIRWorks Team focusing on MQ-25 system data-link message requirements, analysis of messaging design, verification of data-link message (""as-built"") implementation, and development of implementer guides.

The AIRWorks Program Analyst is responsible for data-link message Quality of Service (QoS) analysis, review of Information Exchange Requirements, and development of an implementer's guide.

The PA will support PMA-268 UMCS IPT with development, review, and update of UMCS Information Exchange Requirements, planning for data message verification, and adjudication of Universally Unique Identifier (UUID) lists. Efforts also include technical support of engineering design reviews and technical working groups.

Tasks Performed:

Support the review and analysis of UMCS Information Exchange requirements, document constraints, and update/verify to architecture products;
Define the format, priority and rate structure of message links between the Ground Station and Air Vehicle; define DDS interactions within the Ground Station
Conduct Quality of Service Analysis;
Develop UMCS implementer guide;
Development UUID definition and configuration for both the Air Vehicle and UMCS UUID lists;
Conduct data-link bandwidth analysis and testing (in a lab environment)
Support Working Group (WG), Technical Interchange Meetings (TIMs) and Technical Reviews;
Provide technical support in the development all UMCS sustainment documentation and planning;
Support the UMCS systems engineering, training, and project management in planning for system testing, verification, and compatibility assessment;
Support the UMCS Systems Engineer team in evaluation, definition, and development of system design documentation.

Education: Bachelor's Degree from an accredited college or university. Master's Degree from an accredited college or university.

Experience:

Experience and knowledge in computer science, computer architecture, or network/communication systems architectures. 10+ years of specialized experience in data-links is required to be considered a subject matter expert (SME).

JOURNEYMAN (Mid): A candidate with this level of relevant experience may be considered for the position, but will not be considered a SME. A Journeyman level person within a labor category has 3 to 10 years of experience related to the functional duties for that labor category and a BA/BS degree. A Journeyman level person typically performs all functional duties independently.

SENIOR/SME: A Senior level person within a labor category has over 10 years of experience related to the functional duties for that labor category and a MA/MS degree. A Senior level person typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently. A Senior level person may oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Allowable Experience/Education Substitutions: Six (6) years' additional relevant work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree. Associates Degree plus four (4) years' relevant work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor’s Degree. Bachelor’s Degree plus four (4) years' additional relevant work experience may be substituted for a Master’s Degree.

Other Desired Experience:

Ability to communicate and adapt well in dynamic team environments
Good organizational skills
Strong skills in Microsoft Word, Excel and PowerPoint

Familiarity and/or experience with:

NAVAIR SETR events
Communication system Quality of Service Analysis
UAS data-link systems (LOS and BLOS)

Security Clearance Required: Secret or Eligible for a Secret Clearance

Estimated Travel: 10%",5.0,"CRL Technologies
5.0","Lexington Park, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
122,RF Validation Engineer,$49k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"If you are looking for a challenging and exciting career in the world of technology, then look no further. Skyworks is an innovator of high performance analog semiconductors whose solutions are powering the wireless networking revolution. At Skyworks, you will find a fast-paced environment with a strong focus on global collaboration, minimal layers of management and the freedom to make meaningful contributions in a setting that encourages creativity and out-of-the-box thinking. Our work culture values diversity, social responsibility, open communication, mutual trust and respect. We are excited about the opportunity to work with you and glad you want to be part of a team of talented individuals who together can change the way the world communicates.

Requisition ID: 62802

Job Description

RF Validation Engineer

This Validation Engineer will be responsible for bench test, test automation, performance validation, data collection and formatting for complex RF front end modules. Will interface with design engineers and product engineers to validate device performance across various test conditions, debug, create compliance matrices and test reports and present data. Responsibilities also include preparing samples for customers, creating test spec, datasheet, trimming spec, characterization plan and customer data package.

Job Requirements:
BS and 2 years experience required or MS
GPIB based test automation
Good understanding of RF parameters like Gain, NF, intermod, VSWR, S-Parameters, load and source-pull systems.
Experience and familiarity with cellular systems, bands, tests, 2G/3G/4G related specs
Experience and familiarity with testing, evaluation and debugging RF, analog and mixed-signal IC designs in a lab environment. Should be proficient in use of network analyzer, spectrum analyzer, signal generators, oscilloscope
Experience setting up and running bench and automated test with signal generators, network analyzers, Noise figure meters, spectrum analyzers, oscilloscopes, temperature chambers, tunable filters & other associated equipment
Experience working with evaluation boards and automated test setups including board-level rework
Skyworks is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Nearest Major Market: Irvine California
Nearest Secondary Market: Los Angeles
Job Segment: Developer, Engineer, RF Engineer, Network, Telecom, Technology, Engineering",3.4,"Skyworks
3.4","Irvine, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1962,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
123,"Senior Software Engineer, Media Platforms",$88k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"As Software Engineer or Senior Software Engineer, Media Platforms you will build platforms, software, and services that power WWE content from internal tools and systems through to consumer products including our OTT subscription service, the WWE Network. Successful candidates are engineers who bring fresh ideas from all areas of the software lifecycle and are committed to automation, scalability, and reliability. Our engineers display leadership qualities and are enthusiastic to take on new problems across the full-stack as we grow our digital products and the software that powers them. The ideal candidate is excited and motivated about running production grade critical software and systems, and looks for opportunities to improve processes

with automation. Our environment is dynamic, fast-paced, and lots of fun!

Key Responsibilities:
Participate as a collaborative part of the full SDLC process, including software design,
development, peer reviewing, testing, deployment, and documentation
Manage individual project priorities, deadlines and deliverables
Work closely with Product Management and Software Engineering to drive excellence in
digital products and services
This is a 24x7 production environment. While we are mindful to have a good work/life
balance, you will s hare on-call duty with other team members
Required skills:
BA/BS degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or related technical field, or equivalent
practical experience
Experience in JavaScript, and one or more programming languages including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, Python, PHP, or GO
Experience with front end technologies and/or front end frameworks
Experience with data store technologies (SQL and/or NoSQL)
Understanding of source control as a part of the SDLC and knowledge of git
Understanding of async programming models (events, callbacks, promises, async/await)
Self-learner, independent, excellent problem-solving skills
Preferred Skills
Experience developing user-facing software
Exposure to cloud platforms such as AWS, Google Cloud or others
Experience building API-based services using Rest, GraphQL, or gRPC
Strong sense of web design and attuned to the fundamentals of user experience.
Familiarity with the whole web stack, including protocols and web server optimization techniques
_

WWE is an Equal Opportunity Affirmative Action employer and is subject to federal regulations pertaining to employment. WWE does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, marital status, veteran status, or any other basis prohibited under federal, state or local laws governing non-discrimination in employment in every location in which the Company has facilities. WWE also provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and any other state or local laws. For information about Privacy and Information Security for WWE employment candidates, please review our Candidate Privacy Policy. For information regarding Terms and Conditions for this and other WWE websites, please review our Terms and Conditions of Use.",2.9,"World Wrestling Entertainment
2.9","Stamford, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1952,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
124,Data Engineer with Top Secret,$90k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Data Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a Data Engineer: *
Create and maintain data pipelines and transformation flows in a cloud environment
Data management/mapping among multiple distinct data sources
Cloud management and server administration of domain services
Big Data infrastructure services and cross domain data transfer
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and ten (10) to fourteen (14) years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline, and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience, or a Ph.D. degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline and four (4) to seven (7) years of progressive experience.
Familiar with ETL technologies, MapReduce, JSON/XML transformations and schemas
Familiar with AngularJS
Familiar with Apache NiFi and Java (NAR) NiFi Archives
Knowledge of Amazon Web Services (AWS Cloud)
Programming languages – Java/JEE, Javascript, Python, Groovy, Shell Script
HTTP via REST and SOAP
Datastores – HDFS, MongoDB, S3, Elastic, NoSQL, RDBMS
Build and Configuration Management Tools – Maven, Ansible, Puppet
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Linux/Unix server environments
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Master’s level education
Familiarity with: jQuery, XPath, XQuery, Spark, Impala, Sqoop, Hive/Pig, Python, Gradle, Maven, PL/SQL, Unix Shell, C++/C, AngularJS, Spring, JSON, XML/XSLT/HTML, JPA/Hibernate, Spark, Accumulo, MapReduce, Storm/Kafka, HSpace, Pig, Servlet/JSP, LDAP
About OneGlobe: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities.

We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5K annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

OneGlobe is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, political affiliation or veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NiFi: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 5 years (Preferred)
Hadoop: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
ETL: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
125,Junior Reliability Engineer,$73k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Junior Reliability Engineer

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

Provide program and technical support to the Office of the Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense for Product Support - OASD(PS).

ODASD(PS) is responsible for Life Cycle Support that optimizes affordability, materiel readiness that supports Joint war fighter requirements. Specifically, this office is the focal point for developing acquisition and sustainment Life Cycle Product Support Strategies through Policy, Guidance, Direction and providing implementation assistance to OSD and the Services through the development, and assessment of Product Support Strategies, and program affordability covering all acquisition and sustainment phases.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide supportability engineering assessments and analyses for use by OSD decision makers during Analysis of Alternatives (AoA) studies, in support of OIPT meetings, Defense Acquisition Board (DAB) reviews and Milestone Decisions
Participate in the systems engineering process to ensure programs ability to develop and deliver systems which balance capability, materiel availability, materiel reliability, ownership cost and mean down time
Assess and determine the adequacy of performance-based sustainment strategies as outlined in key program documentation to include Acquisition Strategies, Acquisition Program Baselines, Data Management Strategies, JCIDS Capabilities Development Documents (CDD) and Capability Production Documents (CPD), System Engineering Plans (SEP), Test Evaluation Master Plans (TEMP), and Life-Cycle Sustainment Plans (LCSP)
Support DASD(PS) principals in key milestones and decision points thru preparation of detailed briefings, position papers and assessments
Provide technical assistance and guidance in the development, monitoring, usage and collection of materiel readiness metrics
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Secret
An active SECRET Clearance
Bachelors Degree in Engineering/Science, Logistics, Program Management
Knowledge in the areas of product support planning, product support element development, performance-based logistics, total life cycle systems management, business case analysis, reliability growth, earned value management, design-sustainment interfaces, data management, supportability engineering/systems engineering processes, requirements generation/capability development, and training
Knowledge of the Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS), process and Service policies and procedures
Knowledge of Major Defense Acquisition Programs (MDAP)
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Masters Degree in Engineering/Science, Logistics, Program Management
Program/project management experience (Government/Military/Industry)
DAIWA Certification in Life Cycle Logistics, Program Management, Business/Financial Management, or Systems Engineering
Knowledge of OSD acquisition and sustainment policy, guidance and the Integrated Defense Acquisition Life Cycle Management Framework
Eight years experience in DoD weapons systems acquisition and sustainment management
Five years experience in Warfare Portfolios and/or Missile Defense programs
Three years of Military Staff, Joint Staff, or PEO experience
WORK LOCATION: Arlington, VA

TRAVEL: 10%

KEY WORDS: Logistics, Sustainment, AoA, JCIDS, OASD-PS, ""performance-based logistics"", ""lifecycle logistics"", OIPT, DAB, LCSP, TEMP, CPD, CDD, SEP #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
126,Network Engineer; Engineer IV,-1,"General Requirements: *
Plans and conducts work requiring judgment in the independent evaluation, selection, and substantial adaptation and modification of standard techniques, procedures, and criteria.
Independently prepares (or directs others) criteria, computation/analyses, specifications, cost estimates, and technical reports in the specific area of technical expertise.
Selects and applies engineering techniques and procedures to analyze and evaluate specific problems, data, or other features of the work which are broad in scope and complexity.
Reviews and evaluates the quantity, quality, and overall adequacy of results and conclusions drawn from accomplishment of engineering tasks.
Job Description: *
Support Agile team(s) in network-centric aspects of sustainment.
Primary duties include design, configuration, installation, and test of IT network devices and systems.
The Network Engineer designs, installs and maintains all areas of network and computer hardware and software interconnection and interfaces such as routers, switches, multiplexers, firewalls, hubs, bridges, gateways, etc.
Responsible for conducting site surveys, installing and configuring network and boundary protection solutions; acting as program liaison; and assisting in data collection and validation efforts at each location.
Attend and Participate in Periodic Large Scale Agile Planning events.
Attend and Participate in standard Agile ritual meetings (Sprint Planning, Daily Stand-ups, Backlog Grooming, Sprint Reviews and Retrospectives).
Required Qualifications: *
Must Possess Cisco CCNA certification.
Must have or be able to obtain a qualifying DoD 8570.01-M IAT Level II certification (e.g., Security+, CCNA Security, GSEC, CISSP, etc.) by start date as a condition of employment.
At least 5 years of practical experience in (1) maintenance and control networks and related environments together with structures software, programs software, hardware, and configurations, (2) troubleshooting, diagnosing and resolving hardware and network/system problems, and (3) layout the design and implementation of new solutions and improved network resilience.
Education and Experience: *
Requires a BS Degree in appropriate discipline and 5 to 8 years of related Engineering experience, or a
MS Degree and 4 to 6 years of related Engineering experience, or
PhD and 0 to 3 years of related experience.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://phantomeagle.com/
Work Remotely:
No",3.3,"Phantom Eagle LLC
3.3","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
127,Senior Mechanical Engineer,-1,"MILCOTS *has an exciting opportunity for a *Senior* *Mechanical Engineer* to join the *Engineering Team *in *Mahwah, NJ*. The successful candidate will be responsible for leadership related to mechanical design and development task, integration, and documentation of ruggedized computers and monitors for military application. Additional responsibilities include mentoring, decision making related to specifications, BOM, product qualification, validation, production and customer support. This position works closely with project manager, customers, quality, production, and sales organization to support development activities.
Primary Roles and Responsibilities: *
Strong background in electromechanical design.
Strong background in thermal management of electronic enclosures
Modify/REDLINE existing designs based on specifications from production, customers and sales.
Lead architecting and integrating complex system designs.
Strong understanding of EMC/EMI.
Strong problem analysis and solving skills.
Creation of product documentation including wiring list, mechanical parts list, and build of materials (BOM).
Solid understanding of Design for Manufacturing (DFM).
Provide hands-on experience and manufacturing support.
Participate in daily and weekly meeting with internal and external teams.
Demonstrated time management, task tracking, and organizational skills.
Perform other similar and related duties as required.
Qualifications and Education: *
B.S. in Mechanical Engineering and minimum of 10 years’ work experience with at least 2-4 years’ in Defense or Aerospace industry.
Strong understanding of Solidworks file data management and part libraries.
Strong understanding of designing in Solidworks software.
Solid understanding of various MIL Specifications and requirements.
Strong understanding of metal enclosure designs and coating techniques, painting, silkscreen, anodizing, and graphics overlays.
Microsoft Office tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)
Excellent time management, prioritizing, and organizational skills.
Experience with electronic product manufacturing or product development in a small business environment (military applications preferred).
Motivated, positive, self-started with strong work ethics.
Demonstrated ability to make timely and effective decisions, handle multiple priorities and delegate responsibilities to ensure high quality service is delivered on time.
SPECIFIC REQUIREMENT:
Due to the military nature of our activities and associated regulations, only candidates bearing US citizenship will be considered.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Mechanical Engineering: 1 year (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Safer World Group,"Mahwah, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Unknown,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
128,Senior Data QA Engineer,$58k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why We Need You

PEMCO is seeking a Senior Data QA Engineer with the Information Management (IM) team to help deliver solutions that give PEMCO competitive advantages in the highly data-centric insurance market. You will work closely with data engineers and data analysts to plan, create, execute, and maintain test cases for a variety of data warehousing, data integration, reporting and analytical solutions. You will help design and develop test automation that enables the IM team to deliver faster while ensuring that our solutions provide accurate, timely, and relevant information.

What you'll be doing:
Help define and implement team development best practices that ensure the quality of our solutions.
Plan, develop, and execute test strategies.
Prepare builds and deployment instructions and work with DBAs on production releases.
Troubleshoot, log, and regress bugs associated with new functionality and sustainment updates.
Work closely with data engineers and analysts to inform solution designs in terms of testability.
Drive development, testing and implementation of minor changes & enhancements on Insurance business applications and suggest workarounds to end-users when an outage occurs to a critical functionality/interface.
Develop, maintain, and enhance test suites to verify the validity and accuracy of ETL processes.
Design and develop test automation solutions to increase team velocity.
Coordinate with other testers, developers, project managers, and business subject matter experts, through the test execution.
Collaborate with data engineers and analysts on troubleshooting and resolving issues.
Demonstrate behaviors consistent with PEMCO's policies, values, code of ethics and business conduct.
Authentically support the PEMCO Brand and constantly are on the lookout for top talent to join us to achieve our Mission to Worry Less and Live More.
Other duties as assigned.
What you have:
6 years of experience in database testing role involving ETL, SSIS, Stored Procedures, and schema design using MS SQL Server 2012 or later is required
B.A. or B.S. degree or equivalent work experience is required
Familiar with various external vendor interfaces such as ChoicePoint, MVR, etc. and their functionality
Knowledge of insurance industry practices preferred
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in MS Visio is required
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Access is required
Advanced proficiency in testing on web-based applications, mainframe, SharePoint, DB2, SQL is required
Demonstrated knowledge of test analysis, planning, design and execution of scripts/test cases in a mobile testing environment is required
Demonstrated knowledge of metrics collection and analysis to control testing and development process is required
Ability to analyze, diagnose and resolve complex unstructured problems quickly, efficiently, and collaboratively
Our employees enjoy many benefits:
Competitive salary
200% match on your 401(k) up to 6% of your pay
Generous medical, dental, disability and life insurance plans
A friendly, professional work environment
The opportunity to work at a place of integrity, where customer service is emphasized
At PEMCO, we celebrate and support our differences. We know employing a team rich in diverse thoughts, experiences, and opinions allows our employees, our products and our community to flourish. PEMCO is honored to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation or Veteran status.",4.3,"PEMCO Insurance
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
129,Principal Data Engineer- Services,-1,"We're looking for a seasoned Data Engineer in a successful and visionary startup with real clients building the platform that supermarkets will use.

As the data engineer, you will have a broad understanding of patterns, practices, coding standards, vendor solutions, frameworks and tooling to choose the right solutions to meet the needs and understand how that choice fits into the road-map. You thrive on solving new problems with capable teams and approach software engineering as a craft, not just a job. You will experience unique challenge of building an experience that spans enterprise services and consumer applications within the physical environment of a retail store. We are working on a set of problems that require the best software engineers in the industry to get right.

The engineers in the team are the pillars of the future of the company and they are treated and compensated as such. It is a small team of experienced industry professionals building an organization that can solve tough problems and values a collaborative environment.

What we look for:

• Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in an ambiguous, fast-paced environment

• 10+ years of industry experience architecting, coding, verifying and operating large-scale data pipelines and architectures

• Mastery of SQL, NoSQL, Document, Key-Value, Wide Column and Blob data stores

• Operational experience with multiple vendor solutions for repository patterns and the ability to quickly identify the right solution for a given data architecture and workload

• Proven ability to collaborate with client and service engineering teams to ensure the best possible data architecture

• Operational experience architecting, building and operating large scale data warehouses and/or data lakes

• Authorization to work in the United States

Ideal candidates have:

• A mix of startup and large software company experience

• Understanding of data science and have experience building data pipelines to support data scientists

• A B.S. in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related field

• Located near Seattle, WA

About Cloutera:

Cloutera is a recruiting firm that provides corporate recruiting and sourcing support for organizations seeking permanent employees. Cloutera partners with and works side by side (sometimes onsite) with our clients as an extension of their internal recruitment teams in support of their permanent staffing efforts. We are dedicating to ensuring great candidate experiences and strive to support candidates throughout the process.

Cloutera is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against any individuals based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, age, gender identity or expression, national origin genetics, disability status or veteran status. Unfortunately, at this time we are unable to sponsor visa applicants.",4.4,"Cloutera
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
130,Senior Software Engineer - Node.JS,$83k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Meet Group is looking for a Senior Software Engineer to design and build RESTful APIs that are focused on consistency, flexibility, and performance. You will work with existing developers to help maintain and improve the codebase and help to integrate new features into shared services around Live Video.
As a Software Engineering on the Engineering team, you will:
APIs are critical for our Web, Mobile Web, Android, and iOS apps. We're committed to delivering consistent, flexible, and performant APIs that unblock feature teams.
Design, build, and maintain RESTful APIs to allow our various apps across all platforms to be expanded with new functionality. The role involves collaborating with engineers across the Web and Mobile teams to ensure newly developed APIs are designed appropriately according to the technical needs of the various platforms.
Collaborate with DBAs, Product Managers, and Designers to ensure that the technical and product requirements are understood and achievable.
We're looking for:
3+ years of NodeJS and PHP development experience
2+ Years working within an event-driven microservice architecture.
4+ Years working with databases both SQL and NoSQL.
2+ Years experience building REST APIS.
Strong empathetic communication skills.
Strong critical thinking and independent problem solving skills.
As part of our team, you’ll enjoy:
Tremendous opportunity to solve some of the industry’s most important challenges
Working with an extraordinary team of smart, creative, fun and highly motivated people
Comprehensive health coverage, competitive salary, 401(k) match
Extensive PTO plan and flexible working hours
The Meet Group (NASDAQ: MEET) is a portfolio of mobile social entertainment apps designed to meet the universal need for human connection. We leverage a powerful live-streaming video platform, empowering our global community to forge meaningful connections. Our primary apps, MeetMe®, LOVOO®, Skout®, and Tagged®, entertain millions of mobile daily active users, generating untold numbers of casual chats, friendships, dates, and marriages. Our apps, available on iPhone, iPad, and Android in multiple languages, combine product innovation with sophisticated data science to both entertain and connect our audience. The Meet Group has a diversified revenue mix consisting of in-app purchases, subscription, and advertising, and we have offices in New Hope, Philadelphia, San Francisco, Dresden, and Berlin. For more information, visit themeetgroup.com, and follow us on Facebook, Twitter or LinkedIn.

The Meet Group is an equal opportunity employer and a participating employer of Everify. We value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.",4.5,"The Meet Group
4.5","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
131,Power System Engineer,$86k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, October 20, 2020

Planning Services of the System Planning Department is seeking to hire an engineer that is interested in performing traditional power system studies in new and creative ways. The prospective engineer is responsible for assisting the development and conduct of bulk power system production simulations, economic analysis, and resource adequacy studies. With high penetrations of renewable generating resources expected to interconnect to the New England grid over the next ten years, the power grid is changing and we need an engineer to assist with our long-term planning studies. These studies are required to satisfy and comply with national, regional and local reliability criteria and standards compliance reporting requirements; regional system plan development responsibilities; and economic studies as specified in Attachment K of its Open-Access Transmission Tariff (OATT).

How you will make an impact
Design, develop and manage needed data sets, files or databases for conducting economic and resource adequacy studies.
Perform simulations of the bulk power system using software tools including but not limited to ABB GridView, GE MARS, Siemens PSS/E, and PowerGEM TARA, etc.
Work with ISO-NE Staff or Consultants to conduct various analyses and subsequently prepare written reports detailing the objectives, assumptions, methods, findings and recommendations.
Collaborate and coordinate with Market Participants, NEPOOL and ISO Committees, regulatory and other stakeholders.
Respond to data or information requests from regional/national reliability organizations and state and federal regulators.
Perform all work according to established ISO New England process, procedures and Tariffs, consistent with ISO New England quality and business standards.


What we are looking for
Bachelor of Science degree in Electrical Engineering discipline is required; concentration related to power systems is preferred. A Master’s degree in Electrical Engineering is desirable.
Knowledge of the New England generation and transmission system, including planning practices, real-time operational issues and topology.
Working knowledge of the Northeast Power Coordinating Council (NPCC) and North American Electric Reliability Corporation (NERC) Criteria/Procedures/Guidelines.
Ability to work with a wide range of engineers/economists/analysts and other stakeholders to assure that reasonable and respective expectations are met.
Demonstrated ability to work in a rapidly changing environment, meet deadlines, finish projects through to completion and work effectively with others.
Ability to successfully work on a number of projects simultaneously.
Ability to organize and present information in structured and concise manner, while meeting predefined corporate goals.
Excellent oral, written, interpersonal and organizational skills.


Desired not required
Working knowledge of bulk power system/resource adequacy transmission constrained economic generation production simulation techniques, bulk power system loss of load calculation techniques and methodologies and power system transmission network simulation techniques and methodologies

ISO New England oversees the 24/7 operation of the power grid that covers the six-states of New England and administers the region’s $10+ billion “stock exchange” for the buying and selling of wholesale electricity. The power system is constantly evolving as new technologies emerge and energy policies evolve. There is a lot going on at our organization behind the scenes to make sure the grid continuously yields reliable electricity at competitive prices while addressing the unique challenges that come along with our industry.

What We Offer: ISO New England is located in Holyoke, MA. The company provides a base salary plus bonus, competitive Medical and Dental plan, paid vacation, 401k with company match, retirement plan and more. All benefits start on your first day.

Equal Opportunity

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer. Applicants for employment are considered without regard to race, creed, color, citizenship, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, national origin, age, disability, status as a veteran, Vietnam Era Veteran, or being a member of the Reserves or National Guard.

Drug Free Environment

We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.

Social Networking Notice
ISO New England reserves the right to review the candidate's postings on any social networking site accessible in the public domain as part of the candidate assessment process.

Career Opportunities at ISO New England

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.8,"ISO New England
3.8","Holyoke, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Nonprofit Organization,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,"Data Scientist, Senior Level",$110k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Category: Data Scientist

Title: Data Scientist, Senior Level (50-277)

Location(s): Chantilly, VA

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with appropriate agency Polygraph

Salary: Maximum of $160,000/year

Geodata IT, a subsidiary of Freedom Consulting Group, is currently seeking a Senior Data Scientist, in Chantilly, VA.

This position required a bachelor s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or equivalent and five to seven years of relevant work experience.

The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for producing innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. And applying knowledge of statistics, machine learning, programming, data modeling, simulation, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries leading to prototype development and product improvement. He or she needs to be able to use a flexible, analytical approach to design, develop, and evaluate predictive models and advanced algorithms that lead to optimal value extraction from the data. You must have knowledge on generating and testing hypotheses and analyzing and interpreting the results of product experiments.

Previous experience using R, Matlab, Python Scikit-learn or other statistical modeling packages, with a focus on machine learning; experience with NLP is a plus. The ideal candidate will have experience in developing production systems for processing large volumes of structured and unstructured data in Java, Python or similar technology stack and Hadoop technology stack (Map reduce, HIVE/PIG, etc. Excellent verbal and written communication and being a strong team player, capable of working collaboratively is required.

This position falls within the DoD 8570 baseline of IAT II. You must have an active TS/SCI and a CompTIA Security +. A copy of your certificate(s) will be required before you can be submitted for the position.

Geodata IT values quality and has an eye for unrecognized talent. Specialized knowledge will be given consideration when evaluating the years of experience requirement. We love coworkers that can bring forward new ideas to move the GIS community forward.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.

Required Security Clearance: Active TS/SCI with an appropriate agency Polygraph is required

U.S. Citizenship is required

Applicant Federal & E-Verify Postings

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",4.4,"FREEDOM CONSULTING GROUP
4.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
133,Supply Chain Data Analyst Virtual Hiring Event,$37k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"KISS Products Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Friday, October 23, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Supply Chain Data Analyst

Intake Details:

Requirements

Proficient in MS Office, MS Excel. Experience in SAP is preferred.

Up to 8 years of relevant work experience preferred.

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, and/or Business-related

Technical requirements

We prefer you to use a device with a camera and a stable internet connection. If you are using an Apple device, we recommend using the Safari browser. For all other devices, Google Chrome is recommended.

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection

What to bring to this event

Resume

Completing our online application prior to the event is strongly encouraged and will speed up the process.

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About KISS products, Inc.

A Korean-American company headquartered in New York, KISS takes great pride in being a global leader in professional quality beauty products and treatments, with brands available in over 100 countries worldwide. Inspired by the power and excitement of life-changing beauty breakthroughs such as the handheld blow-dryer, which allowed women to break ties with the beauty parlor, Mr. John Chang–who started KISS as a tiny beauty supply business–has made it his mission to find ways to make life simpler & easier for all. With his world-renowned team of scientists & product developers, the KISS founder’s passion is to invent DIY beauty products that save women a tremendous amount of time, effort and money.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

This position is responsible for managing inventory levels, studying supply chain and system management.

Job Description:

Proactively monitor inventory with shelf-life constraints and drive consumption in order to minimize potential liability
Must be able to develop relevant performance metrics and prepare detailed reports for management
Develop reporting systems, dashboards and performance metrics that support business decisions
Identify business and technical problems and create innovative solutions.
Oversee inventory procedures
Develop and monitor KPIs and report on supply chain’s performance",2.5,"KISS products, Inc.
2.5","Piscataway, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
134,Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer,$48k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"KEMET offers our customers the broadest selection of capacitor technologies in the industry, along with an expanding range of electromechanical devices, electromagnetic compatibility solutions and supercapacitors. Our vision is to be the preferred supplier of electronic component solutions demanding the highest standards of quality, delivery and service. Additional information about KEMET can be found at www.kemet.com.

Position Summary:

The Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer conducts anodization research in a laboratory setting, utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes. This position will work with cross functional teams and provide technical direction.

Essential Functions:
Conduct anodization research and development in a laboratory setting
Conduct anodization research utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes
Research and develop new anodization processes and electrolyte formulations
Provide technical direction for existing and new anodization materials and processes regarding material selection, characterization and qualification, with ultimate translation to manufacturing
Utilize advanced chemical and analytical knowledge, data, and statistical tools to solve technical challenges
Work with cross functional teams to support projects by performing laboratory work to improve product performance, troubleshoot and resolve customer issues
Competencies:
Industrial or academic experience in electrochemical processes such as anodization or relevant experience in related electrochemical processes
Experience in electrolyte chemistry including development of new electrolyte formulations for product development, improvement, design, application and production
Industrial or academic experience with anodizing equipment, anodization processes and the related electrical engineering experience to operate anodization equipment
Experience with electrochemical cell design and prototyping
Demonstrated hands-on research and problem-solving with strong analytical skills
Demonstrated skills in major electrochemical and material characterization methods
Knowledge in dielectric development, failure analysis, and manufacturing operations
Knowledge of electrolytic capacitor development and manufacturing is a plus
Education and Experience:
BS/MS/PhD in the area of electrochemistry, electrochemical engineering or alternatively a BS/MS/PhD in Materials Science or Chemistry/Chemical Engineering with strong emphasis in electrochemistry
Physical Requirements:
Up to 25% travel may be required
This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change, or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice.

KEMET does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, ethnicity or national origin, disability, pregnancy, religion, political affiliation, union membership, protected veteran status, protected genetic information, marital status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law, in making employment decisions including but not limited to hiring, wages, promotions, rewards, and access to training. Qualified applicants and workers shall be provided with reasonable accommodation for disability and religious practices.",4.2,"KEMET
4.2","Simpsonville, SC",-1,10000+ Employees,1919,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
135,Sr. Mobile QA Test Automation Engineer,$73k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"At projekt202, we are focused on creating experiences that engage, innovate, disrupt and delight. Our team is passionate about user-centric design and development and enjoys delivering amazing concepts and technical solutions for our courageous clients. We enjoy working together to share our expertise and solve our clients’ business challenges. We have fun and enjoy hanging out with each other in a culture that supports and celebrates our diverse talents, backgrounds and skills.
What you care about
*You draw energy from human interaction. You're confident but not pompous.
*You are driven to know more, to know why, to ask what if.
*You're a born collaborator, and truly appreciate the perspectives of other brains. You respect and attract your colleagues and client's opinions. You believe that you very well might not know the answer. You ask great questions.
*You thrive in uncharted territory. The uncertain and unknown are your playgrounds. Your personal compass pushes you out of your comfort zones. Your leadership inspires your colleagues and earns the respect of our clients.
*You are a communicator. You are able to take an ask and turn it into understandable and actionable ideas. You break down the complex into the simple.

Position Summary: The Sr. Mobile QA Test Automation Engineer works closely with the development team to ensure all acceptance criteria is tested and passes required thresholds. They also work toward ensuring a comprehensive set of automated regression tests are developed and completed.
Primary Job Responsibilities:
Develop test plans & strategies
Review acceptance criteria on user stories to ensure they are thorough and able to be tested
Work with the internal or external Product Owner to ensure acceptance criteria are concise and complete
Day to day hands-on testing by creating automated tests
Light troubleshooting and root cause analysis
Create defects based on failed test results
Guide external client teams through the testing process
Identify process gaps and excesses then provide clear industry standard solutions
Required Skills:
5+ years of overall testing experience
3+ years of hands on experience using a code-based testing tool to develop automated tests against mobile applications such as Detox.
Proficient in JavaScript or Python.
Familiarity with current industry standard testing design patterns.
Experience testing REST services and APIs using API client tools such as Postman.
Familiarity with test management software, such as TestRail or JIRA with relevant plugins.
Desired Skills & Experience:
CI and automated build experience
Familiarity with Agile and Waterfall
Load & Data driven testing
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven Consulting Skills
For more information, visit www.projekt202.com or find us on Twitter @projekt202. We are an equal opportunity employer.

If this sounds like you, let's talk. Please visit www.projekt202.com to hear from our leadership team on why you should join us on this amazing journey!

Direct applicants only, no agency submittals please.

At this time, projekt202 does not provide sponsorship.",3.3,"projekt202
3.3","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
136,Senior Data Architect (TS/SCI POLY),$90k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

What Youll Get to Do:

Team is seeking an experienced Data Architect to join a dynamic and exciting data engineering team. As the lead, you will be responsible for the overall vision and design and development progress of a new, highly performing enterprise data division. Expected understanding of industry best practices and data modeling techniques. Successful candidate will be experienced in data design, enterprise data, reporting, visualization, and overall data architecture concepts. It is highly desired that the candidate have a background with creating and managing complex ETL packages to extract data from various data sources and load into a first-class data warehouse.

More About the Role:
Seeking an innovative data subject matter expert capable of identifying new ways to standardize existing data processes and optimizing current workflows
Working on a data development team to provide technical guidance and support
Team structured with-in the Agile/Scrum development process
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Extensive experience with database management systems (Oracle, PostGres, MySQL)
Familiar with Serverless framework (Lambda, Step Functions)
Experience creating Data Mapping documents, data dictionaries and Interface Control Documents (ICDs)
Documented experience improving application, schema and data design to meet demanding enterprise data solution
Documented background in data warehouse design and dimensional modeling
Excellent skills in DB Schema design and SQL development
Knowledge of visualization tools and capable of supporting like (Tableau, Cognos and PowerBI)
Experience with Agile practices
Ability to solve problems creatively and effectively
Active TS SCI with Polygraph Clearance
These Qualifications Would Be Nice to Have:
Documented Experience with DevOps/Platforms: Amazon Web Services (S3, RDS, EC2, ECS, Lambda, SQS, SNS, CloudFormation, etc.), Docker, Ansible, Python development experience
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
SM20J*

Job Location

US-Fairfax-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Fairfax, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
137,SOFTWARE ENGINEER - B2B,$43k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Job Description
Type of Opportunity: Full Time
FTE: 1.000000
Exempt: Yes
Work Schedule: Days

Summary:
Duties include instructing, directing, and checking the work of other systems analysis personnel. Formulates and defines system scope and objectives based on user defined needs. Devises or modifies procedures to solve complex problems considering computer equipment capacity and limitations, operating time, and form of desired results. Prepares detailed specifications from which programs will be written. Analyzes and revises existing system logic difficulties and documentation as necessary. Has full technical knowledge of all phases of applications systems analysis. Responsible for quality assurance review. Acts as project leader for projects with small budgets or limited duration

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities:
Provides expert support for definition/refinement of business requirements and for quality assurance/acceptance testing efforts

Designs, develops, tests and debugs software components of high complexity

Provides implementation, production and upgrade support for software components of high complexity

May act as supporting liaison between the application team and the user community, responsible for facilitating communications, coordinating system enhancements, and providing production support.

Works with user community to define business requirements in sufficient detail and define business use cases that systems configuration, development/enhancement, and/or Operations activities can be pursued.

Oversees the development of user and technical documentation according to department standards.

Qualifications:

Preferred Qualifications:
Require 6+ years of experience in healthcare (Health Plan) domain - Member, Provider, Claims and/or Finance
Require 6+ years of experience in EDI and IBM Sterling Application suite (IBM Sterling Integrator B2B, Lightwell and/or ITXA mapping
Require 3+ years of experience and excellent design and technical skills with Oracle PLSQL and/or SQL Server Development (including Writing complex stored procedures, packages, and/or functions)
Experience in HealthRules Payor (HRP) Claims System
Other information:
Bachelor s degree in related technical/business area plus 6 years of IT or business experience. 6 years of additional experience can be substituted in lieu of degree

Education:
Essential:
Bachelor Degree
Education specialization:
Essential:
Information Technology
Competencies and skills:
Nonessential:
SKILL-Ability to effectively interact with customers to understand their needs and explain data
SKILL-Microsoft Office
Planning and coordinating organizational change
Anticipating & Addressing Customer Needs
Functioning as an Effective Contingent Member
Acquiring & Applying Superior Skills to achieve Quality Outcomes
Functioning as an Effective Team Member
SKILL-Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively in person and via telephone with members, employer groups, brokers, physicians, and physician office staff using strong dialogue and customer service competencies.
SKILL-Written communication
Benefits:

Benefits
Benefits are effective day-one (for .45 FTE and above) and include:

Competitive salaries
Full medical, dental and vision insurance
Flexible spending accounts (FSAs)
Free wellness programs
Paid time off (PTO)
Retirement plans, including matching employer contributions
Continuing education and career development opportunities
Life insurance and short/long term disability programs

About Us
Presbyterian Healthcare Services is a locally owned, not-for-profit healthcare system of nine hospitals, a statewide health plan and a growing multi-specialty medical group. Founded in New Mexico in 1908, it is the state's largest private employer with approximately 11,000 employees.

Presbyterian's story is really the story of the remarkable people who have chosen to work here. Starting with Reverend Cooper who began our journey in 1908, the hard work of thousands of physicians, employees, board members, and other volunteers brought Presbyterian from a tiny tuberculosis sanatorium to a statewide healthcare system, serving more than 700,000 New Mexicans.

We are part of New Mexico's history - and committed to its future. That is why we will continue to work just as hard and care just as deeply to serve New Mexico for years to come.

About New Mexico
New Mexico's unique blend of Spanish, Mexican and Native American influences contribute to a culturally rich lifestyle. Add in Albuquerque's International Balloon Fiesta, Los Alamos' nuclear scientists, Roswell's visitors from outer space, and Santa Fe's artists, and you get an eclectic mix of people, places and experiences that make this state great.

Cities in New Mexico are continually ranked among the nation's best places to work and live by Forbes magazine, Kiplinger's Personal Finance, and other corporate and government relocation managers like Worldwide ERC.

New Mexico offers endless recreational opportunities to explore, and enjoy an active lifestyle. Venture off the beaten path, challenge your body in the elements, or open yourself up to the expansive sky. From hiking, golfing and biking to skiing, snowboarding and boating, it's all available among our beautiful wonders of the west.

AA/EOE/VET/DISABLED. PHS is a drug-free and tobacco-free employer with smoke free campuses.

KM123",3.6,"Rev Hugh Cooper Admin Center
3.6","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1908,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
138,Senior Data Engineer,$99k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, August 11, 2020

This position is expected to lead the data architecture and design of the CSBS enterprise data platform. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists. They will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

They will work with analytical teams to gather technical requirements for both capabilities and tools, as well as, accessing and prioritizing ingest of data assets. They will work with the infrastructure and enterprise architect teams to develop and build out the enterprise platform. The will advise the CDO on technical solutions and tradeoffs, liaise with the Enterprise Architecture to ensure standards are met, and work closely with the Security and Policy teams to ensure the organization is in compliance with their policies. In addition, they will work closely with the modernization product leads to ensure the data needs for the analytical teams is built into the modernized application.

In addition, they will help establish and implement metadata strategy aligned with EA strategy to ensure clear visibility into mapping of data assets to applications, and understanding of impact of changes to data models

Essential Functions

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individual with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs.

Translate data analytic technical requirements to cloud architects, contractors, business leaders and IT functional leads in security, infrastructure, and application development

Build strong relationships across IT functions and data analytics teams

Oversee the buildout of the enterprise Data Warehouse/API strategy

Work with the analytics teams to prioritize data assets

Manage contractors and oversee solution delivery

Optimizing data ingest and ETL processes to ensure our products have maximum performance

Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

Navigate conflicting priorities and provide recommendations to the CDO when necessary

Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets

Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management

Work with the Enterprise Architect to establish modeling standards, data quality standards, data integration patterns or transactional and analytical systems.

Additional Responsibilities

Prepare polished technical and non-technical status reports and presentations for senior management

Minimum Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual should possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed and meet the amount of education, training and/or work experience required.

Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent coursework in data management/computer science

Advanced degree preferred

12+ years of experience in data management or data architecture

Experience managing vendors/contractors

Experience with feature/product ownership

Experience with Agile Scrum methodology

Experience writing clear and effective proposals, policies, research summaries, etc.

Development experience with MuleSoft and Informatica preferred; MicroStrategy a plus

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Knowledge of MuleSoft, Informatica, and MicroStrategy

Familiarity with data transformation, warehousing and data modeling

Working knowledge of MySQL and Oracle databases

Understanding of software development protocols

Fluency with AWS cloud storage

Ability to create well-designed, intuitive user interfaces

Skill in communicating with and translating between technical and non-technical people

Knowledge of the financial services industry a plus

Requirements

Must be eligible to obtain or currently possess a U.S. Government clearance at the Public Trust Moderate (NACI) level or higher

Must be a United States citizen or a Legal Permanent Resident (LPR) with at least three (3) years consecutive residence in the United States as indicated on the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) LPR issued card

Values Instilled Behaviors for Excellence

Member/ Customer Service

Capability to build and value relationships

Ability to prioritize work

Advocate and advance member's goals

Teamwork

Ability to give credit to others

Have a “pitch in” attitude

Learns from successes and setbacks

Respect/Trust

Listens and learns from others

Speaks the truth even when uncomfortable

Ability to honor the expertise of others

Collaboration

Recognizes the contributions of others

Ability to consult and communication effectively

Desires to make others successful

Ownership/Engagement

Ability to preserve through adversity

Willingness to experiment and take risks

Plans ahead and is a forward thinking individual

Leadership Competencies

Achievement Oriented Thinking

Has tough conversations and gives feedback to staff

Empowers others

Remains calm under pressure even when presented with unpredictable situations

Change Management

Communicates consistently and effectively with direct reports about the need for, vision for and impact of change.

Manages team through the change

Overcomes obstacles leading to resistance

Self-Awareness

Has knowledge/clarity about “fit” – the type of environment and people that brings out the best in you and your team

Possesses the ability to discern team’s triggers

Knows the consequences of your behaviors

Working Conditions

General office. Travel 3-4 times per year.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Conference of State Bank Supervisors
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
139,Staff Geotechnical Engineer,-1,"Implement technical requirements to complete client projects by directing field staff to sample, test, and collect data. Assist in compiling the scope of work for both routine and more complex lab or field investigations to measure properties of soil from a geotechnical standpoint in the soil classification laboratory.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $25.00 - $40.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
License:
Professional Engineer PE License in Virginia or Maryland (Required)
Company's website:
www.etsva.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply",4.9,"Engineering and Testing Services, Inc.
4.9","Virginia Beach, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
140,Senior Database Administrator (Active TS Clearance),-1,"MetroStar Systems is looking for a Senior Database Administrator that is passionate about leading Database development projects for federal contracts. If you want to join a company that values delivering high-quality products and are open to commuting to Arlington, Va., we want you to work for MetroStar!

Our Defense and Intel. Division is responsible for supporting federal agencies in the Washington, DC area and around the country. Come be a game changer and join our team!

You're a great fit if:
You are passionate about designing, implementing, operating and maintaining database programs and applications
You can evaluate and recommend available database management system products after matching requirements with system capabilities
You are comfortable determining organization, indexing methods and security procedures for specific applications
You'll love our Senior Database Administrator Position if: (This is the stuff you MUST have to be a fit)
You have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business or other relevant discipline
You have ten or more years of experience in SQL Server database engineering, design, development, management, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing, or problem diagnosis and resolution
You are proficient in the following MS SQL Server 2016 Database Administration, MS Visio Professional 2013, MS TFS 2015, and MS Office 2013.
You have a working knowledge of MS Project Professional 2013, MS Visual Studio 2015 C#.NET, MS Visual Studio 2015 ASP.NET, ASP.NET MVC 4, JavaScript, JQuery, SP 2016, and Adobe Professional XI
You have a Top Secret Clearance
You maintain an IAT Level II Certification
We'll REALLY love you if: (This is the bonus stuff that makes you stand out)
You can control the design and use of databases; you can control the global view of databases, the access of databases and assure the safekeeping of the databases (from accidental or intentional damage or loss)
What your day will look like:
You will lead a database administration team in management of highly complex software systems
You will support several tasks concurrently and evaluates problems of workflow, organization, and planning, and develops appropriate corrective actions and prepares and performs presentations at technical interchange meetings and project design reviews
You will conduct code and design reviews of subordinate database administrators and peers.
The Admin Stuff: Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for potential access to classified information. Accordingly, US Citizenship is required

The Legal Stuff: MetroStar Systems is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. Furthermore, they do not establish a contract for employment and are subject to change at the discretion of MetroStar Systems.",3.7,"MetroStar Systems
3.7","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
141,Senior Systems Engineer Mission Integration,$51k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Senior Systems Engineer Mission Integration

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

Decisive Analytics a WBB Company has a contract supporting Mission Engineering: Evolving Acquisition to support the warfighter.

The office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Research and Engineering or USD (R&E) requires mission engineering, analysis, and integration expertise to produce objective insights and analytic justification to inform future technology and capability investment decisions within the Planning, Programming, and Budgeting Execution (PPBE) process and aid in the prioritization, alignment and validation of requirements within Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS) to deliver modernized capabilities that enable an all domain joint force aligned with future Joint Warfighting Concepts.

Qualified Candidates will assess capability gaps and needs by mission versus system or Service and will focus on outcome rather than process.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Applying experience and expertise in cutting edge technologies and application of technologies into new and innovative warfighting capabilities
Supporting OUSD(R&E) industry engagements and conferences / symposium to discuss mission engineering
Conducting mission engineering and analysis studies to evaluate the efficacy of legacy architectures and new technologies in new mission concepts of employment to meet evolving joint mission objectives
Supporting the OUSD(R&E) Modernization Assistant Directors to help develop their technology roadmaps to fill warfighter capability gaps
Supporting the Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS) by reviewing Capability Based Assessments & capability requirement documents, participating in Joint Staff working groups, and preparing OUSD(R&E) principals for data driven decision meetings
Supporting the integration of mission engineering activities across a range of OUSD(R&E), Joint Staff, DoD, Industry, and Federally Funded Research and Development Center (FFRDC) stakeholders
Supporting the development of joint concepts of operations/concepts of employment (CONOPs / CONEMPS) by participating in Wargaming, Tabletop Exercises, and workshops; assisting with scenario development and technology/capability content; and attending exercises to inform plans and strategies that will inform mission engineering analysis
Applying in-depth technical knowledge and experience with existing and future advanced DoD weapon systems and their capabilities, concept of operations, limitations, and upgrade capacities
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Top Secret/SCI
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Master of Science degree in an engineering discipline
twenty (20) years of DoD experience in engineering
Developed system solutions to complex and challenging DoD problems
Experience leading the planning and execution of complex mission and systems analysis efforts and applying technologies; system capabilities, performance, and/or operations related to one or more of the following areas:
Joint force application and integration; land, sea, air, and space platforms
Offensive, defensive, kinetic and directed energy weapons from all domains
Sensors for ISR and fire control
Cyberwarfare / communication networks
Electromagnetic spectrum management to include electronic warfare and 5G; automation applications; command, control, and battle management; and/or fires close air support, long range fires, targeting, air and missile defense
Ability to apply critical thinking to prepare written reports and presentations for senior-level officials
Excellent interpersonal and communication (oral and writing) skills
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
PhD in a technical or quantative discipline
Experience leading Systems Engineering (SE) tasks including Technology Analysis and Assessment, System Definition, Systems Analysis, Systems Architecture development and architecture products for Systems of Systems (SoS), kill chain analysis, SE trade-space and analysis to define capability gaps, Modeling and Simulation activities for mission improvement, and Logistics support of Department of Defense (DoD) systems
Interfaced with Joint Staff, Services, and warfighters to coordinate engineering and analysis needs and analytic results
Served as a chief engineer or lead systems engineer for a major defense acquisition program development effort
Worked on a Major Defense Acquisition Program in a government program office or industry
WORK LOCATION: Alexandria, VA

TRAVEL: 10%

KEY WORDS: #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
142,Sr Comms Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence and Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence and Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The Systems Engineering Center is seeking a strong, technically sound Senior Comms engineer for the role of Senior Comms Systems Engineer who is committed and passionate about creating innovative, cost-effective solutions for advanced space-based Comms architectures, systems and mission capabilities. The successful candidate will serve as a Comms Systems Engineer on a large-scale, and very complex Intelligence, Surveillance, Reconnaissance and Communications (ISRC) Verona Program and will be responsible for supporting the delivery of verified products, components or services to support the Comms Sub-System team. The Senior Comms Systems Engineer will provide technical contributions to the Integrated Sub-System and system engineering work products across the entire life cycle of the program, which may include architecture development, requirements development, system integration and test, verification and validation. This position reports to the Comms Sub-System Integrated Product Team Lead and interfaces with cross-functional product teams, sub-contractors program management, and functional managers.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 6 years of engineering experience with some experience preferred in Space RF & digital communication system design and development
Experience in requirements development and flowdown of top-level functional, operational and constraining requirements to the Comms subsystem and hardware levels.
Knowledge of Digital Design techniques and implementation (modem design and optimization, Advanced Coding and Modulation Schemes, SoC Design Implementation, ASIC or FPGA Design and Development)
Ability to conduct Payload vs spacecraft trades and analyses
Ability to conduct Requirements analysis and performance budgeting
Ability to coordinate between organizations (cross-functional teams, customers and departments).
Ability to contribute to the development of new ideas and concepts, translate these ideas into executable action plans, and communicate these plans to a diverse client base.
Team oriented individual with strong interpersonal and communication skill
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position needs an active U.S. Security Clearance as of day one of employment.
Active and Current TS/SCI or completed SSBI within last 24 months required
Desired Skills:
Knowledge of Digital Signal Processing (Digital Pre-distortion techniques, Carrier Recovery, Channel Equalization)
Knowledge of Antenna subsystem development (requirements analysis, performance budgeting, conceptual design)
Knowledge of Anti-jamming communication algorithms
Knowledge of space hardness and survivability environments; spacecraft subsystems (TT&C, ADC, CDH, Thermal, Structures/Mechanisms, propulsion, Guidance and Navigation); and Launch vehicle considerations.
CONOPS trades and analyses (Orbital and constellation design)
Data delivery/data chain flow trades and analyses (operations, observation payloads, communication system, and ground system)
Ability to mentor and lead engineering personnel to collaborate with members of other teams to accomplish problem resolution and other tasks in a timely manner.
Experience leading multi-discipline intra-company integrated product teams
Master's Degree/PhD in relevant field
Education:
Bachelors degree in Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math (STEM), or Masters degree in relevant field
*U.S. Citizenship Status is requires as this position will require the ability to access US only data systems**
#ideasinorbit
#Space2020 166212

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
143,Software Engineer - Full Stack Application Development,$56k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Full Stack development experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for functional software applications that solve mission needs. The candidate should have experience developing software applications that require user interface, business tier, and database development.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver solutions that solve client problems
Applying your expertise to code, plan, test, and deploy software applications
Developing User Interfaces that support enterprise interactive dashboards, simulate models of operational problems, and incorporate intuitive interfaces, infographics, interactive drill-downs, and movements
Designing and developing Business Tier applications to support business logic, algorithms, and integration of separate services
Designing and developing Database Tier interactions, contracts, and models using various database technologies
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Collecting feedback to make continuous improvements to new and existing software applications
Contributing to guidelines and design conventions and standards
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of full stack software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Full Stack software such as Spring, Java, Node.js, LAMP
RESTful web services, microservices such as Swagger, JAXRS, Java Reactive
ORM technologies such as JPA, Hibernate, Spring, ActiveRecord, Eloquent
Security concepts such as authentication, authorization, RBAC, PKI, LDAP
Application deployment environments such as Apache, Nginx, Tomcat, JBoss, OSGI, Docker
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Ability to implement infrastructure-as-code solutions
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
144,Cloud Engineer,-1,"Cloud Engineer

Department: Information Systems

Location: Chicago, IL

Travel Requirements: N/A

Job ID: 322

LIFE AT NFA
NFA is committed to creating an exceptional work environment. Learn from staff how NFA fosters a culture of diversity, ongoing learning and development, and work-life balance.

APPLY NOW

Description: The Cloud Engineer is responsible for administering the design and configuration of Cloud based core services, such as Azure, Office 365 (Exchange, SharePoint, OneDrive, Teams, AzureAD) and Device Management. Additionally, the Cloud Engineer works closely with NFA leadership to understand business requirements, identify priorities and develop roadmap and implementation plans for cloud-based solutions.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Work closely with NFA's Security staff and other stakeholders to improve the security posture of the environment and secure data while adhering to security- and compliance-related processes and procedures.
Develop and improve solution standards and ensure standards are being met.
Provision and monitor the use of Cloud resources.
Establish business relationships to maximize use of collaboration solutions.
Keep up to date on new industry standards, research the latest technologies on the market and otherwise act as a technical subject matter expert.
Provide expertise and advice to teams tasked with building solutions on cloud platforms, including design, planning, management and maintenance.
Develop, implement, monitor and audit required back-up and recovery procedures to ensure requirements are being met.
Engage in capacity planning to implement, administer and troubleshoot Cloud solutions and tools.
Develop, implement and monitor machine learning and data science infrastructure.
Deliver training and technical support as needed.
Requirements:
Five or more years working experience in a virtualized, Cloud environment
Knowledge of CIS Benchmarks and Information Security Standards
Industry-recognized certification, such as Microsoft Azure Administrator
Accredited degree, such as a Bachelor's degree in information systems or computer science, preferred
Experience installing, customizing and maintaining Cloud based technologies
Experience and fluency with key networking elements (e.g. firewalls, VPNs, proxy servers, email systems, hypervisors, disaster recovery/business continuity practices and problem resolution tools)
Comprehensive understanding of network infrastructure/designs and performance/tuning strategies
Experience in project planning and management
Willingness to work off-hours",4.3,"National Futures Association
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
145,Cloud Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with one or more Public Cloud Providers such as AWS and Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.
Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
RDS, Azure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
AWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB, Azure Cosmos DB
Amazon Redshift, Azure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
AWS DB Migration Service, Azure DB Migration Service
Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
AWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline, Azure Data Factory
AWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
Amazon EMR, Azure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
AWS Kinesis Analytics, Azure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics, AWS Lambda
Data analysis and visualization tools
AWS QuickSight, Azure PowerBI
Amazon Athena, Azure Data Lake Analytics
Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
AWS S3, Azure Blob Storage
AWS ElastiCache, Azure Cache for Redis
AWS CloudSearch, Azure Search
Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS and Azure
Nice to have
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Azure or AWS Certification
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
146,Data Integration Engineer,$48k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"About NECI

NECI, an Emerson Impact Partner, is the leading Digital Automation solutions provider transforming manufacturing, lab operations, process development and process control across a range of process industries in New England. NECI relentlessly seeks to drive the outcomes that change the game for our clients and is seeking team members to join in our mission.

The Role

The Data Integration Engineer is a customer facing individual capable of executing projects in the Data Historian space. This individual will be responsible for coordinating with customer site contacts and implementing Data Historian solutions in a challenging real-time process environment.

Project execution tasks include the installation and configuration of complete OSIsoft PI systems. This ranges from the initial PI Server Installation to the configuration of data collection from a wide variety of possible 3rd party data sources.

He/she will be responsible for implementing the configuration and/or the custom software components necessary to meet the project requirements for the projects to which he/she is assigned.

How Youll Be Successful
Ability to troubleshoot Windows Server/Activity Directory/Domain Issues
Willing to keep up with and learn the ever evolving OSIsoft Product Suit
Able to work in both team environments as well as unsupervised in a customer environment
Ability to collect requirements for the data integration of process control systems/equip and configure the appropriate interface as required
Familiarity of other Data Historian Systems outside of OSIsoft PI
Cooperate with others to uphold NECIs Total Customer Commitment.
Have prior experience utilizing PI Organizational and Visualization tools such as PI Asset Framework and PI Coresight/Vision.
Ability to quickly troubleshoot and resolve issues.
What Youll Do
Installation, Configuration, and maintenance of new or existing OSIsoft PI Systems
PI Tag and Asset Framework Configuration
PI Data Analyzation/Visualization utilizing PI Asset Framework and CoreSight/Vision
What Youll Bring
Bachelor of Science in Computer Engineering, Science, or Chemical Engineering
2 to 3 years experience in a combination of process control, automation, software development or information technology management in pharmaceuticals, biotechnology or other life sciences industries.
Demonstrated success in identifying requirements and subsequent development and implementation of PI Installation and Integration Activities
Completion of the following OSIsoft training or demonstrable experience - PI System Architecture, Planning, and Implementation, Building PI System Assets and Analytics with PI AF, PI System Administration for IT Professionals.
Heres What Youll Get
Highly competitive Medical and Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts for medical expenses and dependent care expenses
3 Weeks of Vacation + Holiday's
401k
Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP)
Employee Referral Bonus
Professional Development Reimbursement
NECI paid Basic Life & Short-Term, Long-Term Disability Insurance
Voluntary Benefits - Accident, Term Life, Whole Life Insurance
Flu Shot Clinic & First Aid/AED/CPR Classes
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States.

Policy on Third-Party Unsolicited Resume Submissions: Please note that any third-party unsolicited resume submissions will immediately become the property of NECI. NECI will not pay any fee to a submitting employment agency, person, or entity unless a signed agreement is established.",4.2,"NECI
4.2","Mansfield, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
147,Injection Molding Engineer,-1,"*Role: * Injection Molding Engineer

*Company: *Grammer AG

*Location: *Tupelo, MS

*Summary: *

The holder of this position plans and oversees process flow, layout of assembly fixtures and manufacturing equipment, work instructions, product and manufacturing costs, and value stream mapping for projects for Grammer – Americas.

*Responsibilities: *

- Conducts time-studies for machine and personnel capacities.

- Establishes process flow and plant lay-out for new products.

- Obtains and assimilates relevant data to calculate manufacturing and product costs – based on Grammer Cost Model.

- Designs and facilitates the implementation of requisite assembly fixtures and manufacturing equipment.

- Develops Value Stream Mapping and Future Stream Mapping, and conducts studies in operations to maximize work flow and process utilization.

- Implements error-proofing to attain Grammer’s objective of assembling defect-free product.

- Supports PFMEA & Control Plan activities – as a team member.

- Develops Work Instructions, and provides relevant training.

- Supports product launches at manufacturing facility.

- Familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures related to ergonomics and process flow.

- Performs ergonomic/industrial engineering changes to product platforms in order to maximize efficiency and improve output.

- Ensures facility efficiency and workplace safety.

- Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.

- Other duties as assigned by immediate supervisor.

*Requirements/Qualifications: *

*1. Education: *Bachelor’s degree in engineering or related field

*2. Experience: * *: *5 years Injection Molding manufacturing experience in the automotive or similar industry.

*3. Knowledge and skills: *

- Experience manufacturing engineering industrial engineering and or product engineering.

- Excellent organizational, communication, and directing skills.

- Excellent employee relations skills.

- Excellent computer skills with proficiency in Word and Excel.

- ISO/QS9000/TS16949 disciplines.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
* Injection Molding manufacturing: 5 years (Required)

Education:
* Bachelor's (Required)",-1,Pin-Point Solutions,"Tupelo, MS",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
148,Data Engineer,-1,"MedStudy, a medical education company, is hiring a *Data Engineer* to help us scale and grow to meet the ever-increasing demands on our systems as we continue to add more sophisticated features to our products and add customers. This person will work closely with leadership, development and operations teams to develop and deliver actionable recommendations to drive better and faster decisions and implement practical solutions. Successful candidates will exhibit technical acumen and business savvy, with a passion for making an impact, through creative storytelling and timely actions.
Responsibilities: *
Build, monitor and report on data foundations, metrics and dashboards to monitor the performance of the business and prepare for expected growth.
Apply quantitative analysis, data mining and presentation of data to analyze business growth and improve systems to meet the needs of the growing customer base.
Design and analyze experiments to test new product ideas and features; convert the results into actionable recommendations.
Collaborate with analyst, product owner and business owners to understand their challenges and develop solutions.
Inform, influence, support, and execute business decisions with senior leadership.
Stay abreast of technology trends and best practices in data modeling.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required: *
At least three years of experience in data science and analytics.
Strong proficiency in both traditional relational database (SQL Server) and No SQL technologies (Elastic, Redis, etc)
Strong proficiency in OOP and data modeling ideally in Microsoft stack technology (i.e. C# / .NET)
Knowledge of statistical modeling
Bachelor or advanced degree in quantitative discipline: statistics, applied mathematics or informatics.
Ability to synthesize, simplify and explain complex problems to different types of audiences including executives.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Traditional relational database (SQL Server): 1 year (Preferred)
Elastic or Redis: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Science and Analytics: 3 years (Required)
OPP and data modeling in Microsoft stack technology: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Location:
Fully Remote",3.8,"MedStudy
3.8","Denver, CO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
149,Data Warehouse Developer IV,$86k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you curious in nature and like to think outside the box? Do you question discrepancies and assumptions? Are you detailed-oriented who knows how to be tactful and diplomatic? Do you like to work with a diverse team with different perspectives and styles? Then you may be just who we are looking for!

What we have:

We are looking to add on an expert team member to our already diverse Data Warehouse family. Our IT department is a fun, hardworking, collaborative, and team-oriented culture. We offer a high demanding, challenging environment that recognizes and rewards overachieving individuals. You will have the opportunity to work a friendly, diverse team on the Guidewire insurance platform. We value team member support and have an open door and open mind for your new ideas and methodologies that will make us all a stronger more effective Data Warehouse team.

Position Summary:

In this role, the candidate will work in Data Warehousing and Business Intelligence/Analytics space to design scalable, flexible, and resilient solutions to support TWIA/TFPA's continued growth and mission. Our BI systems aggregate information from numerous sources and provide management information to stakeholders throughout the company. As such, we frequently partner with various departments in TWIA/TFPA Property& Casualty Insurance companies to deliver accurate, actionable information to a diverse group of stakeholders.

Strategic Scope:

· Develops recommendation and conducts analysis in support of department and business line strategic efforts.

· Confers with client, technical staff, and team members to plan, design, develop, implement, and enhance applications, scripts, procedures, and metadata for relational databases.

· Champion enterprise data management best practices& provides recommendations for data architecture structure and standards.

· Oversee end-to-end architecture& data warehouse life cycle management activities.

· Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.

Tactical Scope:

· Designs, develops, and implements the data architecture for a data warehouse, including high-performance ETL (Extract, Transform, and Load) tools and routines and the infrastructure, applying knowledge of SQL, Unix Scripting, Java/J2EE, HTML, PL/SQL, HIVE in Hadoop.

· Recognize and leverage data sources both internally and externally to enhance the analysis capabilities.

· Reverse Engineers data specifications from source systems through data discovery, analysis, and other techniques, applying knowledge of Java programming and Agile methodology.

· Develops and maintains Data Models, including Enterprise Data Dictionary.

· Establishes methods and procedures for tracking data quality, completeness, redundancy, and improvement.

· Participates with application and infrastructure design architects to provide guidance for development and releases.

· Provides technical guidance to business on implementation of features.

· Influences the selection of hardware and software product standards and the design of standard configurations; makes significant contributions to market-centric technology roadmaps and architectural principles and frameworks.

· Reviews and ensures major architectural designs are consistent, maintainable, flexible and cost effective solutions.

· Leads retrospectives and defining opportunities for experiments and POC`s.

· Perform troubleshooting on all ETL processes and resolve issues effectively within IT service level agreements.

· Assists junior developers and business by engaging hands-on in complex data challenges and Information Management projects to derive deep insights from data, engaging hands-on in complex data challenges and Information Management projects to derive deep insights from data.

· Oversee business intelligence/data warehouse security and data load and implementation strategies.

· Lead enterprise projects through all phases of System Development Life Cycle (SDLC)/ Agile process.

Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

· Significant experience in software development processes and best practices.

· Understanding of business operations - preferably property and casualty insurance.

· Clear, effective verbal and written communication skills including the ability to actively listen, problem solve, and communicate with both technical and business users.

· Demonstrated experience working both as an individual contributor and as part of a team.

· Proven experience in providing guidance to developers, quality assurance, and business analysts.

· Attention to detail with self-discipline, strong ownership and accountability and drive for results.

Required Education and Experience:

· Four-year college degree, preferably in CS, engineering or other technical field, or equivalent experience.

· 5+ years of directly relevant experience in Data Warehouse/Business Intelligence.

· 5+ years of hands-on experience in building ETL, reporting, and Data Visualization solutions using tools (Ex: SAP Data Services, Informatica, Data Stage, Microsoft SSIS packages, QlikView, Tableau etc.).

· 2+ years of work experience in Guidewire Data Management tools.

· Experience in building conceptual, logical, and physical data modeling; dimensional modeling preferred.

Preferred Education and Experience:

· Familiarity with agile methodology.

· Certifications in P&C and IT domains.

· Experience in financial or property and casualty insurance industry.

· Experience in building Master Data Management& Data Governance desired.

· Experience in JAVA programming, reverse engineer source code.

TWIA& TFPA are proud to present our Total Rewards& Compensation Program. The Association invests in its most valuable resource -- Our Employees.
We offer an excellent Health& Welfare benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, life, accident, and disability insurance, and a retirement savings package that includes a 401(k) plan with 6% matching contributions and an employer paid pension plan. We also offer competitive pay, performance incentives, and career growth with our Training& Professional Development program. In addition, we provide a healthy environment and work/life balance along with paid holidays, personal days, paid vacation, and sick leave.

TWIA& TFPA is not accepting unsolicited assistance from search firms for this employment opportunity.

All resumes submitted on behalf of an applicant by a third party to any employee at TWIA& TFPA via-email, the Internet or in any form and/or method will be deemed the sole property of TWIA& TFPA. No fee will be paid to any third party in the event the candidate is hired by TWIA& TFPA as a result of the referral or through other means, unless TWIA& TFPA have previously entered into a contract for placement assistance with such party.",3.1,"Twia
3.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Principal Engineer UI,$80k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview Inovalon is looking for a Principal Software Engineer with Healthcare experience and focus on building modern web-based applications in the cloud. In this role, you will join our team in paving the future architecture of the Inovalon ONETM Platform for a rapidly growing part of our business. As owners of one of the largest de-identified Healthcare datasets in the world, the opportunities are endless. The ideal candidate will have strong programming skills, experience in modern web development in Amazon Web Services (AWS) and will enjoy working in a fast-paced dynamic environment. At Inovalon, we are changing the way healthcare is delivered. For over 15 years, we have been in the business of using innovative technology to improve the efficiency and accuracy of healthcare delivery. Today, we are changing the way patients are cared for, by providing unparalleled data and insights in real-time to doctors and patients when they need it most. Our employee philosophy is simple: We hire smart, talented people and trust them to do their thing. As part of Inovalon, you’ll grow with a company that wants you to succeed. To support you, we provide the teams, the latitude, the support and the culture so you can try new things, broaden your experience, and grow and succeed with us. Join our team and help make Inovalon great place to do great work. Responsibilities The responsibilities and duties of this position include: * Design, build and maintain Software-as-a-service (SaaS) web applications using modern web frameworks like Angular * Design, build and maintain middle-tier applications and APIs in Java * Design, build and maintain backend relational databases * Involve and Drive a culture of collaborative reviews of designs, code and test plans * Work with business stake holders and architecture engineering leads to ensure quality solutions are implemented and engineering standard methodologies adhered to * Work in an agile development environment * Document and estimate technical scope and design as needed * DevOps Focus -Utilize and advance continuous integration and deployment frameworks * Solve complex data issues and perform root cause analysis * Work across teams to resolve operational & performance issues * Fulfill those responsibilities and/or duties that may be reasonably provided by Inovalon for the purpose of achieving operational and financial success of the Company. * Maintain compliance with Inovalon policies and procedures; Qualifications * Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Management Information Systems or related field; or equivalent experience; * 8+ years of software engineering experience with at least 1 years’ experience building and deploying web applications in public cloud (AWS) * Ability to write code across the full stack - front end Web UI, middle tier service layer, and backend database * Experience using cloud-native managed services and Infrastructure as a service. * 5+ years of experience building and deploying modern 3-tier web applications * 2+ years of experience working in Angular * 5+ years of experience with Javascript / Typescript * 5+ years of experience with Java * 5+ years of experience working with relational databases such as MySQL, PostgreSQL * Prior experience working in an agile development environment * 2+ years of experience in a team lead / architect role * Hands on coder who understands the concepts behind distributed databases, batch and stream processing; * Experience in working with large datasets (1 Billion+ record systems); * Experience building microservices and event-based architectures; * Experience with AWS Security Architecture including IAM, Security groups and policies. * Hands on experience with Terraform and/or cloud formation; * Experience building CI/CD pipelines in public cloud and creating a culture of automation. * Experience leading and mentoring junior engineers; * Experience working with scalable cloud-based data warehousing solutions such as Redshift, Snowflake; * Systems engineering experience, including engineering, configuration, and management of Windows and Linux server environments; * Prior Experience in migration of applications to AWS; * Excellent oral and written communication skills; * Excellent time management skills with the ability to adapt to changing business priorities and operational demands; * Extensive knowledge of existing industry standards, technologies, and operational norms Inovalon provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $0.00 per hour Benefits: * 401(k) * Dental insurance * Health insurance * Paid time off Schedule: * 8 hour shift Experience: * AWS: 1 year (Preferred) * Engineering: 8 years (Preferred) Work Location: * One location Company's website: * https://www.inovalon.com Work Remotely: * Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.6,"Inovalon
2.6","Bowie, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
151,Senior Cloud Integration Engineer – Secureworks – Remote,-1,"Senior Cloud Integration Engineer – Secureworks – Remote

Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) is a technology-driven cybersecurity leader that protects organizations in the digitally connected world. Built on proprietary technologies and world-class threat intelligence, our applications and solutions help prevent, detect, and respond to cyber threats.  Red Cloak™ software brings advanced threat analytics to thousands of customers, and the Secureworks Counter Threat Platform™ processes over 300B threat events per day. We understand complex security environments and are passionate about simplifying security with Defense in Concert™ so that security becomes a business enabler. More than 4,000 customers across over 50 countries are protected by Secureworks, benefit from our network effect and are Collectively Smarter. Exponentially Safer.™ www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview

Our endpoint integrations team is looking for a senior software engineer with deep knowledge of computer security and networks to drive the next-generation security analysis capabilities of our new product offerings, which you can explore here. You will work in a fast-paced, startup-like environment with an experienced, cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists, and security experts to develop our next generation endpoint integration that seamlessly integrates with our cloud-native security analytics platform with our strategic partners. If you love computer security and digging into complex engineering challenges, then we want your help securing human progress!

Responsibilities
Own feature development for our third-party data sources from design to delivery with high performance, stability, and reliability requirements.
Employ a variety of languages and tools to marry big data systems together and hunt down opportunities to acquire new data from other systems.
Provide technical leadership on the architecture, strategy, and development of next generation threat detection and response capabilities.
Recommend and develop new product concepts and capabilities.
Ensure high standards are being followed when it comes to design, coding quality, along with unit and component testing.
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules.
Minimum Requirements
Minimum of 3 years of experience in software development for enterprise-class applications.
Minimum of 1 year of experience with Golang.
Preferred Skills
Experience in data modeling, ETL development, and data warehousing.
Experience with AWS, GCP, or similar cloud provider.
Experience with big data platforms (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, HBase, etc) or containers/orchestrators (e.g. Docker, rkt, Kubernetes, Mesos).
Computer or information security background or experience.
Familiarity with large scale data analysis pipelines, particularly those involving telemetry from next generation antivirus or endpoint detection and response systems.
BS in Computer Science, related technical field, or equivalent experience.
Strong understanding of database design and schemas, computer systems and networks, and security.
Location: Remote

Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8",Georgia,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
152,Senior System Engineer (Clearance Required),$105k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:

CollabraSpace PRIME contract is seeking a System Engineer to join the team which develops and sustains integrated, feature-rich capabilities that promote modernization of visualization and presentation tools. The software development team will provide application development and support to tools that allow mission analytic users to view existing data or contribute new information in a collaborative environment.

The System Engineer will handle outreach, support, and training requests, etc. and should have strong organizational skills, basic investigation and troubleshooting skills, and knowledge of Jira. In addition, the System Engineer will have the responsibility of working with Tech Writer. Strong web application competence.

Additional Information:
Approximately 15 team members made up of software, system, and test engineers
Work performed in contractor facility in Annapolis Junction.
Both low and high side access.
Requirements:
Fourteen (14) years experience as a SE in programs and contracts of similar scope, type and complexity is required.
Manage system requirements and derived requirements to ensure the delivery of production systems that are compatible with the defined system architecture(s) – Department of Defense Architecture Framework (DoDAF), Service-oriented Architecture (SOA), etc
Contribute to the development of sections of systems engineering documentation such as System Engineering Plans, Initial Capabilities Documents, Requirements specifications, and Interface Control Documents
Assist with the development of system requirements, functional requirements, and allocation of the same to individual hardware, software, facility, and personnel components
Coordinate the resolution of action items from Configuration Control Board (CCB) meetings, design reviews, program reviews, and test reviews that require cross-discipline coordination
Participate in an Integrated Product Team to design new capabilities based upon evaluation of all necessary development and operational considerations
Allocate real-time process budgets and error budgets to systems and subsystem components
Generate alternative system concepts, physical architectures, and design solutions
Define the methods, processes, and evaluation criteria by which the systems, subsystems and work products are verified against their requirements in a written plan
Develop system design solution that satisfies the system requirements and fulfills the functional analysis
Review and provide input to program and contract work breakdown structure (WBS), work packages and the integrated master plan (IMP)
Participate in the development of system engineering documentation, such as System Engineering Plans, Initial Capabilities Documents, Requirements Specifications, and Interface Control Documents
Participate in interface definition, design, and changes to the configuration between affected groups and individuals throughout the life cycle
Derive from the system requirements an understanding of stakeholder needs, functions that may be logically inferred and implied as essential to system effectiveness
Derive lower-level requirements from higher-level allocated requirements that describe in detail the functions that a system component must fulfill, and ensure these requirements are complete, correct, unique, unambiguous, realizable, and verifiable
Participate in establishing and gaining approval of the definition of a system or component under development (requirements, designs, interfaces, test procedures, etc.) that provides a common reference point for hardware and software developers
Develop derived requirements for Information Assurance Services (Confidentiality, Integrity, Non repudiation, and Availability); Basic Information Assurance Mechanisms (e.g., Identification, Authentication, Access Control, Accountability); and Security Mechanism Technology (Passwords, cryptography, discretionary access control, mandatory access control, hashing, key management, etc.)
Implement comprehensive SOA solutions
Implement operational view, technical standards view, and system and services view for architectures using applicable DoDAF standards
Review and/or approve system engineering documentation to ensure that processes and specifications meet system needs and are accurate, comprehensive, and complete
Capture all interface designs in a common interface control format, and store interface data in a commonly accessible repository
Assess each risk to the program and determine the probability of occurrence and quantified consequence of failure in accordance with an approved risk management plan
In conjunction with system stakeholders, plan the verification efforts of new and unproven designs early in the development life cycle to ensure compliance with established requirements
Prepare time-line analysis diagrams illustrating the flow of time-dependent functions
Establish a process to formally and proactively control and manage changes to requirements, consider impacts prior to commitment to change, gain stakeholder buy-in, eliminate ambiguity, ensure traceability to source requirements, and track and settle open actions
Manage and ensure the technical integrity of the system baseline over time, continually updating it as various changes are imposed on the system during the lifecycle from development through deployment and operations & maintenance
Support the planning and test analysis of the DoD Certification/Accreditation Process (as well as other Government Certification and Accreditation (C&A) processes)
Bachelor’s degree in System Engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering Science, Engineering Management, or related discipline from an accredited college or university is required. Five (5) years of additional SE experience may be substituted for a bachelor’s degree.
Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with a Polygraph.
Additional Desired Experience:
Analytical skills, a familiarity with distributed systems, and knowledge of web debuggers.
About us: Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It's the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.

CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, and 2018; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
153,Senior Radar Systems Engineer - Active Secret Required,-1,"Job title: Senior Radar Systems Engineer - Active Secret Required
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary type:
Annual
Salary:
Negotiable
Location: Crane, IN
Job published: 09/28/2020
Job ID: 32288
Contact name: Bo Ryals
Phone number: 256.217.4711

Job Description

Decisive Intelligence, Inc. is seeking a Sr. Radar Systems Engineer to join a growing Navy program in Crane, IN.

Job Description:

Decisive Intelligence, Inc. is looking to hire a Radar Systems Engineer. This is a senior-level position that will support and lead activities and teams supporting radar systems for the military market. The candidate should be able to demonstrate expertise in Model Based System Engineering methodologies; software tools used to assess system level radar performance (i.e. MATLAB©, CST©, etc.); and radar DOD ACAT I systems engineering processes.

Common Experience and Responsibilities:

• SYSML experience using NoMagic MagicDraw tool suite and MATLAB

• Formal DoD SETR events and familiarity with what it takes to get through those

• Able to create engineering artifacts for those events

• Capable of system level requirements analysis

• Some level of experience where they have led teams to accomplish the above tasks

Required Qualifications:

•Education: M.S. in an Engineering, Physics, or Mathematics discipline with 15-20 yrs. of professional experience in Radar systems design.

• Active Secret clearance or the ability to obtain one.

• Self-motivated and free-thinking individual capable of independent technical discussion and design contribution

• Excellent organizational skills, ability to prioritize work and maximize productivity

Preferred Qualifications:

• Radar System Engineering, specifically with the AN/SPY-1 radar, AMDR, DBR or any combination of the three

•Detailed knowledge of radar fundamentals to include Radar Cross Section (RCS), Signal to Noise Ratio (SNR), especially as it relates to SPY-1 and soon to be AMDR

•Experience with C/C++ Applications

•Experience designing/building/testing electronic components

•Experience collecting engineering data and supporting test events

#GDHP",5.0,"Decisive Intel
5.0","Crane, IN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
154,RF Technology Engineer,$48k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented Advanced Radar and Signals Engineer to join a diverse team to create unique solutions for complex sensor and radar orientated problems.

The Engineer in this role will support advanced technology radar and EW programs including research and development of advanced digital signal processing (DSP) algorithms; high-fidelity radar and RF modeling, simulation, and analysis; data acquisition and distribution; hardware and software prototyping; integration of COTS components into solutions for radar technology development; integration and field testing of RF sensors and systems; and CONUS/OCONUS deployment of advanced sensor systems.

IND3
Basic Qualifications


-Candidate must possess a Master's degree or higher in Electrical Engineering from an ABET-accredited school with a strong background in one or more of the skills listed below:
Electromagnetics
HFSS Modeling
Antenna Design / Analysis
RF Receiver / Transmitter Design
Array Analysis / Calibration Design
-Candidate must be able to apply these skills to the areas of designing radar transmitters and receivers, modeling & simulation of antennas and arrays, designing calibration networks for phased array radar systems, and field testing of sensor systems.

-Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications

Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.07.06-30

Closing Date:
11/27/2020

#CJ",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
155,Software Engineer - ColdFusion,$69k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're looking for a talented and highly motivated software engineers to join our team. As a growth stage technology company, Clear Capital is seeking developers eager to be part of a team, working closely with every part of the company from operations to our executive team. Learn more about our engineering teams here.

What you’ll do
Write high quality, well-tested, extensible and scalable code
Evaluate the short- and long-term implications of every implementation decision
You’ll work with a tight-knit team solving tough problems by building quality enterprise solutions with a professional design and coding process
Learn from accomplished developers through mentoring and committed collaboration and take your dev chops to the next level
Make an immediate impact by quickly getting up to speed and building features from start to finish
Who we’re looking for
You love tackling really tough problems, and value the correct solution over a sloppy one
You have a passion for software development, with side projects to prove it
You understand the value of tested solutions, and you’re a capable debugger
You’re comfortable reading & writing code, and can describe what each part of the code is doing
You’re great at taking constructive feedback on your work
You’re passionate about our mission to disrupt how banks, lenders and investors value real estate
Our tool kit
We believe in using the most effective tool for the job, and also relying on the strengths of our team.
Our stack and tooling includes: ColdFusion v. 12 (2016), Oracle 19c and modern tooling like JIRA, Jenkins, Git in an Agile environment
Why you’ll love it
Disrupt the Real Estate data industry by bringing cloud based, enterprise software and data services to the market for big banks, lenders and investors
See your work move into production quickly, and avoid the bureaucracy that slows down larger companies
Enjoy a modern office layout that is quiet, yet collaborative surrounded by top quality engineers that enjoy working with each other
Receive great benefits like 401(k) match, and health benefits, PTO and paid holidays
Work with a growth oriented company that is transforming itself and an industry where you can have a real impact on the company's future
About Us

Clear Capital is the premier provider of real estate valuation, analytics, and technology solutions. Powered by its more than 45 years worth of information on nearly every U.S. metro, neighborhood, and property, Clear Capital’s solutions are trusted by community credit unions and billion-dollar financial institutions alike. Clear Capital is headquartered in Reno-Tahoe with a team of more than 500 nationwide, dedicated to going wherever it leads, and doing whatever it takes.

To all recruitment agencies: Clear Capital does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Clear Capital employees, or any other company location. Clear Capital is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.

Compensation

Salary commensurate with experience

Clear Capital is an equal opportunity employer

INDT",4.0,"Clear Capital
4.0","Reno, NV",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
156,Aviation Civil Engineer,$38k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Michael Baker International is a leading provider of engineering, development, intelligence and technology solutions with global reach and mobility. The firm offers a comprehensive range of innovative services and solutions in support of federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of private development and commercial clients. Michael Baker International’s focus is on the safety and security of people across the world through planning and engineering improvements to infrastructure and the environment, and through protection of our quality of life and freedom in support of national and international security. With more than $1 billion in annual revenue, Michael Baker International has more than 5,000 employees in over 80 offices located across the U.S. and internationally, and is ranked as the 26th largest design firm in the U.S. by Engineering News Record (ENR). Michael Baker International’s Mission is to make a difference by providing innovative solutions to sustain the future and further the safety, security and quality of life for people across the globe by providing the highest level of expertise, unmatched quality and effective project teams for a diverse range of projects and clients. Michael Baker International offers excellent benefit packages that includes: Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability Insurance, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Additional Paid Time Off, Flex-Time, 401-K Retirement Plan, Tuition Reimbursement and Employee Credit Union. To learn more, please visit us on the web at www.mbakerintl.com . Michael Baker International is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer - M/F/Disability/Veteran/e-Verify Employer

WHO WE ARE

Michael Baker International is a leading provider of architectural, engineering and consulting services , including design, planning, environmental, construction and program management. The company provides its comprehensive range of services and solutions to support U.S. federal, state, and municipal governments, foreign allied governments, and a wide range of commercial clients. Michael Baker’s more than 3,000 employees across nearly 100 locations are committed to a culture of innovation, collaboration and technological advancement to help solve challenges for clients and communities throughout the country. To learn more, visit https://mbakerintl.com/ .

AVIATION PRACTICE

From airport master plan development to new runway design, Michael Baker International knows the business of airports – from the smallest general aviation facilities to the busiest international airports in the world. For more than 80 years, we have provided planning, design, and construction services to airports worldwide, serving as an on-call “extension of staff” to many of our aviation clients. Michael Baker's award-winning personnel have a reputation for taking their understanding of the local airport community / environment and incorporating related elements into their designs and plans. Knowing that airports are a key economic driver and source of pride for the geographic areas they serve, we proudly perform as partners in more than facilities and other infrastructure. We partner in success.

DESCRIPTION

The successful candidate will be responsible for driving production of airfield designs. The candidate will be responsible for helping guide the staff in the development of construction plans and specifications. The candidate will also be responsible for task management of multiple projects.

A typical day depends entirely on what type of project you may be working on.
Working on an airfield design project would include coordinating the design team for the development of construction documents and specifications.
This position would also be responsible for performing QC reviews throughout the life of the design.
As a technical lead one could expect to coordinate all aspects of a particular project with the design team and sub-consultants on a daily basis and also provide technical reviews throughout the project.
All of this could be performed on multiple projects every day.
There isn’t necessarily a typical day in the life of an Aviation Civil Engineer, every day is a new adventure.
We are committed to the growth of our internal personnel and we support this with world class learning and development, including internal training that leads to career advancement.
The career path beyond a Civil Engineer II in the aviation group includes a few potential opportunities for growth depending on your desired path. One could become a Technical Manager becoming responsible for technical project management for multiple projects. One could become a Project Manager becoming responsible for all aspects of project management and managing the client throughout the life of a project.

PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor of Science degree in Civil Engineering
Minimum 6 – 8 years of civil engineering design experience with a concentration in airfield design . A Master’s degree can be substituted for 1-2 years of experience.
Licensed Professional Engineer.
Proficient with AutoCAD and AutoCAD Civil 3D design
Airfield civil design including airfield pavement design
Ability to analyze GIS data
Ability to write technical engineering reports
Ability to manage and prioritize project assignments to meet competing deadlines.
Attention to detail and effective decision making, organization, and editing skills.
Good interpersonal, communication, and conceptual thinking skills.
Work independently and within a team setting to support projects and assignments.

What would make me stand out as a candidate?

Level and type of aviation experience.
Broad knowledge of aviation planning, programming, design, and construction.
Overall knowledge of the aviation industry.
Knowledge and experience with the AIP and the grant programs.
Knowledge of FAA Airports policies and procedures.
Federal/DoD Aviation design experience.

MICHAEL BAKER INTERNATIONAL EEO STATEMENT

Michael Baker International is proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Michael Baker International provides equal employment opportunity for all persons, in all facets of employment. Michael Baker International maintains a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing and background checks. We encourage all qualified applicants to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified and all will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, marital status, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other legally protected status.

EEO is the Law. Applicants to and employees of Michael Baker International are protected under Federal law from discrimination.",3.5,"Michael Baker International
3.5","Moon Township, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
157,Software Engineer / Analytics Developer (AWS / Hadoop / HiveQL / Ab Initio ),$41k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Information

Solid reputation, passionate people and endless opportunities. That’s Travelers. Our superior financial strength and consistent record of strong operating returns mean security for our customers – and opportunities for our employees. You will find Travelers to be full of energy and a workplace in which you truly can make a difference.

Target Openings

1

Job Description Summary

Travelers is seeking a Software Engineer I to join our organization as we grow and transform our Technology landscape. Individual will complete intermediate end to end engineering tasks for specific system assignments including developing, analyzing, configuring, testing, debugging, troubleshooting, documenting, health monitoring/alerting, and implementing based on user or system design specifications, as well as participating in troubleshooting, conducting impact analysis and escalating appropriately.

For our Personal Insurance Business Technology Business Intelligence Analytics area:
• Design, implement and deploy custom applications on Hadoop using Python / PySpark.
• Develop and implement AWS solutions using: EC2, S3, RDS, Redshift, Snowflake and/or
other supporting cloud technologies.

Primary Job Duties & Responsibilities

Perform analysis, design, development, and configuration functions as well as define technical requirements for assignments of intermediate complexity.
Participate with team to perform analysis, assessment and resolution for defects and incidents of intermediate complexity and escalate appropriately.
Work within guidelines set by team to independently tackle well-scoped problems.
Seek opportunities to expand technical knowledge and capabilities.

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree or its equivalent in work experience.
One year of programming/development experience.

Education, Work Experience, & Knowledge

Three years of programming/development experience preferred.

Job Specific Technical Skills & Competencies

AWS/Public Cloud and Big Data /Hadoop experience:
Experience with Kubernetes, Docker.
Experience within Hortonworks Hadoop ecosystems.
Python / PySpark experience.
AWS solutions development and implement experience.
SQL / HiveQL proficiency.
Ab Initio experience.
Delivery - Intermediate delivery skills including the ability to deliver work at a steady, predictable pace to achieve commitments, decompose work assignments into small batch releases and contribute to tradeoff and negotiation discussions.
Domain Expertise - Demonstrated track record of domain expertise including the ability to understand technical concepts necessary to do the job effectively, demonstrate willingness, cooperation, and concern for business issues and possess in-depth knowledge of immediate systems worked on.
Problem Solving - Proven problem solving skills including debugging skills, allowing you to determine source of issues in unfamiliar code or systems and the ability to recognize and solve repetitive problems rather than working around them, recognize mistakes using them as learning opportunities and break down large problems into smaller, more manageable ones.
Communication - Strong communication skills with the ability to clearly and concisely interact with team members, document work in a clear, easy to follow manner, collaborate well with team members, take in well- scoped requirements and ask the right questions to ensure clarification, seek out and receive constructive criticism well and listen when others are speaking.
Leadership - Intermediate leadership skills with a proven track record of self-motivation in identifying personal growth opportunities.

Environmental / Work Schedules / Other

Travel Required

Equal Employment Opportunity Statement

Travelers is an equal opportunity employer.",4.1,"Travelers
4.1","Hartford, CT",-1,10000+ Employees,1853,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
158,Principal System Engineer (Clearance Required),$111k-$213k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the job:


You’ve got the hot skills, the winning attitude and the clearance, but maybe your job doesn’t live up to your career goals? At CollabraSpace, you decide which project best suits your interests, talents, and ambitions. Our tasks run the full range from Proof of Concept studies and QRC oriented tasks to Enterprise level production systems with ten thousand+ active users. We’re looking for those interested in learning. Really. We have smart people and informed customers, and working together and learning from one another creates success for everyone. Tell us what you like to do, chances are we have a program ready to reward your talents.

Requirements:
Twenty (20) years experience in programs and contracts of similar scope, type and complexity.
BS degree or higher in Computer Science or related discipline. Additional equivalent experience may be substituted for a degree.
Clearance: Applicants must be U.S. Citizens possessing an active TS/SCI security clearance with Polygraph.
Our work typically includes the following:

Provides technical direction for the development, engineering, interfacing, integration, and testing of specific components of complex hardware/software systems to include requirements elicitation, analysis and functional allocation, conducting systems requirements reviews, developing concepts of operation and interface standards, and performing technical/non-technical assessment and management as well as end-to-end flow analysis
Develops system architecture and system design documentation. Contributes to the development of sections of systems engineering documentation such as System Engineering Plans, Initial Capabilities Documents, Requirements specifications, and Interface Control Documents and ensures they are accurate, comprehensive, and complete. Supports the development and review of Joint Capability Integration Development System (JCIDS) documents (i.e., initial Capability Document, Capabilities Description Document, IA Strategy).
Manages system requirements, derived system requirements, functional requirements. Based on an understanding of stakeholder needs, logically infers functions which are essential to system effectiveness and ensures these requirements are complete, correct, unique, unambiguous, realizable, and verifiable. Develops operational view, technical standards view, and system and services view for architectures using applicable DoDAF standards. Where applicable, develops comprehensive SOA solutions. Ensures the delivery of production systems that are compatible with the defined system architecture(s) Department of Defense Architecture Framework (DoDAF), Service-oriented Architecture (SOA), etc
Allocates real-time process budgets and error budgets to systems and subsystem components
Conducts quantitative analysis in non-functional system performance areas like Reliability, Maintainability, Vulnerability, Survivability, Produceability, etc.). Generates alternative system concepts, physical architectures, and design solutions
Participates in establishing and gaining approval of the definition of a system or component under development (requirements, designs, interfaces, test procedures, etc.) that provides a common reference point for hardware and software developers
In conjunction with system stakeholders, plans the verification efforts of new and unproven designs early in the development life cycle to ensure compliance with established requirements. Further defines the methods, processes, and evaluation criteria by which the systems, subsystems and work products are verified against their requirements in a written plan
Fully defines interfaces in terms of origination, destination, stimulus, and data characteristics for software; and electrical and mechanical characteristics for hardware. Captures all interface designs in a common interface control format, and stores interface data in a commonly accessible repository
Establishes and follows a formal procedure for coordinating system integration activities among multiple teams, ensuring complete coverage of all interfaces.
Develops derived requirements for Information Assurance Services (Confidentiality, Integrity, Non repudiation, and Availability); Basic Information Assurance Mechanisms (e.g., Identification, Authentication, Access Control, Accountability); and Security Mechanism Technology (Passwords, cryptography, discretionary access control, mandatory access control, hashing, key management, etc.) Supports the planning and test analysis of the DoD Certification/Accreditation Process (as well as other Government Certification and Accreditation (C&A) processes)
Develops scenarios (threads) and an Operational Concept that describes the interactions between the system, the user, and the environment, that satisfies operational, support, maintenance, and disposal needs. Reviews and provides input to program and contract work breakdown structure (WBS), work packages and the integrated master plan (IMP)
Coordinates the resolution of action items from Configuration Control Board (CCB) meetings, design reviews, program reviews, and test reviews that require cross-discipline coordination. Establishes a process to formally and proactively control and manage changes to requirements, considers impacts prior to commitment to change, gains stakeholder buy-in, eliminates ambiguity, ensures traceability to source requirements, and tracks and settles open actions. May serves as a member of the CCB. Ensures effective, periodic review and control of the evolving configuration of a system, both hardware and software components and associated documentation, during the life of the system
Manages and ensures the technical integrity of the system baseline over time, continually updating it as various changes are imposed on the system during the lifecycle from development through deployment and operations & maintenance
Assess each risk to the program and determine the probability of occurrence and quantified consequence of failure in accordance with an approved risk management plan. Develops alternative courses of action, workarounds, and fall-back positions with a recommended course of action for each risk, and monitor and re-evaluate risks at appropriate milestones. Monitors risks using earned value management (EVM) data. Uses validated models, simulations, and prototyping to mitigate risk and reduce cost of system development
Manages and ensures the technical integrity of the system baseline over time, continually updating it as various changes are imposed on the system during the lifecycle from development through deployment and operations & maintenance
In conjunction with system stakeholders, plans the verification efforts of new and unproven designs early in the development life cycle to ensure compliance with established requirements
Supports the planning and test analysis of the DoD Certification/Accreditation Process (as well as other Government Certification and Accreditation (C&A) processes)
Conducts and/or approves end-to-end system trade analyses to optimize system operations over its life-cycle through the proper balance of non-functional system performance areas
Maintains knowledge of current and evolving agency, national, and international standards applicable to the system development of interest. Applies and enforces use of suitable standards to ensure consistency and interoperability of developer hardware and software
As a participant within an Analysis of Alternatives (AoA) effort, recommends a preferred solution based on selection criteria adjusted for reasonableness and validity of assumptions, technology limitations, environmental impact, and life-cycle costs. Develops system design alternatives that consider life cycle cost, reuse, complexity, risk, system expansion, and growth
_________________________________________

About us:


Collaboration is the fusion of people and ideas toward a common goal; and at CollabraSpace it’s part of everything we do. It’s the foundation upon which Collabraspace was created, at the core of our corporate philosophy, and even represented in our logo where different pieces of one circle work together in synergy. As a technical services and product company, Collabraspace supports the critical mission of our nation’s security through ongoing collaboration with our team members, customers, and partners.

Across our 20+ programs we provide enterprise software development solutions and real-time collaboration to both government and private industry. CollabraSpace is headquartered in Annapolis Junction, MD, close to the majority of our work and therefore, close to you.

CollabraSpace Facts:
Team. At CollabraSpace, we truly believe in the team. We’ll always do our best to find a position that makes you happy to go to work every day, support the charitable causes that are important to you, and encourage your involvement with the company by providing events for the whole family.
Security. We offer competitive salaries but more than that, we make sure the salary we are offering you can be supported by multiple programs. Why is that important? See bullet #1; if you’re not happy we will do our best to find something that does make you happy.
Benefits. Our comprehensive benefits package means you pay very little for a full suite of coverage.
100% company paid premiums for Health and Dental plans for employees and eligible dependents.
100% company paid Life & Disability plans.
401(k) & Roth plan with company contribution immediately vested.
Annual bonus plan, spot bonuses for a job well done, and referral bonuses.
Paid Time Off (PTO) allowing you to use your time off as you see fit.
Formal education and training benefits.
Transparency. You have heard it before but here you’ll truly experience it. The management team “puts it all on the table” and always has an open door.
Training and Education. It’s part of our collaborative environment. Besides the traditional off-site training which we pay for upfront, CollabraSpace offers in-house Technical Exchanges on a range of topics presented by our own technical staff or industry partners.
Honors. We earned the Alliance for Workplace Excellence Award for 4 years running and have been named to the Baltimore Sun’s Top 100 Workplaces 2013, 2014, & 2015; an award given based on survey responses from our team members. We are consistently ranked as one of the Top IT Firms in Baltimore by the Baltimore Business Journal.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
CollabraSpace is an equal opportunity employer. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.
Make a life at CollabraSpace, not just a living!",5.0,"CollabraSpace, Inc.
5.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
159,Design Engineer - Agriculture Equipment,$43k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Design Engineer – Agriculture Equipment

YANMAR America Corporation, located in Adairsville, GA, is the regional headquarters of YANMAR Co., Ltd. a global company based in Osaka, Japan. YANMAR is a recognized leader in the design and manufacturing of advanced performance diesel engines and diesel-powered equipment for a multitude of market segments including agricultural and construction equipment. YANMAR Co. Ltd., was established in 1912 and in 1933 became the world's first manufacturer to develop a practical small diesel engine. Over the last 80 years, YANMAR has been a manufacturer of world-renowned engines and equipment. YANMAR America Corporation is located at 101 International Parkway, Adairsville, GA 30103. For more information, please visit us.YANMAR.com.

Position Summary:

YANMAR America is seeking a Design Engineer for the Adairsville, Ga Corporate office location. This position’s primary function is to design, analyze, test, and revise tractor implements and attachments for the U.S. and European Agriculture Equipment markets.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Utilize CAD software to design tractor implements and accessories for the U.S. and European markets.
Analyze designs utilizing detailed calculations, DFMEA, FEA, and motion studies.
Create detailed part/assembly drawings utilizing internal and industry drawing standards.
Create detailed cost estimates to determine feasibility and cost targets.
Develop task schedules to track project status and meet deadlines.
Support service department in the development of manuals.
Support test engineers by providing any necessary data.
Knowledge, Skills, & Abilities:
Proficient in Creo Parametric/Simulate
Understanding of GD&T
Ability to design sheet metal parts, machined parts, and welded assemblies.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Strong organizational and team working skills.
Ability to work 8+ hours per day in a plant/office setting. Must be able to navigate all areas of the building and facility as needed. May occasionally lift and move up to 20 pounds in an office, customer or similar setting. Must be aware of surroundings.
Must use appropriate PPE including but not limited to safety toe shoes/boots and safety glasses.
Appropriately interact with others in stressful and busy situations.
Regular and reliable attendance is required.
Ability to travel domestic and international
Job Requirements:
B.S. in Mechanical Engineering from an accredited school.
Two to five years’ experience as a design engineer working with heavy equipment or a related field.
Experience with hydraulic and/or electrical design is a plus.
Experience in operating heavy equipment and shop equipment (mill, lathe, welder, and plasma cutter) is a plus.
This position is full time and based in Adairsville, GA.
This position is full time and based in Adairsville, GA.
Successful candidates may expect an excellent total compensation package including competitive salary, health care insurance (including dental and vision), 401(k) retirement plan with match, and many other excellent employee benefits.",2.6,"YANMAR America
2.6","Adairsville, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
160,Software Engineer - Data Analytics,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Analytics development experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for critical mission support. The candidate should be experienced with development, deployment, administration, and integration of data analytic frameworks. A knowledge of bulk, streaming, time series, and graph analytic engineering needed.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy analytic software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Creating and deploying software solutions using predictive analytics, big data processing, and/or cloud computing
Designing and developing data analytic software solutions that use large-scale distributed software techniques
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Performing dataflow, transform, distribution, and ingest engineering
Working across multi-functional teams to support the integration of multiple formats of data
Supporting the addition of Data Provenance and design with legal compliance requirements in mind
Educating product development and operations teams though documentation, presentations and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of data analytic software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Experience with distributed data frameworks such as Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark, Heron, Storm, Accumulo, Kafka
Experience with container orchestration such as Kubernetes
Experience with multiple types of databases such as NoSQL, RDBMS, Key-Value, Document
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Understanding of legal requirements in respect to Data Provenance
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
161,OPIR & Weather Data Exploitation Systems Engineer,$52k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job ID: 209184

Location: EL SEGUNDO , CA , US

Date Posted: 2020-05-22

Category: Engineering and Sciences

Subcategory: Specialty Engr

Schedule: Full-time

Shift: Day Job

Travel: Yes, 25 % of the Time

Minimum Clearance Required: TS/SCI

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain: TS/SCI with Poly

Potential for Remote Work: No

Description

SAIC is currently looking for a systems engineer to provide technical advisory support to the US Air Force Space and Missile Systems Center Development Corps (DC) Technical Evolution Branch at Los Angeles AFB, CA. SMC/DC acquires Overhead Persistent Infrared (OPIR) and Weather space systems to support military and intelligence community users.

The successful candidate will engage with potential end users of the OPIR and Weather system data and provide technical systems engineering solutions to support exploitation of OPIR and Weather system data.

Key Duties/Responsibilities include, but not limited to:

Utilizing knowledge of OPIR and Weather systems, work with Government team to identify potential users of the system data; manage user engagement rolodex/contact list

Perform User Engagement to solicit end user focus areas and needs, translate needs into requirements that will be provided to the Broad Area Announcement (BAA) Data Exploitation project process

Assist government program managers in utilizing earned value management principles and techniques to assist in the management of projects technical baseline utilizing earned value project performance metrics for cost and schedule

Provide input for the BAA Data Exploitation project RFP documents, participate in BAA Industry Days

Provide input on BAA project award selection based on end user needs and support the technical evaluation of data exploitation projects

Assist government project officers in program management of BAA data exploitation projects to ensure project success from technical, cost and schedule perspective. Identify programmatic issues and recommend resolution plans to government project officer

Assist government in testing and evaluation of BAA data exploitation projects at the RS Tools, Applications and Processing (TAP) Laboratory and assist in project assessment for follow-on deployment at the OPIR Battlespace Awareness Center (OBAC) based on project success and mission utility for end users

Develop strategic roadmap for desired data exploitation projects; support the development of projects and work with Government team to develop post-development plans

Qualifications

REQUIRED EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:

Bachelors (STEM) and nine (9) years or more of related experience -OR- Masters and seven (7) years or more of related experience -OR- PhD or JD and four (4) years or more of related experience

OPIR and Weather enterprise understanding

Satellite system data exploitation experience

DoD Acquisition experience – provide ideas to accelerate implementation

Demonstrated experience leading user requirement development

Excellent interpersonal, leadership, team building and problem solving skills with a demonstrated ability to be effective in a government/contractor team environment

Demonstrated application of advanced technical principles, theories, and concepts

Ability to recommend/make decisions on project work matters and ensures effective achievement of program, project, or organizational objectives

Ability to work proactively, independently as a member of a highly effective technical team while developing approaches to solutions

DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:

Transformational thinking – innovative, entrepreneurial, business development

Familiar with Air Force rapid contracting methodologies such as the Space Enterprise Consortium Other Transaction Authority process (SpEC-OTA) or rapid application deployment facilities such as Catalyst Campus

Familiar with the concepts of AI, Deep Learning, & Machine Learning algorithms and their use in space-based analysis

Familiar with the phenomenology and military usage of the radar to infrared portions of the electromagnetic spectrum

Experience working in a systems engineering and technical support (SETA) role

Experience in OPIR & Weather sensors and processing

Experience in Systems Engineering of Space Systems programs

Experience mentoring/advising less experienced staff

SAIC is a premier technology integrator solving our nation's modernization and readiness challenges. Our offerings across defense, space, civilian, and intelligence markets include high-end solutions in engineering, IT, and mission outcomes. We integrate the best components from our portfolio with our partner's ecosystem to deliver innovative and effective solutions. We are 25,500 strong; driven by mission, united by purpose, and inspired by opportunities. Headquartered in Reston, VA, SAIC has annual revenues of nearly $7.1 billion. For information, visit saic.com or Working at SAIC for benefits details. SAIC is an Equal Opportunity Employer empowering people no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status. We strive to create a diverse, inclusive and respectful work culture that values all.",3.9,"SAIC
3.9","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2013,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
162,Civil Engineer Project Manager,$45k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Civil Engineer supporting the government client at Mountain Home Air Force Base, ID. Provide Engineering and Engineering Technician services required to develop, plan, program and execute Facilities, Sustainment, Restoration and Modernization projects.

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in related field such as Engineering, Architecture, Construction Management etc..
5+ years of experience; military experience a plus
Position Description:
Federal design and construction contracts
Providing oversight of A/E design
Preparing modifications to A/E and construction contracts
Preparing A/E design scopes of work
Preparing construction scopes of work for IDIQ, MACC, SABER, competitive etc. type contracts
Evaluating A/E and construction proposals
Facility and Building systems- Roofing, Building Envelope, Interior Construction, MEP (Mechanical, Electrical and Plumbing), Building automation, etc.
Applying the Department of Defense Unified Facilities Criteria and Uniform Facilities Guide Specifications to facility construction projects
Coordinating access to facilities and conduct interviews with facility personnel
Organizing and gathering project data, conducting analyses and providing recommendations without assistance
Reading and understanding CAD drawings, old blueprints, and facility/project specifications
Government procurement process and regulations related to A/E services and construction contracts.
Developing cost estimates using PACES, RS Means and other approved DOD cost estimating tools
Estimating common CSI Divisions associated with interior construction/renovation, utilities, pavements
Developing independent, local market corrected cost estimates, meeting accuracy standards specified in the DOD Unified Facilities Criteria, for Architect/Engineer and construction services throughout the planning, design, construction, and repair of facilities and infrastructure on projects ranging from $5,000 - $35,000,000 in scope
Developing independent cost estimates of the cost of construction contract change orders
Reviewing A/E designs
Reviewing construction submittals
Reading and interpreting project schedules
Required Skills:
Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing; negotiate complex issues; and maintain good working relationships
Experience working with Microsoft Word, Access, Excel, and PowerPoint, AutoCAD, Cost Estimating Software. Specific capabilities must include word processing, spreadsheet, database, and graphics
Proficient in commonly used engineering software programs. Able to develop, maintain, and utilize databases as decision-making tools and in concert with geographical interface systems (GIS) as appropriate
Experience using NexGen IT/TRIRIGA. Ability to input, prepare monthly execution and percent design reports inputs to support the preparation of monthly execution and percent design reports
Hiring Company Description:

Ecompex, Inc.

With deep expertise in both professional services and technology, and strong execution skills focused on delivering mission critical results for our clients. We serve clients in multiple Government agencies, institutions, and infrastructure organizations including Federal, State, and Local Government; Defense and Military; Healthcare; Financial; and Litigation & Administrative industries. At Ecompex, we are more than a business - we are a family. We are an energetic, dynamic company that prides itself on quality and is constantly growing and expanding.
--
EEO Employer/Protected Veteran/Disabled. Ecompex is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other characteristic protected by law.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor. Ecompex has a desire for priority referrals of protected veterans.

Ecompex, Inc. is compliant with requirements of 41 C.F.R. § 60-1.4(a)(3). This regulation protects applicants and employees from discrimination based on inquiring about, disclosing, or discussing their compensation or the compensation of other applicants or employees.

Ecompex, Inc. participates in the E-verify program as required by federal law.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Temporary rotating telework schedule possible.

Experience:
Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
http://www.ecompex.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"Ecompex
3.5","Mountain Home AFB, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
163,Senior Avionics Engineer,$57k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Avionics Project Engineering Position is for a Senior Engineer working at Aerojet Rocketdyne Culpeper VA. The Avionics Project Engineer reporting to Avionics Engineering will be responsible for managing day to day engineering activities of Defense Business Unit programs. He/she works directly with engineers and personnel across various company centers of excellence and in close collaboration with the Program Manager(s) and Program Chief Engineer(s).

This current opening may be filled at this level as posted or at one level higher.

Essential Job Functions (Including % of Time for Each):

30% Provide on-site production support engineering

30% Coordinate with on-site Operations personnel and remote hardware engineers

15% Provide initial screen of thruster, controller, and Final Assembly and Checkout (FACO) Acceptance Test Procedure (ATP) issues

5% Troubleshoot electrical continuity problems on flight hardware and test equipment

5% Troubleshoot Manufacturing Test Set (MTS) problems

5% Evaluate potential impact of MTS problems to deliverable hardware

5% Replace MTS PC, cable, and instrument components - as necessary

5% Perform MTS maintenance, ATP, and calibration

Requirements:

Desired Competencies and Experience

The overarching responsibility of a Avionics Project Engineer is to be the Project Coordinator / Engineering Manager for all phases of the engineering design and development lifecycle. The following capabilities and experience highly valued.

Good oral and written communication skills - able to coordinate and collaborate with local Operations and distant-located Engineering organizations
Strong troubleshooting and problem solving skills
Proficient with general purpose test equipment (DMM, oscilloscope, power supplies, etc.)
Familiarity with aerospace/defense engineering design and production disciplines
Able to read and understand engineering drawings, electrical schematics, and wiring diagrams
Experience with the following hardware and software technologies
DSP-based embedded control systems
Mixed analog/digital circuits
Electromechanical actuators with PWM motor control
National Instruments cDAQ systems and LabWindows/CVI
RS-422 serial data links
Python Programming Language
Other desired experience
QNX Neutrino RT operating system

Minimum Requirements

BS degree in electrical, electronic, or computer engineering (with strong hardware experience)
Minimum of 5 years of experience managing aerospace and defense development programs. Experience in use of computer aided design and analysis tools and Microsoft Office Suite, proficient in Microsoft Project.
US Citizenship required. Must be able to obtain and maintain a U.S. Security Clearance at the appropriate level (U.S. Citizenship required).
Must also be able to satisfy federal government requirements for access to government information, and having dual citizenship may preclude you from being able to meet this requirement.

Physical Requirements and Work Place Environment

Employees in these positions must possess mobility to work in a standard office setting and to use standard office equipment, including a computer. The employee must have the stamina to sit or stand and maintain attention to detail despite interruptions. He/she may occasionally lift/carry/push/pull up to 25 pounds. The assignments may require occasional walking, climbing, stooping, crouching, and/or bending. Have vision acuity to read printed materials and computer screen, and hearing and speech to communicate in person and over the telephone.

The work environment may require a combination of indoor and outdoor activity (hot, cold, wet, humid conditions). While performing the duties of this job, employees may work around variable noise levels and may require donning personal protective equipment such as safety glasses, safety shoes, and shop coat. The candidate may be expected to work varying shifts and hours to ensure successful operation of activities in the organization. May require the ability to travel by air or auto.",3.3,"Aerojet Rocketdyne
3.3","Culpeper, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1942,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
164,IP Ops Senior Engineer/Telecom Specialist - Access,$53k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Description

MetroNet has an immediate opening for an energetic; customer focused IP Operations Engineer/Telecommunications Specialist in Evansville, IN!

At MetroNet, we pride ourselves on providing cutting-edge technology combined with outstanding customer care. We are a fast-growing telecommunication company, offering 100% fiber-optic technology. MetroNet specializes in fiber to the premise TV, voice and internet services that provide our customers with some of the fastest internet speeds in the world. Recognized for being one of the Best Places to Work in 2020 by Glassdoor. We are committed to revolutionizing the industry by enhancing the overall customer experience and optimizing the talent of our valued associates.

We’re looking for tech-savvy, innovative thinkers to join our team and help us create what’s next!

What is in it for you?

Competitive total compensation package
80% of Medical premiums paid for by company
Company paid Disability and Life insurance
401(k) company match and 100% vested on day 1
Discounted MetroNet service in our serviceable area
Locally owned, friendly, fun atmosphere

Job Summary:

The primary role of this position, based in Evansville Indiana, will be to provide operational support for a carrier class IP infrastructure deployed throughout a multi-state network. In particular, this position is responsible for configuring/reconfiguring routers and switches as required, provision new orders; assisting as required in trouble shooting and resolving problems; and for maintaining all network documentation to reflect the state of our network. The scope of these responsibilities encompasses three levels of equipment, software and configuration deployment: 1) customer based hardware; 2) network based edge devices located at various hub sites; and 3) our core IP infrastructure.

What you will be doing:

Configure/reconfigure routers and switches as required to provision new orders.
Effectively implement engineering guidelines (QoS, performance, reliability, security, scalability, VOIP, IPTV etc.) by being able to complete installation, testing, and acceptance of router/switch hardware on a solo basis, with minimal supervision.
Assist in trouble shooting and resolving problems, including being able to provide and interpret the results of packet captures.
Maintain all network documentation to reflect the state of our network.
Provide purchase recommendations that are highly cost/value based, that taking into account ongoing technical support requirements and implementation complexity. Accomplishing this goal by developing platform requirements and documentation for bidding and reviewing vendor responses.
Serve as an interdepartmental IP networking subject matter expert by building strong technical relationships with colleagues and external vendors.
Identify opportunities to reduce cost.

What You Need For This Position:

4-year degree desired, but will consider all relevant experience and appropriate certifications in lieu of completed degree.
3+ years Telecom Carrier IP Network (Voice/Video/Data) experience.
CCNA/JNCIA level certification preferred.
General knowledge of IP network communications.
General knowledge and/or experience with IOS and/or JUNOS, Nokia (ALU)
Expert in-depth knowledge of IP Routing Protocols (OSPF, BGP, PIM).
Strong knowledge in the following VOIP, Multicast, QOS, MPLS, L2/L3 VPN, Metro Ethernet.
Strong knowledge of data networking (TDM, SONET, private line/DSx, Frame Relay, ATM).
Expert in-depth knowledge of IP networking (QoS techniques, routing protocols, security, Cisco IOS) and RSVP, MPLS/VPLS, Traffic Engineering, 802.1p, 802.1Q, and 802.11.
Familiarity with multi-service networking (i.e.: ATM, VoIP, VoATM, H323, MPEG2, MPEG4 Video).
Experience with Metasolv or other telecom facility management system desired, but not required.
Experience interpreting telecom provisioning documents.
Ability to understand standards bodies implementation agreements.
Ability to communicate effectively and professionally by email and phone.
Understanding of the strong need for process standardization.
Ability to effectively manage multiple projects and tasks.
Strong attention to detail with ability to evaluate and analyze information quickly.
Ability to communicate technical matters to senior management.
Ability to operate at both the tactical and strategic levels.
Dependable, self-motivated and able to take action with minimal direction.
Ability to thrive in a dynamic environment with minimal supervision (highly self-sufficient)

If you have a strong desire to impact, the success of our organization by ensuring we continue to attract and retain committed professionals, please apply today!

MetroNet is an EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

#ZR",4.4,"MetroNet
4.4","Evansville, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
165,Software Engineer (PRWeb),$58k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Cision Ltd is a leading global provider of innovative earned media software and services to public relations and marketing communications professionals. Cision’s Communications Cloud platform allows users to identify key influencers, craft and distribute strategic content, and measure meaningful impact of PR and Communications Teams’ campaigns. Cision has over 4,500 employees with offices in 23 countries throughout the Americas, EMEA, and APAC. For more information about our products and services, visit www.cision.com and follow us on Twitter @Cision.
Cision employs the brightest, most passionate people in the tech industry. We’d love for you to join that group! We invest in our people through training and professional development and we empower them to grow their careers - because the most important measure of our success is yours.


The Software Engineer for the PRWeb team is responsible to provide expertise with the design, development, testing, deployment, maintenance and operation of software to meet the business requirements and support internal and external clients achieve their performance objectives.
You will help us by:
Contributing to team efforts to produce high quality software inclusive of requirements analysis, system design, implementation, testing, deployment and support.
Analyzing large, complex systems to determine performance bottlenecks, missing functionality, and bugs.
Adhering to established protocols, procedures, and best practices to ensure quality of code.
Writing clear technical documentation and comments in code for other developers, unit test and automated test scripts, and clear requirements to recreate and/or correct issues.
Participating in team meetings and encouraging an open, collaborative team dynamic.
Communicating with team and management about deadlines, roadblocks, and status.
Keeping up to date on relevant technologies, methodologies, and tools.
You will be a good fit if you have the following:
Bachelor’s degree (or equivalent experience) in Computer Science, Programming, or similar field.
Minimum two years of professional experience developing commercial software.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, aptitude for writing well-designed, testable and efficient code, and strong verbal and written communication skills.
Experience in the following: object-oriented analysis and design, working with multiple languages and platforms, QA & Testing, including unit tests, TDD methods, and automated testing, and continuous integration and build automation.
Working knowledge of Agile/Scrum methodology, tools, and techniques.
Understanding of modern software architecture and methodologies.
Thrive in a fast-paced environment: learn rapidly and master diverse technologies and techniques.
Ability to work independently and as a member of a team.
You will be a great fit if you also have:
Professional Experience with C#, .NET, JavaScript, and one or more JS frameworks (Angular, React, Node)
Experience with one or more relational database systems (MySQL, Postgres, SQL Server)
Familiar with Jenkins or similar build automation system
Comfortable with Java
#LI-_AN2

Cision is committed to building an environment where all employees are set up to thrive and reach their full potential. We believe diversity, equity and inclusion is vital to driving our culture, sparking innovation and achieving long-term success. Cision is proud to have joined more than 600 companies in signing the CEO Action for Diversity & Inclusion™ pledge, the largest CEO-driven business commitment to advance diversity and inclusion within the workplace.
Cision is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, seeking to create a welcoming and diverse environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or other protected statuses.
EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V, 41 CFR 60–1.4
Please see EEO is the law and EEO is the Law Supplement.
Please review our Global Candidate Data Privacy Statement to learn about Cision’s commitment to protecting personal data collected during the hiring process.",2.8,"Cision
2.8","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1892,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
166,Scientist Engineer III,$85k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:
Independently performs a project assignment that involves complex features and can be guided by codes, standards, and other precedents of the discipline; analyzes and/or evaluates the results of an analysis using techniques prescribed by senior engineers or supervisors; and accomplishes tasks of which require investigation of a many variables.
Personally observes test events as required and monitors performance of the test item and adequacy of data collection.
Reviews the data collected for completeness, accuracy, and validity.
To Land This Job, You Need:
Must possess a Bachelor’s Degree in specialization or related scientific discipline
15 years applicable experience; or a Master’s Degree in specialization or related scientific discipline and 5 years applicable experience.
5 years of experience gained within the past 10 years (2010 to present) in evaluation sciences in any of the following:
Analytical techniques such as predictive analytics and risk analytics; natural language processing, machine learning, and artificial intelligence; data requirements analysis, data modeling, data cleaning, and database structures; data mining and visualization; conceptual modeling; and statistical analysis techniques
Demonstrated experience in use and application of one or more of the following programming languages common in data science: Python, R, Java, SQL, and/or No-SQL)
Demonstrated experience in use and application of one or more of the following math packages common in data science: MATLAB, JMP, and/or SAS.
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

TS/SCI

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Aberdeen Proving Ground, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
167,Infrastructure & Tools - Co-Op Software Engineer,$28k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Role

We are seeking a Software Engineer Co-Op to support the integration and deployment of autonomous software to vehicles operating all over the world. You will be responsible for working closely with engineers to drive the technical road map of infrastructure operations that supports both internal development and remote fleet management.

Responsibilities:
Contributing to the design of innovative solutions for all aspects of software build, deploy and test processes.
Working with cross-functional teams to develop best practices for configuration and release management.
Designing and implementing systems responsible for data acquisition and analysis from remote vehicles in the field.
Proactively identifying more efficient solutions for integrating software with complex hardware components, through on-vehicle troubleshooting and log analysis.
Candidate is expected to work 40 hours a week during the duration of their co-op.

Must be willing to be based locally in Blacksburg, VA for duration of Co-Op.

Competencies:
Candidate must be a full-time student currently pursuing an undergraduate or graduate degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related field
0-2 years of experience
Basic knowledge of Linux platforms
Basic software development experience
Familiarity with one or more C/C++, Python, shell scripting, JavaScript
Familiarity with Cloud providers (AWS, GCP, Azure)
Interest in networking fundamentals and troubleshooting methods",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
168,General Engineer III,$78k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:.
Independently performs project assignment that involves complex features and can be guided by codes, standards, and other precedents of the discipline; analyzes and/or evaluates the results of an analysis using techniques prescribed by senior engineers or supervisors; and accomplishes tasks of which require investigation of a many variables.
To Land This Job, You Need:
5 years of experience gained within the past 10 years (2010 to present) in evaluation sciences in any of the following: Analytical techniques such as predictive analytics and risk analytics; natural language processing, machine learning, and artificial intelligence; data requirements analysis, data modeling, data cleaning, and database structures; data mining and visualization; conceptual modeling; and statistical analysis techniques
Demonstrated experience in use and application of one or more of the following programming languages common in data science: Python, R, Java, SQL, and/or No-SQL)
Demonstrated experience in use and application of one or more of the following math packages common in data science: MATLAB, JMP, and/or SAS.
Must possess a Bachelor’s Degree in engineering specialization or related discipline and 10 years applicable experience; or a Master’s Degree in engineering specialization or related discipline and 5 years applicable experience.
Experience in DoD integrated test philosophy, test regulations, and coordinated test and evaluation programs are required.
Must be familiar with DoD drawings, specifications practices, formats and procedures.
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

TS/SCI

Why QinetiQ Inc.?
Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.
No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",2.9,"QinetiQ North America
2.9","Aberdeen Proving Ground, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
169,NLP Data Engineer,-1,"Job Description:
The Opportunity:


Are you interested in changing the world of work? We’re building a world-class analytics team to apply data science to the soft side of how work gets done. We’re working hard, having fun, and making history; come join us!

Workhuman is seeking a Natural Language Processing (NLP) Data Engineer to join our Workhuman iQ team as a domain expert. This role is responsible for developing infrastructures and platforms for a wide variety of NLP /AI and data analytics products. The person will work with data scientists and engineering teams to build products that uncover insights hidden in recognition moments across dozens of countries for our customers, the industry and our company.

The projects that our team work on are built from the ground up and we look for individuals who want to take ownership and implement solutions independently and thrive in a collaborative environment. Your work will be project-oriented, and you will often be responsible for bringing together the needs of data scientists, engineering team, product managers and other internal customers to provide viable solutions and communicating your thoughts effectively.

This position will report to the NLP Manager.

Main duties & responsibilities:
Work with Engineering and Architect teams to implement data pipeline on AWS (including data collection, data pre-processing, data sampling and validation) for Workhuman data products
Partner and collaborate with Data Scientists to build training pipeline to facilitate the training of large-scale machine learning models for Workhuman AI products
Implement processes to gather usage data generated from Workhuman AI products and build tools to facilitate performance analysis
Develop cloud-based platforms and web apps for launching Workhuman AI and analytics products
Develop tools to facilitate data review and analysis
Required skills and experience:

Bachelor’s (or above) degree in software engineer, computer science, computer engineering, data engineering or other related field
3+ years of industry experience in software development, data engineering, or related field
Experience with and track record of building data pipeline for machine learning product
Strong knowledge of AWS (S3, EC2, GLUE)
Experience with AWS Sagemaker
Good in programming languages such as: Python, Spark, and Java
Good understanding with state-of-art machine learning framework such as: Tensorflow, Pytorch, Pandas, Scikit-learn, Keras, etc.
Knowledge with web app development such as: database, REST API and cloud
Practical knowledge of data processing needs and trade-offs
Comfortable handling a high volume of work daily
Comfortable working in a fast paced, highly collaborative, dynamic work environment
Willingness to support several projects at one time, and to accept reprioritization as necessary
Experience with process design and documentation
Preferred skills:

Exposure to ML, NLP, and deep learning methods
Knowledge with the front-end languages such as: Javascript, HTML, React, or CSS
Experience with developing back end and front end of web applications for data analytics and business intelligence apps
Experience with working with large-scale of text data across languages
Understanding in model inferencing, monitoring, feedback loop and data capture in real time at scale
The Company:


Workhuman® is the world’s fastest-growing integrated Social Recognition® and continuous performance management platform. Our human applications are shaping the future of work by helping organizations connect culture to shared purpose. With a consistent stream of gratitude fueling unparalleled, provocative workplace data and human insights, Workhuman® Cloud is a critical software engine for global companies seeking to motivate and empower their people to do the best work of their lives. Workhuman® (formerly known as Globoforce) was founded in 1999 and is co-headquartered in Framingham, Mass., and Dublin, Ireland.

Did you know:
We are #1 Great Place to Work in Ireland for the 2019 medium-sized workplace category and have been named one of the 2018 Top Places to Work in Massachusetts by the Boston Globe
Workhuman® is used by 4.5 million employees across 160 countries.
Our core values are; Respect, Determination, Innovation and Imagination
Perks & Benefits for our Happy Healthy Humans:
Comprehensive Health Plans
Fully paid parental leave (12-week maternity/4-week paternity) effective day 1
Peer-to-peer recognition program
401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Commuter bus from downtown Boston
On-site fitness center
Wellness rewards and reimbursements
Fully stocked kitchen (cold brew on tap - snacks and coffee machines as far as the eye can see…)
Regular celebrations for employees, families and special guests
At Workhuman, we love what we do because we’re shaping the future of work through our people and our technology. Our human cloud-based applications are helping some of the world’s leading global brands connect culture to shared purpose. The Workhuman Cloud empowers employees to thank, talk and celebrate each other, creating an environment that sparks gratitude and human connection while increasing employee engagement and productivity.

Workhuman is an Equal Opportunity Employer and is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees. We proudly provide a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. Employment decisions at Workhuman are based on solely on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Workhuman believes that diversity and inclusion among our teammates is critical to our success as a global company, and we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.",4.3,"Workhuman
4.3",Florida,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
170,Senior Database Administrator (Active TS/SCI Clearance),$122k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"MetroStar Systems is looking for a Senior Database Administrator that is passionate about leading Database development projects for federal contracts. If you want to join a company that values delivering high-quality products and are open to commuting to Arlington, Va., we want you to work for MetroStar!

Our Defense and Intel. Division is responsible for supporting federal agencies in the Washington, DC area and around the country. Come be a game changer and join our team!

You're a great fit if:
You are passionate about designing, implementing, operating and maintaining database programs and applications
You can evaluate and recommend available database management system products after matching requirements with system capabilities
You are comfortable determining organization, indexing methods and security procedures for specific applications
You'll love our Senior Database Administrator Position if: (This is the stuff you MUST have to be a fit)
You have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, Business or other relevant discipline
You have ten or more years of experience in SQL Server database engineering, design, development, management, installation, integration, evaluation, enhancement, maintenance, testing, or problem diagnosis and resolution
You are proficient in the following MS SQL Server 2016 Database Administration, MS Visio Professional 2013, MS TFS 2015, and MS Office 2013.
You have a working knowledge of MS Project Professional 2013, MS Visual Studio 2015 C#.NET, MS Visual Studio 2015 ASP.NET, ASP.NET MVC 4, JavaScript, JQuery, SP 2016, and Adobe Professional XI
You have a TS/SCI Clearance
You maintain an IAT Level II Certification
We'll REALLY love you if: (This is the bonus stuff that makes you stand out)
You can control the design and use of databases; you can control the global view of databases, the access of databases and assure the safekeeping of the databases (from accidental or intentional damage or loss)
What your day will look like:
You will lead a database administration team in management of highly complex software systems
You will support several tasks concurrently and evaluates problems of workflow, organization, and planning, and develops appropriate corrective actions and prepares and performs presentations at technical interchange meetings and project design reviews
You will conduct code and design reviews of subordinate database administrators and peers.
The Admin Stuff: Applicants selected may be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for potential access to classified information. Accordingly, US Citizenship is required

The Legal Stuff: MetroStar Systems is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. Furthermore, they do not establish a contract for employment and are subject to change at the discretion of MetroStar Systems.",3.7,"MetroStar Systems
3.7","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
171,Software Engineer,-1,"As a Software Engineer, your purpose is to integrate technologies, manage databases, and support the existing solutions in place. The Client can be external or an internal business unit seeking process improvement. Our value to our clients is defined by our ability to identify and communicate continuous improvement initiatives in the pursuit of fulfilling our value proposal. Measurements related to position performance follows the solution project: On Time, On Budget, and effectiveness are all Key Performance Indicators that will assist in defining your success in this position.

A Software Engineer is responsible for developing IT solutions that support the business in a manner that is engineered for maximum uptime and maintenance. Documenting and archiving is vital to managing the ongoing growth.

Software Engineer ensure that the client has the appropriate hardware and required software to use the system after it's installed. They demonstrate the customized system to the client and get client sign-off prior to installing it or providing the client with access to it. After the client attends training, Software Engineer provide initial support to answer specific questions regarding the setup and configuration and gradually transition the client to the help desk for ongoing routine support.

Software Engineer will have an ongoing responsibility to keep the subject matter knowledge current to the latest technology.
Software Engineer Essential Responsibilities*
Participate in the Project Management Tool
Developing and supporting Data Translation Middleware
Developing and supporting Data Warehouse
Developing and Supporting Custom Software Solutions
Responsible for supporting process design workflow, data integrations, and work processes related to all projects
Responsible for pursuing and pushing improvement initiatives that drive additional services and value to the client and/or Rockfarm
Continue knowledge and education around the tools and systems used to deliver the solutions
Regression Testing
Support of our CRM Team as Solutions uplifts and hands off the project
Responsible for supporting the CRM on identifying goals and objectives that are parallel with the client’s corporate initiatives.
KPI Measurement*
· Project Timeline met

· Project with Budget

· Realized value and savings of process improvement

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $58,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
https://www.rockfarm.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/RockfarmSupplyChainSolutions/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,Rockfarm Supply Chain Solutions,"Dubuque, IA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
172,Weapons and Sensors Engineer/Scientist,$45k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented Weapons and Sensors engineer or scientist to join a diverse team to create unique modeling, simulation, and analysis solutions for complex weapon and sensor systems. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

Dynetics' National Intelligence Department is seeking an engineer or scientist with weapon or sensor system experience to support the United States Intelligence Community. The engineer/scientist in this role will analyze and transform intelligence data into software models that further our understanding of foreign threat systems. Following development, the models must then be integrated and maintained in multidisciplinary simulations for use in analyzing the capability of these threat systems within complex environments.

IND3
Basic Qualifications


-Candidate must possess a Bachelor's (or Master's) Degree from an ABET accredited school in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Software Engineering, Math, Physics, Computer Science or an equivalent degree with 3+ years of applicable experience.

-Candidate must have Matlab/Simulink experience.

-Windows programming skills in C/C++, Java, and Python are a plus as is experience with Linux development.

-Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications
The preferred candidate will already possess an active DoD security clearance, or higher, and will be able to possess a Top Secret clearance.
The preferred candidate will also have prior experience (or education) with design, analysis, and/or modeling and simulation of sensor and weapon systems.
RF, EO/IR, dynamics, controls, and signal and image processing experience is particularly desirable.
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Top Secret/SSBI Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Final Top Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.01.14-11

Closing Date:
10/30/2020

#CJ",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
173,"Principal Software Engineer, Offensive Security & Vulnerability Detection - Secureworks - Austin, TX; Columbia, MD; Atlanta, GA; Raleigh, NC or Remote U.S.",-1,"Location: Austin, TX; Columbia, MD; Atlanta, GA; Raleigh, NC or 100% U.S. Remote

Secureworks® (NASDAQ: SCWX) a global cybersecurity leader, enables our customers and partners to outpace and outmaneuver adversaries with more precision, so they can rapidly adapt and respond to market forces to meet their business needs. With a unique combination of cloud-native, SaaS security platform and intelligence-driven security solutions, informed by 20+ years of threat intelligence and research, no other security platform is grounded and informed with this much real-world experience. www.secureworks.com

We enjoy competitive compensation and benefits packages, and reward and recognize our employees for exceptional results. A constant focus on continued learning and growth keeps our team members engaged and excited about “what’s next.” We offer flexible work options when available, and emphasize the importance of work-life balance. We know that when our people are rewarded, recognized, and rejuvenated, we win as a team.

Role Overview

In this exciting and new role, you will work on the next generation of Secureworks’ security platform. You’ll join a very seasoned team of software engineers/developers, security experts, and data scientists, and collaborate with stakeholders across security and technology groups to drive innovation. You will focus primarily on developing and improving the vulnerability detection and exploitation capabilities of our Dynamic Application Security Testing (DAST) product, encompassing both white box and black box scanning.

The ideal candidate will have a strong software development background with an emphasis on building security oriented tools, as well as detection rules for various scanning solutions. This role requires a software developer that can take ideas from concept to reality and work well within an entrepreneurial and collaborative environment. This role also requires knowledge in vulnerability scanning, exploitation and remediation.

Responsibilities
Develop an automated vulnerability scanning system focused on orchestration and detection.
Collect, create, and/or learn about new vulnerabilities and develop methods to detect, test, and potentially exploit those vulnerabilities.
Serve as an offensive security expert with development skills embedded within a product development team focused on rapidly fielding new methods and techniques.
Generate ideas for new platform capabilities and spearhead the development necessary to bring them to fruition.
Constantly raise the bar of engineering/development practices across the team.
Work effectively on a geographically distributed team to deliver high quality software against aggressive schedules.
Requirements
Minimum of 5 years of relevant software development experience with Python or Golang.
Minimum of 3 years experience developing and improving vulnerability detection, exploitation, or application security testing products or platforms.
Experience developing a service-oriented or microservice architecture.
Preferred Qualifications
BS in Computer Science, related technical field, or equivalent experience.
Experience developing with containers and orchestrators (e.g. Docker, Kubernetes, Mesos).
Prior experience developing software in an entrepreneurial environment.
Demonstrable open source contributions.
Experience with Amazon AWS, Google GCP, or similar cloud providers.
Secureworks (A Dell Technologies Company) is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all employees and to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at Secureworks are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex (including pregnancy), age, physical, mental or sensory disability, HIV status, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Secureworks will not tolerate discrimination or harassment based on any of these characteristics. Learn more about Diversity and Inclusion at Secureworks here.",3.8,"Secureworks
3.8",Georgia,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
174,Data Engineer,-1,"The Data Engineer


COLLABORATE | OPTIMIZE | EVOLVE

As a Data Engineer at A Cloud Guru, you will ensure the data platform infrastructure and architecture supports the evolving requirements of the Data Engineering and Data Analytics teams as well as other parts of our business! You will work closely with the Director of Data Engineering to develop a strategy for our long term Data Platform architecture to identify gaps in the data processes and drive improvements while mentoring and coaching other team members. Thanks to your contributions, our data platform will continue to optimize and revolutionize. This role reports to the Director, Data Engineering.

Hello, we're A Cloud Guru


Our friends call us ACG.

We're on a mission to teach the WORLD to cloud. A Cloud Guru is the largest online cloud school on the planet. Our training feels more like logging into Netflix or Spotify - it's entertaining and playful. The people are the #1 reason employees say they stay at ACG. We're a quirky, tight-knit crew that cares about our customers and each other. No egos here. Our leaders encourage thoughtfulness, compassion, being humble, and we have a bit of fun along the way.

It's an exciting time to join the team, because we're in a really unique space. We have an amazing product that people want, and we're in an industry that's tripling in size overnight.

What makes the Product & Engineering team awesome...


Learning to cloud means unlocking a world of possibilities for our students. Using the latest tech, we design the tools to teach people cloud faster and better. The team is talented (and a little quirky), and we're all in it together.
Cutting edge tech. We've built a cloud-first Serverless Architecture with tools like Lambda, API Gateway, GraphQL, and ReactJS
Founded by engineers. Having a CEO that is also an engineer is nice, because he knows the effort it takes to make things awesome.
We're friendly. We're down-to-earth and collaborative. There's no high-performing jerks, there's no heroes, there's just great teams.
We're hungry, and humble. We are dedicated to learning all the things to create the best product possible.
If you're down to earth and enjoy a laugh while also working hard you'll love it here. - Joanna, Avocado to Guac Ratio Guru (and Product Manager)

As a Data Engineer at ACG, you'll get to:
Be an essential part of designing and building ACG's new data platform, as we evolve the existing databases into a cutting-edge solution to meet the needs of our 2021 data plans and beyond
Explore and contribute to discussions around technologies under consideration, such as Snowflake, Kappa/Lambda architecture, Delta Lakes and Data Vault
Develop, test and maintain existing architecture, including databases, data pipelines and large-scale processing systems
Collaborate with the Analytics team on transformation processes to populate data models
Recommend ways to improve data reliability, efficiency and quality of the data platform and optimise for performance, scalability and cost
Discover opportunities for data acquisition and explore new ways of using existing data
Identify gaps in data processes and drive improvements
Coach and mentor other team members
What you bring to the table


We focus on hiring values aligned people, because we believe the right person can learn all the things to be successful in their role. Self-confidence plays a big part in what you apply for. We encourage all job applicants to apply even if they are nervous to do so. College degrees aren't required for any roles, and career gaps or switches are totally welcome.

Essential
2+ years of Data Engineering, Data Warehousing, or related experience
2+ years of development experience with Python or similar scripting language
2+ years of SQL experience, including experience with schema design and dimensional data modelling
Experience working with AWS services such as DynamoDB, Glue, Lambda, Step Functions, S3, CloudFormation or Redshift
Experience with ETL development, metadata management, and data quality
Desirable
Knowledge of software engineering best practices with experience with implementing CI/CD, monitoring & alerting for production systems
Experience with complex data structures and No-SQL databases
Experience with open source orchestration platforms (e.g. Airflow)
We want the people who care about doing a good job. The ones who have the humility and hunger to learn. - Sam Kroonenburg, Co-Founder and CEO

More than a job


Where you work isn't just a career decision -- it's a life decision. We get it. That's why we want all of our Gurus to feel a sense of belonging that comes from feeling supported in all areas of their lives. Everyone has family, friends and interests outside of their careers, so we offer perks and benefits to make work, work better for you.
4 weeks PTO, plus 10 sick days, and holidays. Whether it's hiking to a waterfall in Costa Rica or bonding with your couch, we all need downtime. All Gurus get four weeks paid time off, 10 sick days, and enough holiday to make a banker blush.
Let's get lunch. Lunches are catered three times per week, and our kitchen stays stocked with a smorgasbord of the team's most requested snacks and drinks.
Parking is on us. We have your Downtown parking covered. We offer paid garage parking nearby the office. We also have perks for going green by walking and taking public transit.
We've got you covered. We offer insurance plans that pay for 100% of your medical, dental, and vision, and 80% for your family/dependents.
Gender-neutral paid parental leave. Expanding your family? We offer 12 weeks of gender-neutral paid parental leave, and reimburse up to $10,000 for eligible adoption expenses.
$1,000 continuing education budget. All Gurus get $250 a quarter to spend on personal development, and 2 hours each week reserved for learning something new.
Remote where?


The A Cloud Guru team has grown a lot since it was just two brothers with a dream of teaching the world to cloud! We now employ gurus in 30 states of the USA as well as in Australia and the UK. For the time being that's as far as we can go. We won't bore you with the details, but setting up the extra operations we would need to employ people in new states or countries is a little bit more expensive than replicating your database in another AZ, if you know what we mean. So as much as we would love to have staff in as many countries as we have students, we are only opening this role to applicants in areas we currently have operations.

If you're not sure if your US state is included, please still apply! We will let you know if you are in a state that we currently don't have operations. If anything changes we will reach back out.

What's the interview process like at ACG?


Applying for a job can feel intimidating and like a full-time job of its own. You shouldn't have to burn through a week of sick time or all your best out-of-office excuses just to put feelers out for a new career opportunity. We want to be as transparent about the process as possible to help ease your mind. It's our goal to provide you a fair, efficient interviewing experience that respects you and your time and to do it all with a sidecar of delight.

Once you submit an application, we'll review it. If you're a good fit, you'll have an initial chat with a recruiter over the phone. A phone interview with a manager typically follows. Depending on your role, you might then be asked to do a little homework (but nothing too time consuming). Then we'll schedule a Zoom call to meet other members of the team, answer any questions you have, and give you a feel for what it's really like to work at ACG. If you're on the fence, just give it a try.

Keep being awesome, Cloud Gurus.",4.6,"A Cloud Guru
4.6","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
175,.NET Software Engineer - Remote or On-Site,$42k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

Supply chain system processes over 1B transactions per year for a face value of over $6B. If you want to be part of a team building highly scalable distributed systems using SaaS and Azure technologies then you want to join our team. If the challenge of solving complex problems based on concurrency, timing and high-speed processing appeals to you, then you want to join our team. If you have experience building software using a service bus and a distributed microservices architecture, then you want to join our team. We take pride in building the best systems, being leaders in our business, and having fun while knocking that out. We are looking for team members who feel the same. Does this sound like you?

Under general supervision of the Software Engineering Manager, the Supply Chain Software Engineer is a full-stack engineer who performs work assignments in one or more of the following areas: collaborating with team members to modify solutions; participating in project planning and requirements definition; system/application design, system/application development, unit testing, support during QA and User Acceptance Testing, implementation and integration; customer support for and technical expertise in end-user decision support software tools and end-user computing technology; conducting all activities in accordance with standards and procedures.

Primary Accountabilities:

Technical (75%)
Design, develop, test, deploy and support new software solutions and changes to existing software solutions
Collaborate with team members and provide thoughtful discussion on tactics and strategies as they are selected
Translate Business Requirements into components of complex, loosely-coupled, distributed systems
Maintain awareness and familiarity with evolving trends in software development
Operational (25%)
Troubleshoot technical issues in a variety of application environments. This includes being able to research issues related to system configuration, software and database systems, and problems related to data integrity or conformity.
Maintain a focus on uptime and performance for high-volume solutions, hosted solutions
Required Qualifications:
4 or more years work related experience and B.S. in computer science or information systems
2 or more years of experience in enterprise application development in the .NET environment
2 or more years of experience with database development and tuning in the MS SQL Server platform specifically: T-SQL, stored procedures, data warehousing
Strong understanding of object orientation and familiarity with modern design patterns
Strong working knowledge of ASP.NET (WebApi, MVC, Xamarin), C#, HTML, JavaScript, CSS
Strong experience with ORMs (Entity Framework, NHibernate)
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiar with Service Orientation/RESTful Patterns and Concepts/API Design Fundamentals
Familiar with Dependency Injection and unit testing (Unity or Ninject)
Familiar with JavaScript best practices and design patterns (including supersets like TypeScript)
Familiar with JavaScript frameworks like Knockout, AngularJS, Bootstrap, jQuery/jQueryUI, Modernizer, VueJS, etc.
Familiar with source control systems and tools, including Git, TFS, Microsoft Visual Studio, Azure DevOps
Familiar with data persistence solutions other than RDBMS (Key/Value Stores, Document Databases, BLOB/Object Storage)
Familiar with distributed system design and service bus messaging/queueing systems
Familiar with caching techniques (eviction, patterns like cache-aside, aspect-injection, tools/vendor selection)
Familiar with mobile development for Android and iOS
Familiar with CI/CD build/deploy technology
Familiar with DevOps practices particularly in Azure services
Ability to troubleshoot environment/hosting-related issues with cloud-based platform services or on-premise web technology (DNS, LoadBalancing, IIS, Windows Server, SSL, Security Contexts, basic firewall and networking concepts)
Individual Competencies:
Integrity:Gains the trust of others by taking responsibility for own actions and telling the truth.
Teamwork:Builds relationships and works cooperatively with others, inside and outside the organization, to accomplish objectives to build and maintain mutually-beneficial partnerships, leverage information and achieve results.
Adaptable: Responds to change with a willingness to learn new ways to accomplish work objectives with a positive attitude.
Innovative: Ability to develop, sponsor, or support the introduction of new and improved methods, products, procedures or technologies.
Curious: A desire to inquire and learn, to seek new knowledge and wisdom, and to listen to the contributions of others with a genuine interest to better self, the team, and the organization.
Analytical and Critical Thinking: Ability to tackle a problem by using a logical, systematic, sequential approach.
Problem Solving: Gathers and analyzes information to generate and evaluate potential solutions to problems, issues and challenges while weighing the accuracy and relevance of the facts, data and information.


The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the major job responsibilities (essential functions) of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the major job responsibilities. This job description is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, or qualifications associated with the job.

While performing the duties of this job, the associate is:
Regularly required to use hands to finger, handle or feel objects, tools or controls, and reach with hands or arms.
Regularly required to talk or hear and read instructions on a computer monitor and/or printed on paper.
Occasionally required to stand, kneel or stoop, and lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.
Frequently required to view items at an extremely close range and must be able to adjust and readjust focus.
Occasionally: Job requires this activity up to 33% of the time

Frequently: Job requires this activity between 33% - 66% of the time

Regularly: Job requires this activity more than 66% of the time

Safety:
Support a safe work environment by following safety rules and regulations and reporting all safety hazards.


As an Inmar Associate, you:
Put clients first and consistently display a positive attitude and behaviors that demonstrate an awareness and willingness to listen and respond to clients in order to meet their short-term and long-term needs, requirements and exceed their expectations.
Treat clients and teammates with courtesy, consideration and tact; you also have the ability to perceive the needs of internal and external clients and communicate effectively with the objective of delighting and retaining the client.
Build collaborative relationships and work cooperatively with others, inside and outside the organization, to accomplish objectives, develop and maintain mutually-beneficial partnerships, leverage information and achieve results.
Set and attain achievable, yet aggressive, goals with a sense of urgency and accountability.
Understand that results are important and focus on turning mission into action to achieve results following the principles of Flawless Execution while consistently complying with quality, service and productivity standards to meet deadlines and exceed expectations by giving our clients the best possible outcome.",3.3,"Inmar
3.3","Winston-Salem, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
176,Jr. Real-time Embedded Software Engineer,$58k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"LogiCore Corporation is currently seeking a full-time Jr. REALTIME EMBEDDED SOFTWARE ENGINEER in Huntsville, AL to be part of an exciting, diverse, and dynamic team!

Are you a Real Time Embedded Software Engineer who is looking to join a mission-focused environment? The candidate for this position will provide Army Aviation Software Airworthiness support for the UH-60 Blackhawk aircraft. Candidate will be performing software airworthiness assessments of system specifications, software requirements, system architecture design, and testing activities. The candidate should be self-motivated. Willingness to work and learn in a fast-paced environment as part of a dynamic and growing team. If so, we have an amazing opportunity to join an industry leading team with opportunity for growth and expansion!

Responsibilities:
Perform software airworthiness evaluations of the Army's UH-60 aviation systems.
Provide independent assessments through review, analysis and evaluation of the prime contractor’s software development artifacts to ensure software products conform to design standards.
Evaluate software requirements for completeness, correctness, consistency, accuracy, and readability and testability.
Assess software source code, code generation processes, models, and build procedures for compliance with software safety requirements and qualification standards.
Evaluate aviation systems and components technical reports, Software Safety Assessments, Hazard Analysis, Safety Assessment Reports, and Technical and Operator’s Manuals.
Candidate will participate as a member of Integrated Product Teams, Program Milestone reviews (Program Planning Reviews, Software Requirements Reviews, Preliminary Design Reviews, Critical Design Reviews, and Software Test Readiness Reviews), and witness Software Formal Qualification Testing

Job Requirements

Required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Demonstrate a working knowledge of the Embedded Systems.
Demonstrate a working knowledge of programming languages such as C, C++, C# JAVA, or Ada.
Strong written, verbal and interpersonal communication skills with ability to interact well in diverse team environments.
Experience with Army Aviation systems, processes and data.
Real Time Operating Systems (RTOS) experience (VxWorks, Integrity, LynxOS, or DDI/DEOS).
Experience with software development lifecycle processes IEEE 12207 or MIL-STD-498.
Working knowledge of Model Based Development (SCADE, Matlab, Simulink, or Rhapsody).
Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college/university in Computer Engineering, Computer Science or software related engineering technical field is required. 5 years of related experience is required. Successful candidate must possess or be able to obtain and maintain a security clearance.

Company Overview

LogiCore Corporation is a woman-owned small business based in Huntsville, AL. We deliver services and solutions that optimize efficiencies in product form, fit, reliability, safety, and supportability to maximize Warfighter readiness. LogiCore provides a rewarding work atmosphere built on outstanding customer service, consistent with our core values: Integrity, Teamwork, Selfless Service, Competence, Loyalty, Excellence, Accountability, and Responsiveness.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. LogiCore offers compensation packages that reflect the importance of the services we provide to our customers. Employment benefits include:
Competitive Compensation
Performance and Innovation Incentives
Health, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Telemedicine
Paid Leave
Retirement Plan
Flex Spending Account
Paid Life Insurance
Professional development assistance
LogiCore Corporation is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, veteran status, genetic information, or disability. LogiCore is a committed EOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled employer.

LogiCore – Readiness Accelerated!",3.4,"LogiCore
3.4","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
177,Security Operation Center (SOC) Engineer,-1,"Position: Security Operation Center (SOC) Engineer *
JOB SCOPE*
SOC Engineer serve as subject matter experts to security threats, alerts, and incidents, as part of Spectrotel 24/7 SOC team. Our SOC Engineers are responsible for tuning security alerts detected by FortiSIEM, FortiEDR, and DarkTrace NDR, and analyzing all available data to determine if a cyber-attack is occurring, scoping the extent of a suspected attack, coordinating efforts to contain attacks, performing forensic investigations to determine the details around threats and attacks, and providing guidance on remediation actions.
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES *
• Analytics and Cyber Threat Analysis
• Continuous & persistent monitoring of security technologies/tool data and network traffic which result in security alerts generated, parsed, triggered, or observed on the in-scope managed networks, enclaves, systems or security technologies;

• Correlation and trend analysis of security logs, network traffic, security alerts, events and incidents;

• Continuously works to tune security tools to minimize false positives and maximize detection and prevention effectiveness. Collaborates with the owners of cyber defense tools to tune systems for optimum performance;

• Analyzes malware and attacker tactics to improve network detection capabilities. Collaborates with external companies or government agencies to share open source or classified intelligence;

• Distributes use case context, vulnerability and threat advisories as relevant to optimize security tools, SIEM and client awareness;

• Incident categorization and severity assignment consistent with client criteria;

• Event and incident handling consistent with applicable client plans and processes;

• Integration of activities with standard reports, such as shift reports, along with client communication protocols;

• Documents and provided feedback to engineers for custom views, channels, and other content for Incident Response, Insider Threat Management (ITM), and other threat detection use cases into disparate enclaves in the customer environment;

• Support calculation of security metrics related to Managed SOC Services offering;

• Drive SIEM content development, tuning, and review.
REQUIREDSKILLS: *
• Prior experience working in any of the following three: Security Operations Center (SOC)

Network Operations Center (NOC), Computer Incident Response Team (CIRT)

• Experience in the detection, response, mitigation, and/or reporting of cyber threats affecting client networks

• Experience in computer intrusion analysis and incident response

• Working knowledge of Intrusion detection/protection systems

• Knowledge and understanding of network devices, multiple operating systems, and secure architectures

• Ability code in one or more general purpose languages

• Strong understanding of various Linux OS’s (Centos, Ubuntu, Debian, etc)

• Understanding of various virtualization platforms VMware, HyperV, and VirtualBox

• Working knowledge of network protocols and common services

• Current experience with network intrusion detection and response operations (Protect, Defend, Respond and Sustain methodology)

• Experience responding to and resolving situations caused by network attacks

• Ability to assess information of network threats such as scans, computer viruses or complex attacks

• Working knowledge of WAN/LAN concepts and technologies

• SIEM content Analysis, Development and Testing

• 6 months recent experience (within the last 2 years) with Fortinet

• Familiarity with packet analysis to include: HTTP Headers & Status codes, SMTP Traffic &

Status codes, FTP Traffic & Status Codes

• Excellent written and verbal communication skills;

• Personality traits: Naturally curious and inquisitive nature; persistent and determined; loves solving problems and puzzles; analytically rigorous; uncompromising integrity.

• Penetration testing with Metasploit/Burp Suite/Hydra
EXPERIENCE *
• *5+ years of related* work experience with a Bachelor's degree; or 4 years with Master's degree

• FortiSIEM, FortiEDR, and Dark Trace NDR

• Familiar knowledge of Process and IT service management concepts such as ITIL and ITSM

• Familiarity with digital forensic techniques and recoveries
Education / Certification /Training *
Minimum

• Bachelor's Degree in Management Information Systems, Computer Science is preferred.

Desired

• Master's degree in Computer Security, Cybersecurity, etc.

• Certifications related to security (such as Security+, GSEC, GCIH, GCIA, CISSP, NCSF, etc.)

• Certifications in Fortinet

Spectrotel is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status, or any other legally recognized protected basis under federal, state, or local laws, regulations or ordinances.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
The company has taken every precaution to create a safe and secure environment for our team members including wearing masks, hand sanitizers, installing glass partitions between workstations and socially distancing.

Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
Spectrotel.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"Spectrotel Inc.
3.6","Neptune City, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
178,Senior Software Localization Engineer - Mapping & Localization,$50k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Role:

We are seeking a Senior Mapping & Localization Software Engineer to develop software that enables map-based autonomous driving.
As part of the mapping and localization team, you will be able to design, implement, and improve algorithms used to create and manage map data as well as algorithms used to localize a vehicle within the map in real time.
Analyze & Improve the current localization algorithms, ensuring our self-driving vehicles have the best localization accuracy to drive safely and smoothly on the road.
Research the state-of-the-art localization algorithms and apply excellent algorithm design & programming skills to our self-driving software.
Prototype and deploy robust and reliable solutions to cutting-edge localization problems.
Collaborate closely with a creative team of engineers and researchers.
Gain a deep understanding of not only the self-driving technology, but also its real-world challenges and how to convert such technology into real products.
Improve how our vehicles act and react in complex and nuanced situations
Competencies:
B.S. or a higher degree in Robotics, Computer, or Electrical Engineering, Mathematics or related technical field
2+ years relevant work experience in robotics, aerospace or automotive systems engineering, specifically in mapping & localization domain
6+ years total relevant work experience.
Strong algorithm and C++ programming skills
Strong experience with Linux
Experience with ROS (Robot Operating System) is a plus
Ability to troubleshoot software, optimize code, and perform unit testing
Ability to implement algorithms efficiently and in a well-organized software architecture
Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:
Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees
Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance
401K plan with employer matching
Annual learning and development stipend
Leadership development training
Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment
Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
179,Software Engineer - Quality Assurance,-1,"Quality assurance and testing engineering of modules and solutions to be deployed from and integrated with Real Time Value Network and Intelligent Control Tower to manage and control execution across functions.

Roles and Responsibilities:

Analyze data processing and business, user requirements, procedures and environment to develop and implement testing and certification of modules and SaaS solutions from code deployment to testing to user production environment using Test Automation and SPRINT Planning tools. Test data preparation for various applications for customer platforms and on Real Time Value Network using SQL, JAVA, Oracle, Linux, Jasper and Crystal Reports, Perforce, Quality Centre, JIRA and SPIRA, Agent Ransack, EDI, Rest API testing, Soap UI, Postman, Load Runner, Selenium, and Shell Scripting.

Years of Experience: 2

Education:

Bachelors of Science degree or equivalent

Experience and Skills:

Requires two years’ experience in test engineering and quality assurance deploying modules for Real Time Value Network and testing, maintaining and improving existing test cases using test management tools, Rest API testing, Soap UI, Postman, Load Runner, Selenium, SPIRA, Agent Ransack, and Shell Scripting.",4.5,"Herdt Consulting Inc
4.5","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
180,"Artificial Intelligence - Semantics Engineer, Lead",$132k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

Use Artificial Intelligence to solve problems for a safer world! At MITRE we work across the whole of government on big problems that challenge our nation’s stability. We use our strengths to build coalitions of collaboration that strengthen government and create positive change for citizens. You can be a part of this! Our work programs need technical leaders who have a passion for applying AI to solve hard problems.
MITRE’s Artificial Intelligence and Autonomous Systems Department is seeking top individuals with a passion for artificial intelligence, experience and proficiency with ontology and information semantics, as well as one or more of the following technical areas: knowledge-based reasoning, cognitive science, multi-agent systems, automated planning, and machine learning.

Our ideal candidate is experienced in developing solutions for the representation, management, exchange, and exploitation of meaningful data, by using information semantics, ontological engineering, reasoning and inference, text mining, and data mining. Requirements include proficiency with ontology design and development, extensive experience with knowledge-management systems and applications using ontologies, and familiarity with implementations conformant to established standards (including W3C Recommendations) for ontology and information semantics. Additionally, they have solid experience in other AI capabilities.

At MITRE, you will have the opportunity to work on a wide range of challenges while leading and/or working with interdisciplinary teams to design, develop, and field AI solutions that improve the effectiveness of our sponsors’ programs. You will have opportunities to shape the technical and programmatic direction of programs by analyzing existing and anticipated problems and evaluating potential solutions. Your experience will allow you to assess the adequacy and maturity of current research programs, influence research directions, and identify emerging areas where research and development are needed to strengthen the nation’s growing AI capabilities.

Day-to-day responsibilities:

• Lead and/or contribute to the design, development, and/or implementation of technical solutions requiring knowledge representation, ontology engineering, knowledge management, Semantic Web technologies, and related technical disciplines.
• Analyze, evaluate, and present Information Semantics and other AI solutions applied to sponsor requirements and needs.
• Understand and maintain up-to-date knowledge of advances in Information Semantics and other AI capabilities in industry and academia.
• Develop, propose, and execute original research in the field of Information Semantics.
• Develop and propose new research directions in Information Semantics and other AI-enabled solutions in support of MITRE’s internal research program and sponsors’ research programs.

Basic Qualifications:
• Bachelor’s degree in Information Semantics (or related filed) in one or more of the following fields: Computational Linguistics; Computer Science/AI with concentrations in Knowledge Representation, Semantics, and/or Automated Reasoning; Philosophy of Language, Formal Logic, or Formal Ontology, with practical applications.
• 8 + years of experience with defining, developing, and deploying solutions in Information Semantics and other AI capabilities.
• Must be a US citizen able to obtain and maintain a US government clearance.

Required Qualifications:
• Ability to articulate challenges specific to Information Semantics, identify gaps in knowledge representation and implementation, discuss the critical issues, and develop and evaluate practical solutions.
• Documented success creating enterprise strategies for organizations using ontology-related technologies and knowledge/logic-based applications.
• Hands on information technology program/project management and software development experience related to building ontologies and knowledge representation systems and applications that use ontologies
• Experience with knowledge representation languages such as OWL and programming languages such as, Java and Python.
• Experience in related AI-relevant fields, such as natural language processing, text and data mining, data and object modeling, enterprise modeling, and automated reasoning.
• Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal).
• Ability to work both independently and with a team.
• Ability to develop and foster relationships with MITRE sponsors (clients).
• Familiarity with the state-of-the-art in the field.
• Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, and systems.

Preferred Qualifications:
• Master’s or PhD degree in artificial intelligence or related discipline w/ experience in defining, developing, and deploying AI solutions
• Experience in a cybersecurity domain.
• Preference given to qualified candidates with active DoD Secret clearance.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
181,Data Engineer,-1,"At Phantom AI, experience the fast paced environment and help the development of the next generation of autonomous vehicles. We are seeking a Data Engineer to help our visionary team through building a robust pipeline and handling terabytes of data.
You will be designing and implementing full-stack solutions for computing, storing, and presenting evaluation metrics using data gathered from vehicles. This will be a unique opportunity to both improve and implement a scalable pipeline that will be the backbone of the company.

Responsibilities
· Design, improve, and manage datasets
· Support technical design and implementation of demand planning automation projects that use these datasets
· Monitor and enforce data quality standards
· Hands-on coding, able to implement what was designed
· Familiar with architecting and designing tools, and self-motivated for documentation
· Optimize pipeline performance to reduce data lag and refresh time

Requirements
· 3+ years of experience working in data architecture or a related field
· 3+ years of Python Experience
· Web framework experience
· Experience building and optimizing data sets
· Deep understanding of data architecture best practices such as normalizing data structures, minimizing logic complexity, defining intuitive and consistent semantic layers, and eliminating redundancy
· Self-motivated and strong work ethic for continuous development with a strong sense of ownership

Preferred Skills
· Master’s degree in Computer Science or Data Science or work equivalent experience
· Experience with ROS
· Web development experience
· Hands-on experience in dev-ops best practices and implementations
· Demonstrated industry efficiency in the fields of database, data warehousing or data sciences",5.0,"Phantom AI
5.0","Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Build & Release Engineer,$53k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:
The Build & Release Engineer manages, documents and enhances product implementations. This position is responsible for overseeing and ensuring timely software releases for Graton, and manages the change management process. In addition, the Build & Release Engineer will be responsible for packaging and delivering applications to QA production. This position will be responsible for structuring source code repositories for easy setup, retrieval, and development of configuration files and source code. The Build & Release Engineer will be responsible for all facets of software configuration management and will maintain Graton's QA lab hardware.

Essential Functions:
Responsible for practicing, supporting and promoting Graton Resort & Casino's Company-wide culture and demonstrating Graton Resort & Casino's Service Standards at all times.
Implement release schedules in accordance to policies and procedures.
Implement change control policies and chair weekly change approval boards.
Work cross functionally with engineering, project management, QA, and business teams to maintain and communicate a clear release schedule to ensure successful deployments.
Develop configuration management plans and audit hardware and application change procedures to verify compliance in accordance with Graton Gaming regulations.
Manage the technical design, engineering, and deployment of applications and hardware to QA and production.
Own the source control system, third-party repositories, build systems, and release data systems.
Develop and implement hardware and software version control processes, policies and procedures.
Perform other functions as assigned.",3.7,"Graton Resort & Casino
3.7","Rohnert Park, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Gambling,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
183,Analytics Engineer (Data Governance),-1,"InfoTrust is seeking an Analytics Engineer to join our Customer Data Governance team. This is an amazing opportunity to join a team that is on the foundational level of building the future of digital analytics and how it can affect some of the largest brands in the world!

Are you looking for:
Technical challenge?
A way to come in and problem solve everyday?
Be part of new team and help grow our business to lengths we haven't even dreamed of yet?
A role that flexes your experience with Javascript and love for automation?
A collaborative team environment?
A flexible work environment that embraces diversity, innovation, ownership, and growth?
A role that enables you to interact with some of the biggest brands in the world and delight both internal and external teams on a daily basis?
THEN, this might be the right role for YOU!

About InfoTrust:

Our company was started with one principle we are going to provide the best workplace for the best people and as long as we keep our eyes on this #1 goal, all other things will fall into place. This strategy has been extremely successful and we are thrilled to be #1 Employer in Ohio, #1 for Cincinnati, and ranked on national lists such as Ad Age's Best Places to Work and Inc. 5000 Fastest Growing Companies (4 years strong).

The role:

The Customer Data Governance department is bridging the gap between our amazing delivery team and our product team. By becoming subject matter experts in our proprietary technology, Tag Inspector, and leveraging the expertise we have in house on Data Governance, Google Marketing Platform, visualizations tools, privacy and compliance, and much, much, more in the digital analytics space. The goal of the Analytics Engineer is to delight both internal and external stakeholders by showing the value in the big picture of governance, ensuring data is consistent, trustworthy and used correctly.

The responsibilities of the Analytics Engineer include:

Delight potential Clients by:
Demoing Tag Inspector
Showcasing Tag Inspector capabilities to larger growth opportunities including performance, PII identification and Governance (Audit, Policy Creation and Ongoing Monitoring)
Regularly identifying ways to utilize Tag Inspector data to improve data collection and optimize the organization's governance strategy.
Delight new or existing Clients by:
Using various technologies (node.js, Google Apps Script, Google Cloud, etc.) to leverage the Tag Inspector API to automate the creation of deliverables
Providing support to Tag Inspector client in lower license tiers (Self Service Tier)
Providing support to Governance Clients
Understanding Client challenges and sharing it with both the Customer Data Governance and Tag Inspector teams to help solve and think about growth opportunities
Linking current solutions provided to other possible solutions that we offer (including Tag Management)
Delight our own teams by being able to automate manual processes
Delight our own teams by being able to automate work associated with Tag Management
Due to the responsibilities listed above, it is important that the person joining our team is excited to solve problems in technology. So someone that is equal parts technological, and equal parts business-acumen. Is this you?

Background and skills we are looking for in an Analytics Engineer:
Working knowledge of JavaScript and Project Architecture
Specific experience with Node.js and TypeScript, preferred, but not required
Understanding of (or a willingness to learn) Tag Management tools like Google Tag Manager
3+ years of experience, preferably in a client-facing role
You enjoy working with data, and may even consider yourself ""data-driven""
Strong empathy and often use your strong communication and presentation skills to convey a message and secure buy-in, explain a technical complexity or deep dive into a client a hurdle
Adaptability and ability to take ownership
Seeking knowledge and understanding of complex technical concepts
Located in Ohio
An alignment between your personal core values and InfoTrust's; Ownership, Diversity, Respect, Impact, Growth, Innovation
More about InfoTrust:

Other than an awesome culture, we also offer: Free Health, Dental and Vision Insurance (seriously), Unlimited PTO, Flexible Work Schedule, a generous Parental Leave policy, 401K with match, Tuition Reimbursement, Gym reimbursement and much, much more.

InfoTrust is committed to a diverse workforce and we are an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate applicants regardless of an individual's age, race, color, gender, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, disability, or veteran status.",5.0,"InfoTrust
5.0","Cincinnati, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
184,Data Engineer,-1,"The Role:

As the Data Engineer, you will be part of making insights accessible and timely by working closely with our data modelers to populate our data warehouse. In your daily work, you'll be responsible for working with another data engineer in optimizing data sourcing and transformation that create an efficient, effective data organization. You will focus on executing the data warehouse strategy to ensure resiliency, fault tolerance, and scalability, while also establishing best practices. You will also take a hands-on approach to collaborating with analysts and business intelligence to optimize the sourcing and consistency of KPIs, which will ultimately drive informed business decisions across the organization.

Why You'll Love This Role:

This is a rare opportunity to make an impact on how Newsela thinks about data during a critical time in the company's evolution. You will work closely with the Manager of Data Warehouse and other key stakeholders to optimize the most critical enterprise-wide KPIs that drive business growth and engagement. Using cutting-edge cloud technology, your work will combine deep analytics with analysis of user behavior, and will serve as the backbone of business intelligence and decision-making for Sales, Marketing, Product, and Customer Success. These insights will also be leveraged for C-level and Board reporting across Newsela. You will be joining a growing team of Data experts, and will help build the foundation for a product that's helping transform K-12 education.

Why We'll Love You:

You have 4+ years of demonstrated success in sourcing, transforming, and optimizing data from divergent sources. No management experience necessary but a passion for mentoring and learning leadership qualities is desirable. You are an expert in creating an ETL/ELT foundation leveraging best practices for continuous improvement, in addition to possessing expert SQL, DDL, and DML knowledge. You are highly skilled in scheduling, dependency management, and optimization. You are highly advanced with Python or other scripting languages in order to help data analysts and data scientists, among other partners, optimize data models. You will have an acute understanding of data warehouse modeling techniques and some experience using cloud-based data warehouse technologies. Through your work in data engineering, you have expanded and improved either the data warehouse set, utilization, and/or business performance. You do all this, while also contributing to an engaging data team culture

About Newsela:

One of the fastest growing tech companies in K-12 education, Newsela was founded on the principle that while every child learns differently, they all deserve a rich learning experience that ignites a love of learning. We built our platform based on learning science research to deliver the most engaging, authentic content to modernize how teaching happens in the classroom. Along with interactive assessments and tools, we provide teachers with digital content at five reading levels -- from +100 of the best sources -- that is relevant to the diverse backgrounds and interests of their students. Since we started in 2013, we've established a presence in 90% of U.S. K-12 schools and over 2.5M teachers and 37M students have registered with Newsela.",4.0,"Newsela
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Continious Improvement Project Engineer,$56k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The CI Engineer will assist the execution of the business strategic planning that includes all improvement projects and continuous improvement initiatives related to the assigned manufacturing department. The engineer will identify and resolve issues in order to allow the assigned manufacturing department to achieve the strategic objectives related to Safety, Quality/Compliance, Supply Assurance (i.e. capacity, yield, fulfillment), and Value.

The engineer will own the detailed planning and execution of all assigned projects and continuous improvement initiatives related to the department and will also be accountable for their success assuring compliance with safety, quality, cost and delivery. The incumbent will recommend projects and initiatives that are in strategic alignment with site goals, manage risks & changes, and deliver projects/initiatives successfully.

In addition, the CI Engineer will provide visibility and monitoring capabilities to the process operations at the manufacturing floor for easy identification of:

process capacity constrains (bottlenecks)
cycle time traps (process that insert delays),
to promote fast reaction to foreseen issues,
provide means to identify and manage priority conflicts
promote team accountability,
drive lead time reduction and continuous improvement

Responsibilities:

Support the development and continuous update of the value stream map
develop time study for micro-steps, analyzing best use of manpower, improve delay data collection along with appropriate reason code, among others important task.
Support development and regular update of the site capacity evaluations to identify projects and initiatives that support cycle time requirements and sustainability in the assigned department.
Serve as representative for continuous improvement for the assigned department
Engage with applicable department on a routine basis to stay informed of issues faced and subsequently resolve them.
Utilize continuous improvement tools, lean and six sigma methodology to identify improvement opportunities, perform technical troubleshooting and successfully implement solutions
Serve as continuous improvement mentor for the floor staff and propagate the methodologies in the work culture.
Support the implementation of site strategy and business unit strategy by identifying appropriate initiatives for applicable department. In some instances support corporate initiatives and projects.
Identify the appropriate business drivers for each initiative, draft proposals and seek appropriate governance approvals.
Manage approved projects and continuous improvement initiatives that are in alignment with the site strategies.
Perform detailed project planning including but not limited to schedule and resources and successfully execute cross functional projects
Prepare timely project reports and communicate effectively with all stakeholders including reporting any potential project delays timely and provide mitigation plans to assure on-time execution.

Requirements:

Education and/or Experience:

Requirements:

· Demonstrate exposure as a project leader in a manufacturing site

· Ability to understand site and department strategies and implement those by leading appropriate initiatives.

· Demonstrated cross-functional leadership and ability to work in a matrix organization

· High sense of customer service

· Exposure to implementation of Lean and Six Sigma tools and strategies

· Basic financial knowledge (e.g. small capital projects development and justification)

Qualifications:

· BS in Science or Engineering

· 2 to 5 years’ experience working in a regulated industry

· > 1 years’ experience in a technical role in a biotech/ pharma company.

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Social Circle, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
186,Tooling Engineer - Sr,$53k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Designs and develops production tooling to support the NAL manufacturing process. Provides support and expertise to NAL facilities and tooling vendors, and ensures the production of quality injection molds that are built to company standards, within budgeted cost, and completed on time.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities
Reviews product designs for tool construction
Reviews Mold Spec Sheets with Lead Plant Tool Engineer and tool vendor
Obtains approvals of tool designs at all stages (Preliminary, Intermediate, and Final)
Travels to tooling vendors for on-site follow up and tool tryouts
Oversees pre-production Engineering changes
Enters the E-Req into the system and assigns the Mold Numbers for all new tools
Requests Part Data Transfers to tool vendor
Enters and maintains information in the Master Mold list
Creates Weekly Tool Progress Reports and distributes them to the project team
Drives the countermeasures on any Q,C,D issues from the Weekly Tool Progress Reports
Maintains mold trial process parameters and Mold Trial History Form with open issues
Obtains mold prints and 3-D data for mold designs, and maintains them in departmental directory
Maintains relevant information on all tooling in TeamCenter Community; including the Weekly Tool Progress Reports, steel certifications, CMM checks, process sheets, and Mold Trial History Forms
Participates in continuous improvement activities, as required
Stays current with state of the art tooling and processes
Performs other duties as assigned
Responsibilites
Requirements
Must meet one of the following Education and Experience requirements:
a. Bachelor’s Degree from an ABET-accredited engineering program in Mechanical Engineering, Industrial Technology, or a related discipline, plus 4 to 6 years of related manufacturing experience; OR
b. Associate’s Degree from an ABET-accredited engineering technology program in Tool/Die Technology, Industrial Technology, or a related discipline, plus 6 to 8 years of related manufacturing experience; OR
c. Journeyman Tool/Die Maker, plus 8 to 10 years of related manufacturing experience
Strong knowledge, skills, and abilities in the following areas:
a. Analytical and problem solving skills
b. Organizational, planning, and project management skills
c. Computer skills — proficiency using standard business software (including MS Office)
d. Written and verbal communications skills
e. Interpersonal skills — ability to confidently interact with individuals (internal/external) at all levels of authority and maintain composure in stressful, confrontational, and/or sensitive situations
All qualified applicants will receive equal consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, pregnancy, marital status, parental status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, genetic information, and veteran status or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law.*
Job Type: Full-time",4.1,"North American Lighting
4.1","Elberfeld, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
187,Software Engineer (Product Validation),$61k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"SinfoníaRx (a company of Tabula Rasa Healthcare Inc.) is a growing and innovative health care company whose mission is to provide the highest quality healthcare solutions for health plans, patients, and caregivers through Medication Therapy Management (MTM) programs, services, and products.

MTM is a personalized service designed to optimize health outcomes for individual patients. Through the SinfoníaRx program, pharmacy interns, pharmacy technicians, and pharmacists as a team work directly with patients, their providers, and community pharmacists to ensure optimal treatment while reducing the risk of adverse events and drug interactions. The SinfoníaRx program is unique in its ability to identify and triage drug-related problems at a population level on a per patient basis.

SinfoníaRx provides:
An environment of excellence and high-quality service;
Focus on people, communication, trust, and improvisation;
Competitive salaries;
Generous benefit plans;
Paid leave and holidays;
A relaxed work environment;
JOB PURPOSE:

In this position, the Software Engineer will play a key role in the software development life cycle by driving quality improvement and validating quality criteria. He or she will have strong software development skills and will leverage those skills in all activities, including the extension of and improvement upon an existing home-grown suite of automated test tooling. He or she will be able to understand software architecture and requirements, create and automate test plans and test cases, execute test cases, articulate test results, juggle multiple projects and priorities, validate acceptance criteria, and objectively assess production readiness from a quality perspective.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Reviews software requirements and provides quality-related feedback
Creates effective test plans and data sets related to functional/integration testing, end-to-end testing, and user interface testing
Creates, documents, and executes test cases to support the software release process
Assesses software deliverables with regard to functionality, usability, scalability, performance, reliability, availability, and serviceability
Expands and improves test automation and the automation framework to improve test coverage and efficiency
Validates achievement of software requirements
Tracks efforts appropriately, articulating test results, progress, and impediments to product leadership and the development team
Assists in disposition and prioritization of all reported software defects
Objectively assesses production readiness from a quality perspective
Supports product deployment efforts and ensures environment functionality via smoke testing
Provides Tier 2 support to end users for reported issues related to software features and functionality
Proposes ideas for improving quality and enhancing Development, Validation, and Support processes
Demonstrates strong project management skills and the ability to keep projects on track
Advances job knowledge to the next level by participating in educational opportunities
Attains subject matter expertise through test and support of software/systems and establishes thought leadership in those domains as a champion of quality
Accomplishes department and organizational mission by completing related tasks as needed
Assists with other technical projects and tasks (e.g. development of supporting applications, ad hoc requests) as needed by the company
EDUCATION:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, similar technical field of study, or related practical experience.
M.S. in Computer Science or similar technical field of study(preferred)
EXPERIENCE:
Required: Experience in Software Quality Assurance or any equivalent combination of training, education and experience that demonstrates ability to perform the duties of the position
Preferred: 2 or more years of career experience in Software Engineering and/or Software Quality Assurance
Preferred: Experience with creation, execution, and maintenance of automated front-end (browser and mobile) and back-end (API and database) tests
Preferred: Experience in healthcare IT, pharmacy and/or pharmacy management software
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS:
None
OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES:
Has strong programming skills and a demonstrable knowledge of programming languages and object-oriented concepts
Possesses a solid understanding of databases
Understands HTML concepts
Demonstrates fluency in UNIX/Linux environments
Possesses excellent oral and written communication skills
Demonstrates excellent attention to detail
Upholds the Agile philosophy and maintains flexibility in a changing environment
Has strong organization skills, a high degree of ownership for projects, and strong follow-through
Is responsible and self-directed
Possesses high level of integrity, with good judgment and recognition of need for confidentiality in certain circumstances
Is quality-oriented, innovative, steadfast, and efficient
Has programming skill in Ruby, PHP, JavaScript
Has proven skill in programming and testing with both DB2 and SQL databases
Has browser automation skill with Selenium, Watir
Has skills with shell scripting and virtualization (Vagrant/Docker)
#DICE",4.2,"Tabula Rasa HealthCare, Inc
4.2","Tucson, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
188,Senior Software Engineer,$41k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

When it comes to money remittance services, Intermex is a leader you can trust. We use a proprietary financial technology that enables consumers to send money from the US to 17 countries in Latin America and the Caribbean; and four countries in Africa. We offer wire transfer and other money processing services through our network of 100,000 agents, and with the best customer service in the industry.

But we are much more than that. We are a fast-moving, data driven company with a strong entrepreneurial spirit. And we are growing!

We’re on a mission to attract, engage, and retain those who are great team players and leaders who make it their first priority to deliver service excellence. At Intermex, the customer is at the center of everything we do, and our Tech teams are the special sauce that propels our success. If you're a performance driven, customer focused software developer who values teamwork and excellence, then please take a closer look -

Currently we are searching for a Senior Full Stack Software Engineer. The ability to work in a semi-agile environment through development, testing, and delivery is critical to success in this role. The ideal candidate will have strong communication skills, the ability to multi-task, with a quality focus; and foster a positive, open working environment.

The role will own business-critical applications, including development of new capabilities in core systems as well as business-driven updates. Must be well versed in .NET, C#, Visual Studio and MS SQL 2012-2016 technologies, including T-SQL, stored procedures, triggers, functions and views. The role also requires an emphasis on ease of use as well as data integrity when developing windows and web interfaces. Need to factor reporting into all application solutions.

Requirements

Responsibilities:
Generate development scripts in accordance with company’s Release Management protocol
Control data in accordance with the organization’s security policies
Prepare charts, tables, and logic diagrams needed in development analysis
Process analysis and workflow design to build efficient technical solutions
Program core system functions and capabilities (C# and database stored procedures, triggers, functions, views)
Develop data interfaces and migration processes
Experience/Skill Set:
7+ years of software development with at least 5 years developing in C# / .NET
Extensive knowledge in .NET technologies and web-based development, including demonstrated expertise in ASP.NET MVC 4, jQuery, Knockout, Kendo UI, Web Services/APIs and Team Foundation Server
Minimum 4+ years’ experience with 3-tier (Web Services ,WCF) and SQL programming
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server 2008/2012 and Microsoft Visual Studio 2008 thru 2013
Experience with Microsoft SSRS or SSAS a plus
Experience with Azure environment a plus, particularly with Azure Queues
Experience with SAML, digital certificates, encryption programming
Security-focused programming skills. Experience with OWASP preferred
Experience with XMLs, XSLs, HTML, web programming, JavaScript
Xamarin
Intermex is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, genetic information, disability or any other characteristic.",2.6,"Intermex Wire Transfer LLC
2.6","Miami, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
189,Software Development Engineer in Test (SDET)- Autonomous Behaviors & Path Planning,$44k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Torc, we have always believed that autonomous vehicle technology will transform how we travel, ship goods, and do business.

A leader in autonomous driving since 2007, Torc has spent over a decade commercializing their autonomous solutions with experienced partners. Now a part of the Daimler family, we are developing automated trucks to transform transportation.

Join us and take your career to new heights with a company that helped pioneer autonomous technology. You'll work with an experienced team of people who are committed to creating safer roads, and your contributions will have an impact on the future of transportation.

About the Role

If you are looking to solve some of today's most complex engineering challenges and to make a positive impact in the world, now is the time join us in revolutionizing transportation. In this role you will be responsible for various software engineering test activities that support the testing of autonomy algorithm software and develop testing framework and tools. Perform software testing activities to include, but not limited to, test event log analysis, perform regression testing, conduct deployment readiness test, create test plans and procedures, and provide software defect reports.

Responsibilities:
Responsible for creating software unit and integration test cases, test procedures, executing appropriate regression tests, analyzing the results and how they correlate to on road data and readiness for deployment to real world systems integration teams
Perform root cause analysis on complex integrated systems
Create test plans and verification strategies to support ongoing feature development and bug fixes
Validate and analyze autonomous driver performance to support product improvement areas
Identify test gaps and drive requirements for new test tools and test frameworks
Requirements:
Minimum 7+ years of software development with at least 4+ years of software systems integration experience
Bachelor's degree, or foreign degree equivalent, in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Robotics Engineer, Systems Engineering, or engineering equivalent; Master's degree preferred
Working knowledge of Test-Driven Development Methodology and test framework architectures
Required Technical Skills:
Expert in C++ programming skills
Experience with ROS (Robot Operating System)
Experience using Python for data analysis
Working knowledge of basic probability and linear algebra
Experience with vehicle kinematics and dynamics
Strong spatial comprehension and computational skills
Experience with software and system troubleshooting and problem-solving with specific focus on system-level analysis, fault isolation and identification
Experience with full life cycle software development including unit and software integration testing and configuration management
Experience with Jira programmatic interface preferred
Experience with simulation software such as Simian preferred
Passion for autonomy development and testing
Experience with Kanban, Scrum or Scaled Agile development preferred
Experience leading small testing event within specific areas of system, tracing and troubleshooting the entire software stack. Mentoring lower level engineers
Experience reporting out to product and quality management on testing progress
Experience in driving automotive vehicles; Have and maintain a US Driver's License with clean driving record
Interest in travel to support integration and testing of software at various testing locations (up to 20% travel possible)
Perks of being a Torc'r

Torc cares about our team members and we strive to provide benefits and resources to support their health, work/life balance, and their future. Additionally, we are always open to suggestions to accommodate individual employee needs. Torc offers:
Full coverage of monthly medical premiums for full-time employees
Medical/dental/vision/ AD+D and Life Insurance
401K plan with employer matching
Annual learning and development stipend
Leadership development training
Collaborative, energetic, and team-focused work environment
Flexibility in schedule and generous paid vacation",4.7,"Torc Robotics
4.7","Blacksburg, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
190,"Technology-Minded, Data Professional Opportunities",$40k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"At VU, we help Veterans buy homes. To make that happen, we have a variety of Technology-Minded, Data Professional Opportunities. The mantra that guides all of our Technology teams is, “see a need, fill a need.” That mentality led us to create a uniquely diverse department. We don’t just maintain vendors, but, given our special line of business, we are often creating the technological solutions we need.

The VU Technology Department includes:
Data Services
Information Security
Infrastructure Services
Product Strategy
Quantitative Strategy
Software Services
For our Data Professional Opportunities, you will work on one of the above Technology teams. Examples of these roles include:
Database Administrator
Data Engineer
Data Flow Engineer
Data Architect
Data Analyst
Data Scientist
Tableau Administrator
You are a creator and a maker. Innovation is part of your DNA. You are experienced and a subject matter expert, yet hungry to keep learning.

We’re looking for someone who can be passionate about their job and have fun doing it, who will deliver results with integrity, and who enjoys finding ways to enhance the lives of others every day.

We’ll also want to know you can demonstrate some or all of these attributes:
Familiarity/experience with system analysis and design
Ability to think critically and analytically
Ideate and facilitate creative solutions
Excel in a fast-paced, results-oriented environment
Thrive in a highly cooperative work setting
Strong knowledge of SQL
Experience working with database management systems, such as SQL Server, MySQL, and MongoDB
Relevant experience in software delivery, ideally in our native tech stack: C#/ASP.NET/MVC/WCF/SQL/IIS.
Experience with common ETL tools, especially SSIS
Experience with Big Data tools, such as Hadoop, Spark, Sqoop, Hive, etc.
Familiarity working with Windows or Linux server environments
Experience supporting data-focused applications such as RabbitMQ, Redis, ElasticSearch, etc.
Familiarity with common data-modeling concepts and tools
Proficiency in basic computer technologies
No previous mortgage experience is necessary and as you grow and gain experience, opportunities across the company are available to progress your career.

Veterans United is the nation’s #1 VA lender and over 97% of our customers would recommend us. This may sound like a brag but it's only possible because we have a team of talented and committed employees working hard, every day, to make a difference for the people we serve; the men and women who sacrificed for our country. We find it’s easy to give your best when you serve the brave.

Veterans United Home Loans and its affiliates are proud to be Equal Opportunity Employers committed to creating a diverse and inclusive workforce. We consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, religion, color, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or other legally protected classifications.",4.8,"Veterans United Home Loans
4.8","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
191,"Senior Software Engineer, Telematics",$80k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an Embedded Software/Firmware Engineer, Telematics Software. Our ideal candidate exhibits a can-do attitude and approaches his or her work with vigor and determination. Candidates will be expected to demonstrate excellence in their respective fields, to possess the ability to learn quickly and to strive for perfection within a fast-paced environment.
The Role
Design and develop complex software for Telematics Control Unit
Architect Software to work with multi-core processor environment
Provide design, development, and debug support for integrating individual functions into the control unit
Ensure optimization of software through design reviews and code reviews
Develop a design and/or product validation test program to ensure robustness of design
Integrate with different teams such as Cloud, Powertrain, Data Science etc to realize the project
Qualifications
Strong proficiency in C and C++, and object oriented design.
Strong proficiency in Shell Scripting.
Strong understanding in IPC Mechanisms – Sockets, Message Queues, Shared Memory, etc.
Strong Linux Operating System fundamentals.
Strong understanding of Data Structures and Algorithms.
Strong knowledge of Networking protocols such as TCP/UDP, MQTT, etc.
Working knowledge of Automotive Protocols such as CAN, UDS, etc.
Experience in scripting languages such as Python is a plus.
Experience with writing unit tests.
Experience in the field of Automotive Telematics Software is a big plus.
Experience with scripting tools and methods to optimize SW development and testing activities.
At least 5-15+ years of industry experience
MS/BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science, Computer engineering, Electrical engineering or other related fields or equivalent experience
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
192,Lead Data Platform Engineer,$96k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"Want to build a product that uses data to see and make sense of the future?

If you are a passionate coder who wants to make an impact working on a product that clients love, we'd want to talk with you.

At CB Insights we build products that help clients make sense of the future and drive their businesses forward using data. Our system retrieves large amounts of structured and unstructured data sets and uses scientific methods to extract knowledge and insights. We present those analytics through a sophisticated, dynamic user interface which enables our clients to find answers to their most important questions.

The role you'll play:

As a Lead Software Engineer at CB Insights you will be part of a cross-disciplinary, self-motivated team with clear ownership and passion to form the future. Our team uses state-of-the-art technologies and writes quality code that ships often.

Our Data Engineers support critical business logic across a suite of robust services and scalable data processing jobs.

We focus on modularity and reuse where it makes sense, while ensuring that there are no constraints to delivering world-class software continuously.

The Lead Platform Engineer is a technology focused role for a hands-on coder who will have broad impact on the team and the engineering department. It is not a manager or a team lead role. Strong communication skills, adaptability and a collaborative mindset are key attributes we are looking for in a candidate.

If this sounds interesting to you, reach out and join CB Insights now!

Your Main Tasks:
Develop features for our next generation market intelligence platform on a small Agile team.
Consistently and frequently deliver solutions that are well-engineered, maintainable and tested within the agreed upon timeframe.
Participate in code reviews and sprint planning, help identify opportunities, work through challenges and share knowledge with colleagues.
Collaborate with the product team to understand business requirements.
Mentor and guide other software engineers.
What you bring to the table:
An experienced engineer who is passionate about coding and who has learned through several years of experience in the field
Several years professional experience with dynamic and/or compiled programming languages (we use Go and Python)
Very strong proficiency with relational databases, including ER modeling and performance optimization (we use MySQL, PostgreSQL, Aurora)
Professional experience using messaging queues and streaming technologies
Expert level experience building ETL jobs and data pipelines using one or more of the following: Spark, Kafka, SNS, SQS, NATS.io, Elasticsearch, Airflow, Pachyderm
SaaS models and cloud services preferably AWS
Professional experience working remote or telecommuting
Proficiency developing in a Mac/Linux environment
Believer in Lean and Agile values and principles for building software
Strong attention to detail and quality
Comfortable working with engineers that are remote as well as from the local office
The Perks:
Amazing culture that emphasizes Hard Work, High Standards, Hunger, Helpfulness, and Humility. Learn more here
A newsletter that 650k+ people follow: Sign up here.
Be Healthy: Health with HSA and FSA options, dental, and vision insurance along with unlimited/take what you need sick day policy
Plan for the future: 401k with up to 4% match
Continued Learning: $1,000 yearly continuing education stipend
Rest and Relax: Competitive vacation and holiday plans
Refuel: In office daily lunch stipend, unlimited snacks/coffee
We know that diversity makes for the best problem-solving and creative thinking. We are dedicated to adding new perspectives to the team and encourage everyone to apply if your experience is close to what we are looking for.

Equal Opportunity Employer: CB Insights is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.

If you know someone who'd be perfect for the role,


submit here and you'll be eligible for $5,000!

All of the work for this position will be performed in the U.S. As such, in compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
#LI-HL1",4.0,"CB Insights
4.0","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
193,IT Data Engineering Intern,-1,"Summer 2021
Shure offers a challenging and rewarding summer internship program. The twelve week program is offered to undergraduate students that have completed at least 2 years of college, as well as graduate students. Each intern will receive a competitive salary and students who reside out of Illinois will receive a housing stipend to cover living expenses. Applications will be collected, reviewed and selected candidates will be contacted in late fall/early winter.
We are looking for a data passionate individual to join our growing Data and Analytics practice. The internship will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The ideal candidate enjoys solving business problems and delivering data insights. The Data Engineer will support our database architects, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. Must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

Assist with data cataloging, data acquisition, data modeling and data quality.
Learn / leverage cloud-based data management capabilities
Assist with research on technology options and processes related to data management and governance
Assist with analytics to uncover potential opportunities
Building of data visualization in support of business projects
Help with data pipeline projects, as needed

In-process bachelor’s or advanced degree in computer science, data science / analytics related degree
Some experience with open-source programing languages, e.g. Python, R, etc.
Knowledge of the AWS data lake formation and/or Tableau a plus
Microsoft Office skills
Self-motivated, team player, detail oriented
Able to meet required deadlines
Ability to work independently with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Keen willingness to learn new concepts and skills.",4.0,"Shure Incorporated
4.0","Skokie, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,"Senior Software Engineer, OTA",$80k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an Software Engineer, OTA. Our ideal candidate exhibits a can-do attitude and approaches his or her work with vigor and determination. Candidates will be expected to demonstrate excellence in their respective fields, to possess the ability to learn quickly and to strive for perfection within a fast-paced environment.

The Role
Design and develop complex software for Telematics Control Unit to perform Over-the-Air Software Update for the vehicle.
Architect Software to work with multi-core processor environment.
Provide design, development, and debug support for integrating individual functions into the control unit.
Ensure optimization of software through design reviews and code reviews.
Develop a design and/or product validation test program to ensure robustness of design.
Integrate with different teams such as Cloud, Powertrain, Data Science etc to realize the project.
Qualifications
Strong proficiency in C and C++, and object oriented design.
Strong understanding of Data Structures and Algorithms.
Strong understanding of Linux OS Fundamentals and IPC Mechanisms
Strong knowledge of Unified Diagnostic Services (UDS).
Experience with Diagnostics-over-IP (DoIP) is a big plus.
Experience writing Software for Over-The-Air Software Update is a plus.
Experience with scripting languages/tools and methods to optimize SW development and testing activities.
At least 5-15+ years of industry experience
MS/BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science, Computer engineering, Electrical engineering or other related fields or equivalent experience
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
195,SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS,$67k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The Intelligent Systems Division develops automated solutions for commercial and government clients in multiple domains including transportation (traffic management, connected automated vehicle), manufacturing robotics, medical prognostics and communication standards.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as a software developer and researcher on a team developing software solutions in technology areas such as Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), Integrated Corridor Management Systems (ICMS), and Decision Support Systems (DSS)
Initiate advanced research and development programs

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Utilize advanced data analytics techniques and enterprise data infrastructure skills in state-of-the-art software development environments
Perform in all phases of the development lifecycle, including requirements definition, software/systems design, implementation, testing, and integration
Interact with clients and conduct technical presentations.

Requirements:


Requires a Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering or Computer Science or related
7 years of experience with an emphasis on software development and systems engineering and exposure to object-oriented programming (programming languages such as, but not limited to, C++, C#, Java)
Education and/or experience involving one or multiple of the following: .NET, C#, Java, JavaScript, C++, Python, WPF, Git, Microsoft SQL Server, Windows, Linux, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Elastic Stack, TypeScript, HTML, CSS, Angular, Kafka, AWS, Azure, GCP
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to work well individually and as a member of a project team are required
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
196,Space RCO - Space Vehicle System Engineer SME,$59k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

MTSI is searching for a highly skilled Space Vehicle System Engineer (SVSE) System Matter Expert (SME) to support development of first-of-kind space vehicles and missions. This handpicked candidate must possess technical expertise and experience with developing, designing, building, and integrating space hardware and software. In this position, you will provide System Engineering Technical Assistance (SETA) to the Space Rapid Capabilities Office (SpRCO). The SpRCO program office, located at Kirtland AFB, NM, is a small, streamlined organization with dedicated, organic acquisition support functions: contracting, financial management, human resources, security, program management and technical engineering support that are critical in enabling the rapid response required for classified space programs. The mission is to develop and deliver operationally dominant space capabilities at the speed of warfighting relevance in response to Commander, U.S. Space Command requirements. A successful candidate should be a leader and problem solver with a proven ability to deliver superior results as part of a high performing team in a high-profile, fast-paced environment.

Why is MTSI known as a Great Place to Work?

Interesting Work: Our co-workers support some of the most important and critical programs to our national defense and security.
Values: Our first core value is that employees come first. We challenge our co-workers to provide the highest level of support and service and reward them with some of the best benefits in the industry.
100% Employee Ownership: We have a stake in each other's success and the success of our customers. It's also nice to know what's going on across the company; we have company wide town-hall meetings three times a year.
Great Benefits:
Start at 20 days PTO/year + 10 holidays/year
Flexible schedules
6% 401k match with immediate vesting
Semi-annual bonus eligibility (July and December)
Company funded Employee Stock Ownership Plan (ESOP) - a separate qualified retirement account
Up to $10,000 in annual tuition reimbursement
Optional zero deductible Blue Cross/Blue Shield health insurance plan
Other company funded benefits
Track Record of Success: We have grown every year since our founding in 1993.

For additional company information, please visit: www.mtsi-va.com

Responsibilities:

You will work in a small, highly empowered team where every team member is directly responsible for the success of the program. Engineering responsibilities span technology domains including space rated hardware, software, sensors, and processors in an extremely fast-paced, responsive development environment. This SETA candidate will provide in-depth background on satellite vehicle bus and/or subsystems to improve program office insight into state-of-the art IC, DoD, commercial and legacy space vehicle systems, and C2 requirements and capabilities. You must apply advanced principles, theories, and concepts for highly classified systems, while also effectively communicating complex results with management and executive leadership.

Supports design, interpretation, and analysis of technical solutions to complex projects
Leads or supports technical programs, projects, or tasks whose technical complexity requires engineering oversight
Ensures completion of programs, projects, or tasks within estimated time frames and budget constraints
Provides input to the government customer concerning risks to performance, schedule, and budget due to either proposed contractor plans or contractor's execution of accepted plans
Ensure the quality of the program, project, or task deliverables meet or exceed standards or metrics and assesses such deliverables to ensure that the final deliverables will meet the warfighting purpose for which they are intended
Plans and performs engineering research, design development, and other engineering assignments in conformance with the design, engineering, and customer specifications
Responsible for the overall technical/engineering portions of major projects or programs
Coordinates with multiple partners/agencies to ensure system engineering communities support delivery milestones
Tracks and advises design trades and associated cost, schedule, and technical impacts to requirements
Initiates, supervises, and/or develops requirements from a project’s inception to conclusion for complex to extremely complex programs
Provides strategic advice, technical guidance and expertise to program and project staff
Provides detailed analysis, evaluation and recommendations for improvements, optimization development and/or maintenance efforts for client specific or mission critical challenges/issues
Consults with client to define need or problem
Supervises studies and leads surveys to collect and analyze data to provide advice and recommend solutions
Communicate clearly, concisely, and with technical accuracy—oral and written
Other duties as required
Qualifications:
Minimum fifteen (15) years DoD/IC, or relevant industry work experience
Exceptional and/or unique qualifications in development and fielding satellite systems
Understanding of space operational environment and corresponding mission user needs
Knowledge of space system engineering, development, and manufacturing
Experience in DoD program management including program development and transition
Experience with Integrated Master Schedules, and risk management
Experience with Statements of Work (SOW) and Performance Work Statements (PWS)

Qualifications Desired:

Ten (10) years of relevant DoD and/or Industry work experience with SAP/RSV and/or SCI; recent CI polygraph
System Engineering Technical Assistance (SETA) to Government program office
Experience with RF and/or laser SATCOM
Experience with rapid prototyping
Experience with integrated air, space and cyberspace capabilities
Experience developing, deploying, and maintaining ground mission planning architecture and software
Experience with ACAT I/II level acquisition programs
Experience in planning and executing test campaigns for space systems
Fluency with IC organizations

Education Requirements:

An applicable engineering degree from a program accredited by the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET) or possess a Professional Engineering license
Relevant MA/MS/ME degree

Clearance Requirements:

Active TOP SECRET clearance with sensitive compartmentalized information (SCI) and special access program (SAP) eligibility (no less than 5 years total SAP and/or SCI environment experience, with 1-year total within last 5 years) and willingness to submit to a Counter-Intelligence polygraph
Candidate must maintain a TS/SCI clearance as a condition of employment

Travel Requirements: Full-time, on site in vicinity of Kirtland AFB, NM, and will require travel up to 30% of time within the continental United States

Relocation Approved: Yes

Tags: Space RCO, Space Systems Engineering, Mission Systems, Engineering, Acquisition Management, Program Management, Ground Systems, SATCOM, Test and Evaluation, Albuquerque, Air Force, Space Force, Space Development, Space Dynamics, Orbital Analysis, Operations Research

Please Note: U.S. Citizenship is required for this position.

#LI-MR1

#mtsi",4.7,"Modern Technology Solutions, Inc.
4.7","Albuquerque, NM",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
197,VALIDATION ENGINEER (CRITICAL UTILITIES),$34k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

This role is part of an operational ramp-up team for new pharmaceutical plant reaching construction and mechanical completion. Providing operational support for commissioning and qualification teams and establishing first operational footprints, developing and revising manufacturing procedures to final operation platform. The position will require seamless transition into operation of state-of-the-art high-speed manufacturing/packaging equipment.

Responsible for providing technical support to operations in terms of equipment/system initial validation and equipment/system requalifications. Will participate in equipment improvement teams charged with enhancing the compliance and performance of plant systems, while considering the regulatory requirements for change control. The individual must have a comprehensive understanding of cGMPs and become certified to enter Controlled Areas of the plant (Grade D, C and up to B/ A). The ability to write reports clearly, concisely and accurately; accurately record data and a basic understanding of statistical analysis is also required to perform these duties. Weekends and Off-shift hours are periodically required.

Responsibilities

PRINCIPAL ACTIVITIES PERFORMED BY THE INCUMBENT

Schedules and executes equipment requalifications per Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs). Coordinates and communicates all testing with affected functional groups and evaluates test results. Analyzes data, composes a final report and circulates for approval.
Executes equipment validation studies to include protocol preparation, scheduling, protocol execution, and final report preparation. Participates in presentation of results to Regulatory Agency when necessary.
Programs and operates department analytical instruments (such as temperature/humidity dataloggers) to perform controlled temperature/humidity chamber qualifications (examples lyophilizers, warehouses, sterilizers, incubators, etc.).
Participates in developments/ improvements to validation programs as needed to remain current with cGMPs and industry standards.
Participates in teams assembled to specify, install, validate, troubleshoot and maintain systems and equipment.
Conducts Validation deviations and/or participates in deviation investigations to identify root causes and define corrective and/or preventative actions (CA/PA).

REQUIREMENTS

BS/BA degree in science, engineering, manufacturing technology or closely related field or equivalent experience in a manufacturing facility
Minimum 1-3 years pharmaceutical manufacturing experience
Excellent attention to detail and working knowledge of FDA Regulations/Guidance, and Good Manufacturing Practices
Strong technical knowledge and experience with pharmaceutical process, sterilization, and cleaning validation as related to sterile products
Must be proactive, have experience with high performance teams, strong interpersonal and project management skills
Must be able to interact with varying levels within the company
Ability to work both independently and in partnership with others; proven ability to use initiative and drive to achieve results
Strong conflict resolution skills
Must be willing to travel both domestically and internationally
Must be able to work multiple shifts as needed to meet deadlines

IND-1

#GD

Additional Information

We offer an excellent salary and benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, as well as life insurance, disability, 401K with company match, and wellness program.

Fresenius Kabi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disabilities, or protected veteran status.",3.5,"Fresenius Kabi
3.5","Wilson, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
198,VALIDATION ENGINEER (FORMULATION),$34k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

This role is part of an operational ramp-up team for new pharmaceutical plant reaching construction and mechanical completion. Providing operational support for commissioning and qualification teams and establishing first operational footprints, developing and revising manufacturing procedures to final operation platform. The position will require seamless transition into operation of state-of-the-art high-speed manufacturing/packaging equipment.

Responsible for providing technical support to operations in terms of equipment/system initial validation and equipment/system requalifications. Will participate in equipment improvement teams charged with enhancing the compliance and performance of plant systems, while considering the regulatory requirements for change control. The individual must have a comprehensive understanding of cGMPs and become certified to enter Controlled Areas of the plant (Grade D, C and up to B/ A). The ability to write reports clearly, concisely and accurately; accurately record data and a basic understanding of statistical analysis is also required to perform these duties. Weekends and Off-shift hours are periodically required.

Responsibilities

PRINCIPAL ACTIVITIES PERFORMED BY THE INCUMBENT

Schedules and executes equipment requalifications per Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs). Coordinates and communicates all testing with affected functional groups and evaluates test results. Analyzes data, composes a final report and circulates for approval.
Executes equipment validation studies to include protocol preparation, scheduling, protocol execution, and final report preparation. Participates in presentation of results to Regulatory Agency when necessary.
Programs and operates department analytical instruments (such as temperature/humidity dataloggers) to perform controlled temperature/humidity chamber qualifications (examples lyophilizers, warehouses, sterilizers, incubators, etc.).
Participates in developments/ improvements to validation programs as needed to remain current with cGMPs and industry standards.
Participates in teams assembled to specify, install, validate, troubleshoot and maintain systems and equipment.
Conducts Validation deviations and/or participates in deviation investigations to identify root causes and define corrective and/or preventative actions (CA/PA).

REQUIREMENTS

BS/BA degree in science, engineering, manufacturing technology or closely related field or equivalent experience in a manufacturing facility
Minimum 1-3 years pharmaceutical manufacturing experience
Excellent attention to detail and working knowledge of FDA Regulations/Guidance, and Good Manufacturing Practices
Strong technical knowledge and experience with pharmaceutical process, sterilization, and cleaning validation as related to sterile products
Must be proactive, have experience with high performance teams, strong interpersonal and project management skills
Must be able to interact with varying levels within the company
Ability to work both independently and in partnership with others; proven ability to use initiative and drive to achieve results
Strong conflict resolution skills
Must be willing to travel both domestically and internationally
Must be able to work multiple shifts as needed to meet deadlines

IND-1

#GD

Additional Information

We offer an excellent salary and benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, as well as life insurance, disability, 401K with company match, and wellness program.

Fresenius Kabi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disabilities, or protected veteran status.",3.5,"Fresenius Kabi
3.5","Wilson, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
199,"Engineer, Senior Staff Design",$99k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Marvell


At Marvell, we believe that infrastructure powers progress. That execution is as essential as innovation. That better collaboration builds better technology. Trusted by the world’s leading technology companies for 25 years, we move, store, process and secure the world’s data with semiconductor solutions designed for our customers’ current needs and future ambitions. Through a process of deep collaboration and transparency, we’re ultimately changing the way tomorrow’s enterprise, cloud, automotive, and carrier architectures transform—for the better.

The data infrastructure that our customers build has never been more critical to our global economy. It’s what’s keeping the world connected, businesses running, and information flowing. If you’re ready to excel, innovate, and truly enjoy your work, apply now for the position detailed below.

The Opportunity


Job Description:

Marvell is actively seeking for high quality digital circuit designers at all levels to assist Marvell's central SerDes PHY IP team. This team's responsibility is to design and develop state of the art SerDes PHY IP from specification, RTL to GDS. Our SerDes PHY supports the latest possible industrial specifications of SAS G1-G5, PCIe G1-G5, and Ethernet 802.3 1G-100G. This team develops the company’s core IP and is one of the most fundamental driving strengths to the Marvell’s success. Your day to day work involves RTL design, verification test cases, timing analysis, microcontroller firmware controls, protocol-layer handling, signal processing, low power design, IP delivery and schedule control. Your main responsibility will be working with project lead, DSP, firmware team to deliver high quality SerDes PHY IP, and provide innovative solutions to solve the real-world engineering challenges. Strong communication and a highly responsible character are the main soft skills we are looking for.

Education and experience requirements:
Master’s or foreign equivalent degree in Electrical Engineering, Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering, or a related field
Minimum 5-10 years of experiences as a Digital Design Engineer
Minimum Qualifications:
Minimum 5 years of Verilog ASIC design techniques
Minimum 5 years Signal processing knowledge and signal processing circuit design experiences such as digital filter circuit design.
Minimum 5 years and demonstrable knowledge Static timing analysis
Cross Clock Domain design experience
Demonstratable ability to write design verification test cases
Demonstratable knowledge of Standard industry simulators and waveform viewing tools such as NCsim or Verdi
Minimum 3 years using one or more of the following: MATLAB, C/C++, Perl programming language
Preferred Qualification: (too vague, we need more specifics. Either experience level in years or projects)
Demonstrates strong signal processing knowledge on digital filter, Inter-symbol-interference, channel coding
Demonstratable knowledge of Analog/Mix Signal. Analog phase-lock-loop, ADC-DAC circuit understandings…
Demonstrable knowledge of Microcontroller, understanding of assembly code
The Perks


With competitive compensation and great benefits, you will enjoy our workstyle within an incredible culture. We’ll give you all the tools you need to succeed so you can grow and develop with us. For additional information on what it’s like to work at Marvell, visit our Careers page.

Your Future


Marvell provides a work environment that promotes employee growth and development. We are searching for an individual who wants to grow with the company and will strive to improve performance. If you are driven, personable, and energetic, there will be additional opportunities for you here at Marvell.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.

Any applicant who requires a reasonable accommodation during the selection process should contact Marvell HR Helpdesk at GR-HR-Services-Americas@marvell.com or 408-222-3604.",3.7,"Marvell Technology
3.7","Santa Clara, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
